COST  MANAGEMENT  ISSUES  IN  NASA’S

ACQUISITIONS  AND  PROGRAMS

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MARCH  5,  2009

Serial No. 111–7

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

47–554PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2009

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chair

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
PETE  OLSON,  Texas

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio
BEN  R.  LUJA´ N,  New  Mexico
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York
PARKER  GRIFFITH,  Alabama
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
KATHLEEN  DAHLKEMPER,  Pennsylvania
ALAN  GRAYSON,  Florida
SUZANNE  M.  KOSMAS,  Florida
GARY  C.  PETERS,  Michigan
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

HON.  GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona,  Chair

DAVID  WU,  Oregon
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio
PARKER  GRIFFITH,  Alabama
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ALAN  GRAYSON,  Florida
SUZANNE  M.  KOSMAS,  Florida
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

PETE  OLSON,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
RICHARD  OBERMANN  Subcommittee  Staff  Director
PAM  WHITNEY  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

ALLEN  LI  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

KEN  MONROE  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member
ED  FEDDEMAN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

DEVIN  BRYANT  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

March  5,  2009

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Gabrielle  Giffords,  Chairwoman,  Subcommittee
on  Space  and  Aeronautics,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Pete  Olson,  Minority  Ranking  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Space  and  Aeronautics,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  Christopher  J.  Scolese,  Acting  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics  and

Space Administration (NASA)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Cristina  T.  Chaplain,  Director,  Acquisition  and  Sourcing  Management,

Government Accountability Office (GAO)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Gary  P.  Pulliam,  Vice  President,  Civil  and  Commercial  Operations,  The

Aerospace Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Discussion

Impediments to Performance in NASA Projects ................................................
NASA  Implements  Incentive  and  Punitive  Measures  to  Increase  Account-
ability .................................................................................................................
NASA’s Problems Could Be Fixed With a Small Fraction of Stimulus ...........
Cost  Management  of  Human  Flight  Missions  Compared  to  Robotic  Mis-
sions ...................................................................................................................
Should NASA Freeze Cost Estimate Design? ....................................................
Long-duration Human Space Flight and Its Effect on Cost .............................
Shrinking Industrial Base Adds to Cost ............................................................
Growing American Industrial Base Means Changes to ITAR ..........................
External Factors in NASA’s Cost Growth ..........................................................
NASA Success Has Led to Heightened Public Expectations ............................
GAO Recommendations for NASA’s Future Human Space Flight ...................
Cost Overruns in Climate Change Missions ......................................................
Contractor Performance Contributes to Cost Overruns ....................................
NASA’s Civil Servant Capacity to Provide Technological Expertise ...............
NASA Life Cycle Performance ............................................................................
Firm-fixed Contracts Incentive to Avoid Cost Overruns ..................................
More Cost Overruns Flexibility in Human Space Flight ..................................

(III)

17
18

19
20

21
23
27

28
29
33

33
35
40

40

41
43

43
44
45
45
46
46
47
48
49
50
51
51
52
54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

A Fixed Date to End the Space Shuttle Increase Cost Stability ......................
How New Contracting Procedures Will Effect NASA .......................................
NASA Addresses Launch Conflicts and Increased Cost ...................................
Comparison  Between  NASA  and  DOD  on  Cost  Estimating,  Budgeting,  and
Programmatic Control ......................................................................................
MSL Dramatic Cost Estimate Change ...............................................................
Bad Judgment and Irrational Optimism Affects Cost Estimates ....................

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr.  Christopher  J.  Scolese,  Acting  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics  and
Space Administration (NASA) .............................................................................
Ms.  Cristina  T.  Chaplain,  Director,  Acquisition  and  Sourcing  Management,
Government Accountability Office (GAO) ..........................................................
Mr.  Gary  P.  Pulliam,  Vice  President,  Civil  and  Commercial  Operations,  The
Aerospace Corporation .........................................................................................

Page
55
56
56

58
59
59

64

69

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COST  MANAGEMENT  ISSUES  IN  NASA’S

ACQUISITIONS  AND  PROGRAMS

THURSDAY,  MARCH  5,  2009

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Gabrielle Giffords
[Chairwoman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE AND AERONAUTICS

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Cost Management Issues in NASA’s

Acquisitions and Programs

THURSDAY, MARCH 5, 2009

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

I. Purpose

The  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology’s  Subcommittee  on  Space  and
Aeronautics will convene a hearing to review the status of the National Aeronautics
and  Space  Administration’s  (NASA)  efforts  to  improve  the  cost  management  of  its
acquisitions  and  programs.  The  hearing  will  focus  on  (1)  the  results  of  the  Govern-
ment  Accountability  Office’s  (GAO)  just-completed  assessments  of  selected  large-
scale  NASA  projects  and  its  designation  of  NASA  acquisition  management  as  a
‘‘high-risk’’ area, (2) the causes of cost growth and schedule delays in NASA acquisi-
tions and (3) the Agency’s progress in addressing them.

II. Witnesses
Christopher Scolese
Acting Administrator
National Aeronautics and Space Administration
Cristina T. Chaplain
Director
Acquisition and Sourcing Management
U.S. Government Accountability Office
Gary P. Pulliam
Vice President
Civil and Commercial Operations
The Aerospace Corporation

III. Overview

When  programs  cost  more  to  build  and  take  longer  than  planned,  NASA  is  able
to  accomplish  less  with  the  resources  it  is  allocated.  Confronted  with  specific  in-
stances of cost growth and schedule delay, the Agency is forced to either seek addi-
tional funds or make difficult trade-offs among its portfolio of projects such as short-
ening  missions  or  removing  instruments.  An  important  factor  in  mitigating  cost
growth  and  schedule  delay  is  accurate  information  with  which  to  make  decisions
and  cost  projections.  For  more  than  a  decade,  GAO  has  identified  NASA’s  contract
management  as  a  high-risk  area—in  part  because  of  NASA’s  inability  to  collect,
maintain,  and  report  the  full  cost  of  its  programs  and  projects.  GAO  has  said  that
in  the  absence  of  such  information,  NASA  would  be  challenged  to  manage  its  pro-
grams and control program costs. GAO has also underlined the importance of sound
cost  management  in  other  reports.  For  example,  in  reporting  on  NASA’s  initial  ef-
forts  to  implement  President  Bush’s  2004  Vision  for  Space  Exploration,  GAO  said
that  in  the  past,  NASA  has  had  difficulty  meeting  cost,  schedule,  and  performance
objectives  for  some  of  its  projects  because  it  failed  to  adequately  define  project  re-
quirements and quantify resources.

It  is  important  to  note  that  while  essential  to  ensuring  timely,  effective  and  effi-
cient  acquisition  of  goods  and  services,  integrating  sound  cost  management  in  pro-
gram  management  is  not  enough.  For  example,  there  must  be  transparency  and
clarity  in  the  decision  about  whether  design  and  development  is  appropriately  per-
formed internally or acquired from external sources. In addition, an emerging issue
requiring NASA’s focused attention is the impact of the growing number of bid pro-
tests lodged by vendors not selected in response to several of its procurements, such
as those for new space suits (since resolved) and Commercial Resupply Services for

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

the International Space Station. Awaiting the outcome of such bid protests can have
adverse impacts on the Agency’s planned schedules and program budgets. Potential
means  of  minimizing  the  impact  of  protests  range  from  ensuring  proposal  evalua-
tions  are  defensible  to  guarding  against  any  appearances  of  conflict  of  interest  in
evaluation panelists and advisory review group members chosen. Finally, successful
acquisition  outcomes  require  a  skilled  and  motivated  acquisition  work  force.  The
NASA Project Management Study completed in 1981 concluded that

‘‘Good  people  are  the  key  to  good  project  management.  Sound  project  planning,
management  practices,  and  source  evaluation  approaches  are  all  important.
However,  they  cannot  substitute  for  having  high  quality,  and  highly-motivated
people  responsible  for  project  management;  both  inside  and  outside  of  govern-
ment.’’

As  GAO  has  indicated,  NASA’s  need  to  effectively  manage  its  programs  will  gain
even  more  importance  as  the  Agency  seeks  to  manage  its  wide-ranging  portfolio  in
an increasingly constrained fiscal environment. While today’s hearing will focus spe-
cifically  on  cost  management,  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  will  con-
tinue to monitor and review a range of issues that impact NASA’s ability to acquire
needed goods and services in a timely, cost effective and efficient manner.

IV. Potential Hearing Issues

federal agencies benefit from NASA’s corrective actions?

The following are some of the potential issues that might be raised at the hearing:
• What  are  the  main  causes  of  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  in  NASA  pro-
grams  and  projects?  Is  there  a  consensus  on  what  causes  cost  growth  and
schedule  delay?  Are  there  any  similarities  with  those  experienced  by  the  De-
partment  of  Defense  and  other  federal  agencies  in  their  acquisition  of  space
systems?
• What  has  NASA  done  to  mitigate  cost  growth  and  schedule  delay?  Can  other
• In  light  of  continued  instances  of  cost  growth  and  schedule  delay  in  key  pro-
grams such as Mars Science Lander and Glory, how effective have NASA lat-
est efforts been?
• What  more  needs  to  be  done  to  mitigate  cost  growth  and  schedule  delay  in
• Why  is  NASA  acquisition  management  still  characterized  by  GAO  as  a  high-
• What  has  NASA  done  in  response  to  GAO’s  characterization  that  NASA’s  ac-
• What must NASA do to warrant removal from GAO’s high-risk list?

quisition management is a high-risk area?

NASA programs?

risk area after 18 years?

V. Background

To  effectively  use  public  funds  in  carrying  out  its  activities,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  is  expected  to  employ  sound  management  practices  and  processes,  including
the  measurement  of  program  performance.  The  Congress,  Executive  Branch  offi-
cials,  and  the  public  want  to  know  whether  federal  programs  are  achieving  stated
goals and what their costs are.

The Importance of Developing Reliable Cost Estimates

As stated in GAO’s ‘‘Cost Estimating and Assessment Guide: Best Practices for De-
veloping  and  Managing  Capital  Program  Costs’’  [GAO–09–3SP],  cost  estimates  are
necessary  for  government  programs  for  many  reasons:  supporting  decisions  about
whether to fund one program over another, developing annual budget requests, and
evaluating  resource  requirements  at  key  decision  points.  Moreover,  as  stated  in
GAO’s  guide,  having  a  realistic  estimate  of  projected  costs  makes  for  effective  re-
source allocation, and increases the probability of a program’s success.

GAO’s guide defines a cost estimate as the summation of individual cost elements,
using established methods and valid data to estimate the future costs of a program,
based on what is known today. The management of a cost estimate involves contin-
ually updating the estimate with actual data as they become available, revising the
estimate  to  reflect  program  changes,  and  analyzing  differences  between  estimated
and actual costs.

The  guide  further  states  that  the  ability  to  generate  reliable  cost  estimates  is  a
critical function. Without this ability, agencies are at risk of experiencing cost over-
runs,  missed  deadlines,  and  performance  shortfalls—all  recurring  problems  that
GAO’s program assessments have revealed. Furthermore, cost increases often mean

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

that  the  government  cannot  fund  as  many  activities  as  planned  or  deliver  them
when promised.

Cost Growth and Schedule Delays in NASA Programs

The  need  to  mitigate  cost  growth  and  schedule  delay  in  NASA  programs  is  not
a new concern. As early as 1981, it was identified by the NASA Project Management
Study.  In  an  article  featured  in  NASA’s  ASK  project  management  publication,  Dr.
C.  Howard  Robins,  former  Deputy  Associate  Administrator  for  Space,  said  that  the
study, colloquially referred to as the ‘‘Hearth Study,’’ would ‘‘come to be viewed with-
in  NASA  as  a  landmark.’’  Both  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology
and  House  Committee  on  Appropriations  requested  the  study  due  to  congressional
concerns  about  cost  and  schedule  performance  problems.  The  House  Science  and
Technology Committee letter dated September 19, 1980 to NASA stated:

‘‘A  number  of  large  projects,  for  example  Galileo,  LANDSAT–D,  space  telescope,
and ISPM, are experiencing cost and schedule problems.’’
‘‘The  Committee  encourages  NASA  to  take  the  necessary  steps  to  minimize  the
cost  and  schedule  impact  of  the  problems  associated  with  these  ongoing  pro-
grams. Further, the Committee has authorized new starts in the space and appli-
cations area and is anxious that sound project management principles be applied
from the beginning of these new programs.’’

The  1981  study  was  the  first  multi-project  study  of  program/project  management
by NASA and also the first study of the topic by an agency-wide NASA team. Lang-
ley  Research  Center  Director  Donald  P.  Hearth  led  a  team  that  studied  thirteen
robotic  projects,  including  projects  such  as  Viking  and  Voyager,  undertaken  over  a
twenty-two-year period.

The study found significant problems, including inadequate project definition and
over-optimism  during  advocacy.  Several  recommendations  were  made,  such  as  re-
quiring a formal definition review prior to the NASA decision to include the project
in its budget request. A more detailed list of conclusions and summary recommenda-
tions made in the Hearth Study are included in Appendix A. More importantly, the
study said that its conclusions and recommendations should be viewed with the fol-
lowing comments in mind:

‘‘During recent years, several projects have experienced major cost increases with-
out apparent forewarning. This has damaged NASA’s credibility and reputation
for successful project management. Actions by NASA management are, therefore,
necessary;  particularly,  in  light  of  NASA’s  external  environment  and  the  pres-
sures on government budgets.
The  Study  Team  verified,  from  its  examination  of  a  group  of  representative
projects that the cost performance of a project is closely related to the application
of sound project management principles and/or the use of available management
tools. Therefore, the Study Team’s Conclusions and Recommendations are not in-
tended to suggest the superposition of either an additional hierarchy of manage-
ment, or the addition of new management tools within the current NASA system.
Rather  they  stress  the  need  for  continuing  application  of  the  basic  principles  of
sound  project  management  by  NASA,  refinement  of  existing  management  tools,
and  the  continuing  verification,  by  NASA’s  top  management,  that  the  principles
are being followed and available tools are being used.’’

In  ensuing  years,  NASA  cost  growth  and  schedule  issues  were  conducted  in  its
robotic  and  human  space  flight  mission  areas,  including  the  International  Space
Station. More recently, the issues of cost growth and schedule delays in NASA pro-
grams have been addressed in legislation and analyzed in studies by GAO, the Na-
tional Research Council (NRC), and NASA itself.

NASA Authorization Act of 2005

Cost  growth  and  schedule  delay  were  addressed  in  the  NASA  Authorization  Act
of  2005  (P.L.  109–155).  Provisions  were  enacted  to  help  NASA  and  Congress  spot
potential  cost  growth  and  schedule  problems  early  in  the  development  phase  of  a
major  program.  Rather  than  discouraging  risk  taking,  these  provisions  were  in-
tended  to  encourage  NASA  managers  to  identify  risks  as  early  as  possible,  when
they are more readily managed and solutions are more easily implemented.

• Under the 2005 Act, a Baseline Report is required whenever a major program
completes  required  reviews  and  is  approved  to  proceed  to  implementation.
NASA’s policy defines a project life cycle in two phases—the formulation and
implementation  phases.  During  the  formulation  phase,  projects  develop  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

define requirements and lead up to a preliminary design review. Projects also
complete  development  of  mission-critical  or  enabling  technology  with  associ-
ated  demonstrations.  The  implementation  phase  begins  after  project  con-
firmation.
After  completing  the  Baseline  Report,  the  Act  requires  NASA  to  report  peri-
odically on a major program through an Annual Report, which is provided as
part  of  the  annual  agency  budget  submittal  to  the  Congress,  until  the  pro-
gram  enters  operation.  The  provision  defines  a  major  program  as  an  activity
with  a  life  cycle  cost  estimate  greater  than  $100  million.  Having  established
the  baseline,  the  2005  legislation  sets  thresholds  that,  if  exceeded,  require
agency  action.  Notification  to  Congress  and  an  internal  evaluation  are  re-
quired  in  the  event  that  any  major  program  exceeds  its  originally  estimated
development  cost  by  more  than  15  percent  or  exceeds  its  originally  planned
schedule  by  more  than  six  months.  The  Act  also  requires  Congress  to  evalu-
ate  whether  to  continue  the  major  program  in  the  event  that  it  exceeds  its
originally  estimated  development  cost  by  more  than  30  percent  or  $1  billion.
• The  NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2000  was  amended  to  better  reflect  current
mission  cost  categories  by  increasing  the  cost  threshold  that  could  trigger  an
independent  cost  analysis  from  $150,000,000  to  $250,000,000  and  by  requir-
ing  the  Administrator,  rather  than  the  chief  financial  officer,  to  conduct  the
independent cost analysis.

NASA Authorization Act of 2008

Concerns regarding the increasing number of Earth science missions that were ex-
ceeding the 15 percent threshold established in the NASA Authorization Act of 2005
prompted a requirement in the NASA Authorization Act of 2008 for an independent
review  of  the  situation.  Specifically,  the  Act  directs  the  NASA  Administrator  to  ar-
range for an independent external assessment to identify the primary causes of cost
growth  in  large,  medium,  and  small  space  and  Earth  science  spacecraft  mission
classes.  The  external  assessment  is  to  also  identify  recommendations  and  provide
a  report  within  15  months  of  the  enactment  of  the  Act.  The  National  Research
Council has been tasked by NASA to perform this review.

In  addition,  the  Glory  program  was  reauthorized  in  the  NASA  Authorization  Act
of  2008,  responding  to  the  requirement  in  the  2005  NASA  Authorization  Act  that
Congress evaluate whether to continue a major program in the event that it exceeds
its originally estimated development cost by more than 30 percent.

GAO Reports

GAO  has  issued  a  number  of  reports  dealing  with  cost  and  schedule  problems  in

NASA’s programs and with NASA’s acquisition process:

• In  its  report  of  May  2004  on  what  it  described  as  NASA’s  lack  of  disciplined
cost-estimating  processes  [GAO–04–642],  GAO  stated  that  the  considerable
flux  it  found  in  NASA’s  program  cost  estimates—both  increases  and  de-
creases—was  an  indication  that  NASA  lacked  a  clear  understanding  of  how
much  its  programs  will  cost  and  how  long  they  will  take  to  achieve  their  ob-
jectives.  GAO  found  that  the  development  cost  estimates  for  more  than  half
of  the  27  programs  it  reviewed  had  increased,  and  that  for  some  programs,
this increase was significant—as much as 94 percent. GAO also reported that
NASA’s basic cost-estimating processes—an important tool for managing pro-
grams—lacked  the  discipline  needed  to  ensure  that  program  estimates  were
reasonable. GAO recommended that NASA take a number of actions to better
ensure  that  the  Agency’s  initiatives  result  in  sound  cost-estimating  practices
and  are  integrated  into  the  project  approval  process.  NASA  concurred  with
GAO’s recommendations.

• In March 2005, GAO reported [GAO–06–634] that the James Webb Space Tel-
escope (JWST) program increased its life cycle cost estimate from $3.5 billion
to  $4.5  billion  and  extended  its  schedule  by  almost  two  years.  More  than  a
third  of  the  cost  increase  was  caused  by  requirement  additions  and  other
changes.  An  increase  in  the  program’s  contingency  funding  [‘‘reserves’’]  ac-
counted  for  the  remainder—about  12  percent—of  the  growth.  About  half  of
the  cost  growth  was  due  to  schedule  slippage.  A  delay  by  the  Administration
in  approving  the  use  of  a  European  Space  Agency-supplied  Ariane  5  launch
vehicle  resulted  in  a  one-year  delay;  an  additional  10-month  slip  was  caused
by NASA’s budget profile limitations in fiscal years 2006 and 2007.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

GAO reported that although the JWST program revised its acquisition strat-
egy to conform to NASA’s acquisition policies, the program still faced consid-
erable  challenges  because  it  has  not  fully  implemented  a  ‘‘knowledge-based’’
approach to its acquisition. For example, GAO noted that when program offi-
cials  initiated  work  and  before  the  JWST  program  revised  its  acquisition
strategy, these officials had intended to have NASA commit to program start
with  immature  technologies  and  without  a  preliminary  design.  Despite  the
program’s  change  in  acquisition  strategy  to  address  GAO’s  concerns,  GAO
concluded  that  the  revised  plan  still  might  not  permit  the  maturity  of  key
technologies  to  be  adequately  tested  prior  to  program  start.  Consequently,
GAO  recommended  that  the  NASA  Administrator  direct  the  JWST  program
to (1) fully apply a knowledge-based acquisition approach to ensure that ade-
quate knowledge is attained at key decision points and (2) continue to adhere
to  NASA  acquisition  policy  and  go  forward  only  after  demonstrating  that  it
is  meeting  incremental  knowledge  markers  and  has  sufficient  funds  to  exe-
cute the program. NASA concurred with GAO’s recommendations.

• Following  a  review  requested  by  this  Committee’s  then-Ranking  Member,
Rep. Bart Gordon, GAO reported in December 2005 [GAO–06–218] that while
NASA’s  revised  policy  for  developing  flight  systems  and  ground  support
projects incorporated some of the best practices used by successful developers,
it  lacked  certain  key  criteria  and  major  decision  reviews  that  support  a
knowledge-based acquisition framework. For example, NASA’s policy requires
projects  to  conduct  a  major  decision  review  before  moving  from  formulation
to implementation and that prior to moving from formulation to implementa-
tion,  projects  must  validate  requirements  and  develop  realistic  cost  and
schedule  estimates.  However,  as  GAO  found,  NASA’s  policies  did  not  require
projects to demonstrate technologies at high levels of maturity before program
start. By not establishing a minimum threshold for technology maturity, GAO
said  that  NASA  increased  the  risk  that  design  changes  would  be  required
later  in  development,  when  such  changes  are  typically  more  costly  to  make.
GAO made several recommendations to help ensure NASA uses a knowledge-
based  acquisition  approach  in  making  informed  investment  decisions.  NASA
concurred with GAO’s recommendations.
In releasing GAO’s report, Rep. Gordon said:

‘‘As  NASA  embarks  on  an  initiative  to  return  American  astronauts  to  the
Moon—an endeavor estimated to cost more than $100 billion over the next
13  years—we  need  to  have  confidence  that  the  Agency  will  be  good  stew-
ards  of  taxpayer  dollars.’’  He  added  ‘‘In  its  report  out  today,  the  GAO  of-
fers  some  common  sense  recommendations  aimed  at  reducing  the  chances
that  NASA’s  projects  will  suffer  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays.  I  hope
NASA will take the GAO’s guidance seriously.’’

• This week, GAO released its report [GAO–09–306] assessing the status of 18
large-scale  projects  at  NASA.  GAO’s  independent  assessment  was  conducted
in  response  to  the  explanatory  statement  of  the  House  Committee  on  Appro-
priations  accompanying  the  Consolidated  Appropriations  Act  of  2008;  the
Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  was  a  co-requester  of  the  assessment.
Ms.  Cristina  Chaplain,  a  witness  at  this  hearing,  directed  GAO’s  work  and
will  highlight  the  report’s  findings  to  the  Subcommittee.  GAO  compared
projects  against  best  practice  criteria  for  system  development  including  at-
tainment  of  knowledge  on  technologies  and  design.  The  office  found  that  10
out  of  13  projects  that  had  entered  the  implementation  phase  of  the  project
life  cycle  experienced  significant  cost  and/or  schedule  growth.  For  those
projects,  GAO  found  that  development  costs  increased  by  an  average  of  13
percent  from  baseline  cost  estimates  that  were  established  just  two  or  three
years ago; average launch delay was 11 months.
As  an  illustration,  the  development  cost  of  the  Mars  Science  Laboratory
(MSL)  increased  in  the  past  year  by  over  $200  million—more  than  a  26  per-
cent  increase  and  now  stands  at  over  $1.2  billion.  GAO  anticipates  that  the
MSL’s development cost will be even greater due to the launch being delayed
from  October  2009  to  2011,  a  25-month  delay.  Initially  scheduled  for  Sep-
tember 2009, the next window of opportunity for a Mars launch occurs in the
October/November  2011  timeframe.  NASA  notified  the  Committee  of  that
delay  in  December  2008,  with  the  Agency  stating  that  a  2009  launch  would
be  too  risky  because  of  technical  uncertainties.  Regarding  the  challenges
faced  by  MSL,  GAO  reported  that  the  program  relied  on  several  heritage
technologies that had to be re-designed, re-engineered, or replaced. For exam-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

ple,  the  heat  shield  made  of  a  light-weight  material  had  flown  on  previous
missions  and  was  considered  nearly  ready.  But  a  setback  in  testing  forced
NASA  to  select  a  new  and  less  mature  technology.  Also,  the  initial  decision
to  use  dry  lubricated  lightweight  titanium  gears  for  rover  actuators  had  to
be  revisited  when  NASA  found,  during  fabrication,  that  the  gears  would  not
meet its durability needs. As a result, the project has had to revert to heavier
stainless steel gears with a wet lubricant used by prior projects. To keep the
lubricant  from  freezing  in  Martian  temperatures,  the  project  also  had  to  add
heaters. GAO said this increased the mass of the MSL’s rover.
The  underestimation  of  complexity  resulting  from  the  planned  use  of  new  or
heritage  technology  is  not  unique  to  the  MSL  mission.  GAO  said  that  many
of the projects reviewed indicated that they had experienced challenges in de-
veloping new technologies or retrofitting older technologies as well as in man-
aging  their  contractors.  From  a  general  standpoint,  NASA  projects  faced  dif-
ficulty  understanding  the  risks  and  challenges  they  were  up  against  when
they started their efforts. Challenges GAO identified included technology ma-
turity, design stability, complexity of heritage technology, contractor perform-
ance,  and  performance  by  a  development  partner  such  as  an  international
space  agency.  GAO  did  not  make  recommendations  in  this  report  as  it  ac-
knowledged that NASA was undertaking an array of initiatives aimed at im-
proving  program  management,  cost  estimating,  and  contractor  oversight.
However,  GAO  said  that  NASA  would  benefit  from  a  more  disciplined  ap-
proach to its acquisitions and called for continued attention to NASA’s efforts
to  enable  the  Agency  to  maximize  the  effectiveness  of  its  acquisition  invest-
ments.

NRC’s Review of NASA’s Beyond Einstein Program

NRC released a report in September 2007 entitled ‘‘NASA’s Beyond Einstein Pro-
gram: An Architecture for Implementation.’’ Prompted by Congress and the Office of
Science and Technology Policy, NASA and the Department of Energy asked the com-
mittee  to  assess  the  five  proposed  mission  concepts  for  achieving  the  goals  of  the
Beyond  Einstein  space-based  physics  research  initiative,  and  recommend  one  for
first development and launch.

As  part  of  its  charge,  the  committee  was  tasked  with  determining  the  realism  of
preliminary technology and management plans, and cost estimates of the candidate
Beyond Einstein mission set. Five mission areas—Joint Dark Energy Mission, Black
Hole Finder Probe, Inflation Probe, and Einstein Great Observatories—comprised 11
mission candidates. Criteria used by the committee included plans for the maturing
of  critical  mission  technology,  technical  performance  margins,  schedule  margins,
risk-mitigation  plans,  and  the  proposal’s  estimated  costs  versus  independent  prob-
able cost estimates prepared by the committee.

The  committee  worked  with  an  experienced  outside  contractor  to  develop  inde-
pendent  cost  estimates  and  a  probable  cost  range  for  each  candidate  mission.  The
probable  cost  ranges  were  also  compared  with  those  of  previous  missions  of  similar
scope  and  complexity.  In  all  cases,  the  committee  found  higher  costs  and  longer
schedules than those estimated by the mission teams. The committee observed that
this  is  typical  of  the  differences  between  the  estimates  developed  by  mission  teams
and by independent cost estimators at this early stage of a program. Given the long
history of missions comparable to the Beyond Einstein mission candidates, the com-
mittee said that it believed that the most realistic cost range for each of these mis-
sions  is  significantly  more  than  the  current  estimates  provided  by  the  research
teams.

In discussing its assessment of mission readiness, the committee stressed the im-
portance  of  technology  readiness  as  a  key  consideration  in  the  decision  to  proceed
to  mission  development.  The  committee  said  that  ideally,  mission  development
should  not  commence  until  all  new  technologies  necessary  for  mission  success  have
reached  a  certain  level  of  technology  readiness.  Experience  has  shown,  the  com-
mittee  added,  ‘‘that  NASA  and  other  missions  pay  the  price  when  a  mission  enters
development prematurely.’’

NASA Self-Examinations

NASA  research  on  incidents  of  cost  and  schedule  growth  and  their  causes  is  con-
ducted by a number of organizations and individuals. Typically, according to NASA,
this  research  is  intended  to  assist  the  organization  in  evaluating  performance
trends;  evaluate  the  effectiveness  of  their  own  organizational  processes,  tools  and
methods;  and  develop  proposals  for  changes  to  their  organization,  processes,  meth-
ods, and tools. NASA’s Office of Program Analysis and Evaluation (PA&E) performs

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

studies on an on-going basis and the topic of cost growth is frequently discussed at
NASA Project Management Workshops and Cost Community Events such as a Cost
Symposium. Because there is no clearinghouse for all cost estimating research being
undertaken  within  NASA,  the  full  extent  of  the  Agency’s  research  in  cost  growth
and schedule delay cannot be fully characterized. Nonetheless, the following four ex-
amples  are  illustrative  of  self  examinations  the  Agency  has  undertaken  in  recent
years.

• In  February  2004,  NASA  completed  an  analysis  comparing  initial  and  final
budget  estimates  of  development  costs  for  45  recent  projects  and  computed
percent budget growth as a surrogate for cost growth. The analysis found that
an  average  cost  growth  of  36  percent  and  a  median  growth  of  26  percent;  35
of  45  projects  exceeded  the  initial  budget  estimate.  The  relative  change  from
the total of the 45 initial budgets to the total of the 45 final budgets indicated
a total growth of 28 percent. In comparing historical budget growth trends in
the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  and  NASA  as  well  as  describing  the  cost-
estimating  process  changes  made  by  DOD,  NASA  analysts  suggested  that
NASA cost-estimating processes were in need of reform. But the analysts also
listed a number of changes already in progress that would have beneficial im-
pact, such as the then near-release of an update of NPR 7120.5 codifying the
requirement  for  an  Independent  Program  Assessment  Office  project  review
prior  to  the  two  key  project  milestones  and  requirements  for  a  Cost  Analysis
Requirements  Description  (CARD)  and  a  full  continuum  of  sound  cost-  and
program  management  practices;  updating  of  NASA’s  Cost  Estimating  Hand-
book;  and  development  of  training  tools  for  program  managers.  But  the  ana-
lysts also indicated that still needed was a method for capturing project cost,
technical,  and  schedule  data  recorded  in  a  standardized  format  and  collected
at a reasonable frequency.

• At  a  NASA  Cost  Symposium  in  July  2007,  analysts  from  the  Aerospace  Cor-
poration  and  NASA  conducted  a  presentation  entitled  ‘‘Using  Historical
NASA  Cost  and  Schedule  Growth  to  set  Future  Program  and  Project  Reserve
Guidelines.’’  Analysts  discussed  their  investigation  of  the  cost  and  schedule
growth  history  for  40  science  missions—the  ‘‘mission  set.’’  By  looking  at  his-
torical  schedule  and  cost  growth,  analysts  sought  to  determine  whether  the
past could be used to establish guidelines for the levels of reserves needed for
future missions.
Reserves are unallocated funds that are provided to counter risks to costs and
schedule that are unanticipated; they reduce the probability that actual costs
will  overrun  estimates.  In  essence,  they  act  as  contingency  funds  to  address
circumstances  or  outcomes  that  were  not  conceived  of  by  an  observer  at  a
given  point  in  time—what  is  commonly  known  in  project  planning  as  ‘‘un-
known unknowns.’’ In contrast, ‘‘known unknowns’’ refers to circumstances or
outcomes that are known to be possible, but for which it is unknown whether
or not those outcomes or circumstances will be realized.
Examination  of  the  historical  data  set  by  the  analysts  from  Aerospace  and
the  Science  Mission  Directorate  (SMD)  showed  that  the  majority  of  projects
had  experienced  cost  and  schedule  growth  and  that  this  cost  and  schedule
growth  was  substantial.  The  average  cost  and  schedule  growth  for  the  mis-
sion  set  was  27  percent  and  22  percent,  respectively.  Analysts  said  the  data
highlighted  that  the  primary  internal  reason  for  cost  and  schedule  growth
was instrument development issues, and the fundamental external reason for
the growth was launch vehicle delay.
Analysis  of  project  reserves  was  challenging  to  the  analysts.  This  is  because
reserve levels are not explicitly identified in NASA budget documents. Using
NASA  backup  budget  documents  and  other  sources,  analysts  were  able  to
identify  reserve  values  for  eighteen  of  the  forty  missions  were  obtained.  The
cost  reserve  levels  held  by  each  mission  varied  from  10  to  30  percent  while
the  average  reserve  was  on  the  order  of  18  percent.  Additionally,  although
specific  schedule  reserve  could  not  be  identified  from  the  budget,  a  general
industry  rule  of  thumb  that  was  prevalent  when  these  missions  were  devel-
oped was that a mission should carry one-month of schedule reserve for each
year  of  development.  This  equates  to  an  8.3  percent  schedule  reserve  for  the
project.
Suggestions  provided  by  analysts  from  Aerospace  and  SMD  included  doing
the following:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

Æ Requiring better technical and programmatic definitions at the beginning

of a project

Æ Independently assessing design and cost/schedule assumptions
Æ Performing earlier instrument development to reduce risk
Æ Holding instrument CDR prior to spacecraft and mission PDR
Æ Considering increased cost and schedule reserves for projects, some to be

held outside the project.

‘‘Best  Practices’’  for  the  control  of  cost  and  schedule  in  a  project  were  also
identified, including:

Æ Proper mission scoping
Æ Robust initial cost and schedule estimate
Æ Monthly estimates to complete
Æ Importance of managing to schedule
Æ Effective Use of Earned Value Management (EVM). Both the IMAGE and
Stardust  missions  used  EVM.  EVM  is  a  technique  that  compares  the
value  of  work  accomplished  during  a  given  period  with  the  work  sched-
uled for that period. By using the value of completed work as a basis for
estimating  cost  and  time  needed  to  complete  the  program,  earned  value
can  alert  program  managers  to  potential  problems  early  in  the  program.
As was stated for the IMAGE mission: ‘‘The Earned Value system worked
well as an early indicator of cost problems ahead.’’

Analysts  also  stated  that  the  real  problem  is  that  there  is  no  incentive  for
any  project  manager  to  underrun  cost  estimates.  They  said  that  in  today’s
culture, an underrun is considered evidence that the project manager did not
do  enough  testing  or  analysis  or  should  have  added  another  instrument  or
made  the  resolution  better.  A  secondary  problem  identified  by  the  analysts
was  that  project  managers  do  not  have  the  authority  to  control  costs,  such
as  not  being  able  to  remove  excess  personnel  without  Center  Director  ap-
proval. Until more control is given to the project manager and incentives are
put into place to return funding, analysts concluded that cost growth will still
occur.

• In  March  2008,  NASA’s  SMD,  assisted  by  the  Science  Applications  Inter-
national  Corporation  (SAIC)  presented  a  summary  overview  entitled  ‘‘SMD
Cost/Schedule Performance Study’’ before the NASA Advisory Council’s Plan-
etary  Science  Subcommittee.  The  objective  of  the  study  was  to  evaluate  the
cost/schedule performance record of selected SMD flight projects to determine
key  drivers  of  cost/schedule  performance,  and  implementation  approaches
that  enhance  performance  of  SMD  missions.  Project  Managers  and  other  key
staff  members  were  interviewed  to  collect  narrative  descriptions  to  compare
with  and  explain  the  detailed  historical  data.  Among  its  findings,  the  study
showed that:

Æ Cost history data for 21 of the 24 projects studied indicated cost growth.
Total cost growth from the start of the design phase to Estimate-to-Com-
plete (ETC) at Launch for all projects studied represented a combined im-
pact of $2.0 billion to SMD’s mission portfolio.

Æ Schedule  history  data  indicated  schedule  slips  for  19  of  the  24  projects

studied. The delays ranged from five to 42 months.

Æ Interview comments by eight projects cited early planning deficiencies as
a  significant  source  of  development  problems  (underestimates,  inexperi-
ence,  inadequate  early  technology  investment,  and/or  design  heritage
that was not realized).

Æ The four projects that reported using EVM as a management tool showed
lower average growth in development costs compared to projects that did
not use EVM.

Regarding  the  key  drivers  that  affected  cost/schedule  performance  for  SMD
projects,  internal  factors  identified  were  over-optimism  early  in  the  project’s
formulation  phase,  as  instrument  development  complexity.  Launch  service
issues  and  unstable  or  inadequate  initial  funding  profiles  were  cited  as  the
most common external factors affecting cost and schedule. Among the study’s
recommendations  to  mitigate  cost  growth  and  schedule  slips  was  one  that
SMD require more rigor in the process used to generate early cost and sched-
ule  estimates  and  establish  a  minimum  set  of  requirements  for  a  credible

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

basis  of  estimate  for  mission  concept  costing.  It  was  also  recommended  that
projects  be  encouraged  to  include  more  conservatism  in  base  estimates  early
in  the  process  and  be  required  to  carefully  evaluate  all  key  project  assump-
tions including design heritage credits.

• At  a  presentation  before  the  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  Symposium  in
June 2008, a member of the Aerospace Corporation discussed perspectives on
mission  cost  and  schedule  performance  trends,  building  on  his  team’s  review
of  40  NASA  robotic  science  missions.  The  team’s  findings  included  the  fol-
lowing:

Æ While estimates become more accurate as a project matures, the greatest

growth manifests itself late in the project during integration and test.

Æ Data  highlighted  that  the  primary  reason  for  cost  and  schedule  growth
is internal project technical and development issues often associated with
instruments.

Æ Initial  project  estimates  may  be  unreliable  due  to  design  and  technology

immaturity and inherent optimism.

Æ Better  technical  and  programmatic  appraisal  early  in  the  life  cycle  is
needed  along  with  independent  assessment  of  design  and  programmatic
assumptions.

In  addition,  the  team  analyzed  the  relationship  between  cost,  schedule  and
complexity.  A  complexity  index  was  established  for  the  projects  reviewed
based on performance, mass, power and technology choices. The team plotted
missions’  cost  versus  complexity  index  and  found  a  near  linear  rising  ‘‘band’’
where  successful  missions  cluster.  On  the  other  hand,  those  missions  failed
that  were  below  that  clustered  range.  This  led  the  team  to  characterize  this
area as the ‘‘no-fly zone.’’

GAO’s Characterization of NASA Acquisition Management as High-Risk

Since 1990, GAO has periodically reported on government operations that it iden-
tifies  as  ‘‘high-risk.’’  This  effort  has  brought  focus  to  problems  impeding  effective
government  and  costing  the  government  billions  of  dollars  each  year.  GAO’s  high-
risk  status  reports  are  provided  at  the  start  of  each  new  Congress.  Historically,
high-risk  areas  have  been  so  designated  because  of  traditional  vulnerabilities  re-
lated to their greater susceptibility to fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanagement. As
GAO’s  high-risk  program  has  evolved,  it  has  increasingly  used  the  high-risk  des-
ignation  to  draw  attention  to  areas  associated  with  broad-based  transformations
needed to achieve greater economy, efficiency, effectiveness, accountability, and sus-
tainability of selected key government programs and operations. In 1990, GAO des-
ignated NASA’s contract management as high-risk in view of persistent cost growth
and  schedule  slippage  in  the  majority  of  its  major  projects.  Since  that  time,  GAO’s
high-risk work has focused on identifying a number of causal factors, including anti-
quated  financial  management  systems,  poor  cost  estimating,  and  undefinitized  con-
tracts.

In the January 2009 update of its high-risk list [GAO–09–271], GAO reported that
since  the  2007  high-risk  update,  NASA  had  taken  significant  steps  to  improve  its
acquisition  management  with  the  implementation  of  new  policies  and  procedures
and  the  development  of  a  corrective  action  plan  to  address  weaknesses  in  areas
identified as high-risk by GAO. For example, NASA revised its acquisition and engi-
neering  polices  to  incorporate  elements  of  a  knowledge-based  approach  that  should
allow the Agency to make informed decisions. According to GAO, NASA is also insti-
tuting a new approach whereby senior leadership is reviewing acquisition strategies
earlier in the process and developed broad procurement tenets to guide the Agency’s
procurement  practices.  Among  procurement  policy  reforms,  GAO  noted  that  an
earned  value  management  procurement  policy  has  been  established  and  a  require-
ment  that  all  award  fee  contracts  undergo  a  cost-benefit  analysis  has  been  codified
to  improve  the  likelihood  that  NASA  is  using  its  resources  most  effectively.  GAO
noted NASA’s broad plan for reducing acquisition risk and observed that successful
implementation  of  both  the  plan  and  revised  policies  should  stem  cost  growth  and
schedule slippage.

However,  GAO  said  that  because  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  persist,  this
area—now titled ‘‘acquisition management’’ because of the scope of issues that need
to be resolved—remains high-risk. GAO added that to maximize NASA’s investment
dollars, implementation needs to be complemented by vigorous executive leadership
to  foster  the  expansion  of  a  business-oriented  culture  and  a  sustained  commitment
to  identify  and  take  action  on  projects  that  are  not  achieving  cost,  schedule  or  per-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

formance goals upon which they were based when they were initiated. Ms. Cristina
Chaplain,  who  directed  GAO’s  effort  looking  at  NASA,  is  a  witness  at  today’s  hear-
ing and will highlight her team’s findings.

Similarities Between NASA and DOD in Their Acquisition of Space Systems

GAO has reported that the costs for DOD space acquisitions over the past several
decades  have  consistently  been  underestimated—sometimes  by  billions  of  dollars.
For example, Space Based Infrared System High program costs were originally esti-
mated at $4 billion, but the program is now estimated to cost over $10 billion. Esti-
mated costs for the National Polar-orbiting Operational Satellite System program—
conducted  jointly  by  DOD,  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration
and NASA—have grown from almost $6 billion at program start to over $11 billion.
GAO  found  in  November  2006  [GAO–07–96]  that,  for  the  most  part,  cost  growth
in DOD space acquisitions has been caused by the tendency to start programs before
knowing  whether  requirements  can  be  achieved  within  available  resources—largely
because of pressures to secure funding. GAO reported that unrealistic program office
cost  estimates  exacerbated  space  acquisition  problems  and  that  with  budgets  origi-
nally  set  at  unrealistic  amounts,  DOD  has  had  to  resort  to  continually  shifting
funds  to  and  from  programs,  and  such  shifts  have  had  costly,  reverberating  effects.
GAO’s  analyses  of  six  ongoing  space  programs  shows  some  parallels  with  chal-
lenges faced by NASA. GAO found that original cost estimates were particularly un-
realistic regarding the potential for savings from increased contractor program man-
agement  responsibilities,  the  constancy  and  availability  of  the  industrial  base,  sav-
ings that could be accrued from heritage systems, the amount of weight growth that
would  occur  during  a  program,  the  availability  of  mature  technology,  the  stability
of funding, the stability of requirements, and the achievability of planned schedules.
Ms.  Cristina  Chaplain,  who  directed  GAO’s  effort  looking  at  DOD’s  space  acquisi-
tions, is a witness at today’s hearing and will highlight her team’s findings. In addi-
tion, Mr. Gary P. Pulliam, from the Aerospace Corporation, has been asked to com-
ment on whether there are any similarities in cost growth and schedule delays expe-
rienced by NASA and the Department of Defense/other federal agencies in their ac-
quisition of space systems, and whether there are any ‘‘lessons learned’’ that would
be applicable to these organizations.

Latest Actions by NASA to Address Cost Growth and Schedule Delay in Its Programs
In  addition  to  agreeing  to  the  recommendations  made  by  GAO,  NASA  has  imple-
mented  corrective  actions  on  its  own  to  address  the  issue  of  cost  and  schedule  per-
formance. For example, it has:

• Issued  the  2008  NASA  Cost  Estimating  Handbook  (CEH),  a  reorganized  and
updated version of the 2004 handbook. According to NASA, the handbook pro-
vides  useful  information  on  cost  estimating  for  the  entire  NASA  Cost  Esti-
mating  Community.  It  is  meant  to  be  both  informative  for  the  new  cost  esti-
mator and a good reference document for the experienced cost estimator. Ex-
planatory  material  accompanying  the  handbook  indicates  that  based  on  the
extensive feedback from the NASA Cost Estimating Community, the 2008 edi-
tion  of  the  handbook  has  been  streamlined  to  make  references  easy  to  find,
simplified  to  make  new  initiatives  easy  to  understand,  and  clarified  to  com-
municate  key  policy  messages  efficiently.  The  material  also  says  that  the
handbook’s  information  provides  NASA-relevant  perspectives  and  NASA-cen-
tric  data  useful  in  the  NASA  environment  and  facilitates  the  development  of
reliable, comprehensive, defensible, and well documented cost estimates.

• Instituted a policy of budgeting to the 70 percent confidence level. The policy,
which  is  applicable  to  space  flight  and  information  technology  programs  and
projects,  is  institutionalized  in  a  new  NASA  Policy  Directive  (NPD  1000.5),
effective January 15, 2009. Programs are to be budgeted at a confidence level
of  70  percent  or  the  level  approved  by  an  authority  of  the  Agency-level  man-
agement council. As an example, a 70 percent confidence level is the point on
the  joint  cost  and  schedule  probability  distribution  where  there  is  a  70  per-
cent probability that the project will be completed at, or lower than, the esti-
mated  cost  and  at  or  before  the  projected  completion  date.  In  the  case  of  the
Constellation program, the confidence level was set at 65 percent by then-Ad-
ministrator  Michael  Griffin  due  to  programmatic  conclusions  regarding  the
amount  of  technology  heritage  that  would  inform  the  Constellation  designs.
• Emphasized  educating  NASA  staff  on  the  need  for  probabilistic  cost  and

schedule estimating, how to do it, and providing enabling tools.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Boards.

• Implemented  independent  assessments  of  projects  through  Standing  Review
• Conducted  in  depth  interviews  with  past  NASA  Program  Managers  to  better
understand  root  causes  of  cost  growth  and  schedule  delay.  In  particular,
NASA  recognized  the  need  to  fully  understand  which  factors  contributed  the
most.
• Collected  ideas  to  improve  cost  and  schedule  estimates,  such  as  spending
more  on  R&D  to  mature  technology  readiness  levels,  developing  instruments
first, demanding better data to support claims at decision gates, and keeping
requirements stable.
• Established, under the Office of the Chief Engineer, the Academy of Program/
Project & Engineering Leadership (APPEL) which provides leadership, advice,
direction,  and  support  for  the  development  and  education  of  the  NASA  pro-
gram/project  management  and  engineering  community.  Among  its  numerous
functions,  the  Academy  facilitates  the  dissemination  of  ‘‘lessons  learned’’  and
‘‘best  practices’’  through  knowledge  sharing  activities,  including  conferences,
forums, publications, case studies, and communities of practice.

Risk Management and the Challenge of Containing Project Costs

Meeting  technical  and  safety  goals  while  also  meeting  programmatic  constraints
related to cost and schedule is a tremendous challenge. To that end, identifying and
managing risks can be of significant help, as they are closely related to cost manage-
ment  efforts—initially  in  the  planning  of  the  project  when  costs  are  estimated  and
later during development when cost fluctuations invariably occur. Since mission suc-
cess is the primary goal of any NASA activity, the Agency has recognized that effec-
tive risk management is critical to achieving that mission success. The implementa-
tion  of  a  thorough,  disciplined  risk  management  approach  is  now  required  of  all
NASA programs and projects.

Because of the pressure to contain costs, difficult decisions often need to be made
when  unplanned  increases  occur.  To  manage  cost  increases,  particularly  when  in-
creased  funding  is  not  provided,  NASA  projects  have  in  the  past  altered  (1)  the
scope of the project, including the elimination of scientific instruments, (2) manage-
ment  oversight  by  reducing  the  number  of  personnel  assigned  to  that  function,  and
(3) the testing sequence or reduced the testing requirements.

When  performed  without  sufficient  recognition  of  risks,  making  such  alterations
can lead to catastrophic results as was demonstrated by the ‘‘lessons learned’’ activ-
ity  following  the  failure  of  the  Mars  Climate  Orbiter  probe.  That  spacecraft,  devel-
oped  under  the  Faster,  Better,  Cheaper  (FBC)  mantra  advanced  by  NASA  in  the
1990s,  was  lost  as  it  was  landing  on  Mars  in  September  1999.  In  its  report  on
Project Management in NASA dated March 13, 2000, the Mars Climate Orbiter Mis-
hap Investigation Board stated that:

‘‘Greater attention needs to be paid to risk identification and management. Risk
management  should  be  employed  throughout  the  life  cycle  of  the  project,  much
the  way  cost,  schedule  and  content  are  managed.  Risk,  therefore,  becomes  the
‘‘fourth dimension’’ of project management—treated equally as important as cost
and schedule.’’

The  Board  also  said  that  it  saw  strong  evidence  that  the  systems  engineering

team and the systems processes were inadequate on the project, adding that:

‘‘Inadequate  independent  verification  and  validation  of  Mars  Climate  Orbiter
ground software (end-to-end testing to validate the small forces ground software
performance  and  its  applicability  to  the  software  interface  specification  did  not
appear to be accomplished).’’

With regards to reduced oversight, the Board noted:

‘‘To exacerbate this situation, the mission was understaffed, with virtually no Jet
Propulsion Laboratory oversight of Lockheed Martin Astronautics’ subsystem de-
velopments.  Thus,  as  the  mission  workforce  was  reduced  and  focus  shifted  from
spacecraft development to operations, several mission critical functions—such as
navigation  and  software  validation—received  insufficient  management  over-
sight.’’

The lesson learned, the Board said was that:

‘‘In  the  era  of  ‘‘Faster,  Better,  Cheaper,’’  projects  and  line  organizations  need  to
be  extremely  vigilant  to  ensure  that  a  Mission  Success  First  attitude  propa-
gates  through  all  levels  of  the  organization.  A  proper  balance  of  contractor  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

project  oversight  by  technical  divisions  at  NASA  field  centers  is  required  to  en-
sure  mission  success  and  to  develop  a  sense  of  ownership  of  the  project  by  the
institution.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

15

NASA PROJECT MANAGEMENT STUDY

(January 1981)

(Known as the ‘‘Hearth Study’’)

OBJECTIVES
• To assess project management in NASA
• To identify generic reasons which aggravate cost and schedule growth
• To recommend appropriate actions by NASA

SUMMARY CONCLUSIONS
• Significant contributors to cost growth of several NASA projects

Æ Technical complexity of projects
Æ Inadequate definition prior to commitment
Æ Effect of low contractor bids
Æ Poor tracking of contractor accomplishments

• Significant contributors to good cost performance of several NASA projects

Æ The function of the NASA project manager
Æ Adequate definition prior to commitment
Æ Proper planning and management of reserves
Æ Early understanding between NASA and implementing contractor
Æ Good implementation by NASA and contractor(s)

• Not significant factors in cost growth of several NASA projects
Æ Inability to make cost estimates when project well defined
Æ Non-utilization of classified technologies
Æ Excessive influence of ‘‘users’’

• Difficulty to quantify effect of high inflation has contributed to cost growth in re-

• Use and definition of reserves not consistent within NASA
• Ground  segments  have  experienced  cost  growth  and  are  not  well  defined  prior  to

• Management of some projects assigned to multiple NASA Centers without timely

cent years

implementation

interface definition

• Concurrent developments increase risk substantially
• Other concerns

Æ Industry’s workload, interest in NASA work, etc.
Æ Composition of NASA workforce.

ture projects.

SUMMARY OF RECOMMENDATIONS
• Continue  to  pursue  technically-advanced  projects.  Expect  cost  growth  in  some  fu-

• Require pre-project analysis and definition phases. Sufficient definition funding in
NASA  budget.  Formal  definition  reviews.  Require  approved  project  initiation
agreement and project plan.

• Select  contractors  primarily  on  technical  considerations,  management  plans,  past

performance, etc.

• Issue NASA Policy to have adequate visibility of contractor activity. Center Direc-
tors  responsible  for  policy  implementation.  Requires  strong  NASA  in-house  capa-
bility and adequate center resources.

• Fund  implementing  contractor  at  low  level  to  develop  thorough  understanding.

NASA project manager reconfirms or changes initial commitment.

• Provide completion costs of major projects in terms of budget-years dollars.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

• Issue NASA Policy to have adequate reserves in all major projects. Based on defi-
nition  maturity,  risk,  technical  complexity,  and  concurrent  developments.  Man-
aged by Headquarters program manager and project manager.
• General  practice,  minimize  NASA  management  interfaces.  When  teaming  of
NASA  Centers  is  appropriate,  define  interfaces  prior  to  project  implementation.
• Revise and re-issue NASA management Instructions defining project management

policies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Good  morning,  everyone.  I  am  very
pleased  to  welcome  all  of  you  to  the  first  hearing  on  the  Sub-
committee  for  Space  and  Aeronautics  of  the  111th  Congress.  I  am
very  much  looking  forward  to  working  with  the  Ranking  Member
Pete  Olson,  who  represents  a  district  that  has  JSC  in  it  and  my
colleagues  on  both  sides  of  the  aisle,  I  am  very  pleased  that  we
have  Members  that  make  up  many  of  the  NASA  facilities  and  a
real  passion  on  this  committee  or  this  subcommittee  for  space  and
aeronautics.

We  have  a  lot  to  do  this  year,  but  I  am  confident  that  we  will
have  a  productive  and  a  cordial  year  ahead  of  us.  I  think  that  all
Members  of  the  Subcommittee  would  agree  that  NASA  is  one  of
America’s  greatest  achievements,  and  as  we  look  forward  to  the
next  two  years  on  the  Subcommittee,  Congress  and  the  American
people  will  be  looking  to  NASA  to  help  solve  some  of  our  greatest
challenges:  development  of  Orion,  the  next  exploration  vehicle,  as
the  Shuttle  is  scheduled  to  retire  in  2010;  the  ability  to  forecast
and  understand  changes  in  climate  as  our  planet  continues  to
warm; other countries competing in space exploration for both mili-
tary,  also  technological  and  scientific  purposes;  and  the  continuing
decline  that  we  have  in  numbers  of  STEM  field  graduates.  The
United States is not graduating enough students inspired to pursue
career  areas  in  these  important  areas  of  science,  technology,  engi-
neering, and mathematics.

What  I  like  about  this  committee,  well,  I  guess  there  is  a  lot  I
like  about  this  committee,  but  one  is  this  quote  that  stands  above
us.  ‘‘Where  there  is  no  vision  the  people  will  perish.’’  So  I  think
about  NASA,  and  I  want  the  American  people  to  know  as  we  con-
tinue  to  look  for  all  of  you  that  vision,  that  you  have  inspired  us,
that  you  have  captured  our  imaginations,  and  you  have  trans-
formed our nation.

Our jobs as Members of Congress is to give you the tools and the
resources  you  need  to  do  your  jobs,  but  we  also  have  to  be  respon-
sible  as  good  stewards  of  the  American  taxpayers  for  the  dollars
that  are  allocated  to  your  agency.  And  this  is  a  responsibility  that
the Subcommittee Members take very seriously.

With  that  the  legislative  session,  the  hearing  today  is  going  to
be on cost management issues in NASA’s acquisition and programs.
I  want  everyone  to  know  that  this  subcommittee  hearing,  just  like
all  the  Committee  hearings,  will  be  cast  on  the  web,  but  I  believe
this  is  a  good  start  for  us,  because  it  is  appropriate  for  us  to  take
some  time  to  look  at  our  oversight  activities.  It  is  clear  that  good
cost  and  schedule  management  will  be  critical  to  the  success  of
NASA’s  planned  robotic  and  human  space  flight  activities.  It  is
good  common  sense  given  that  NASA  will  always  be  working  with
a constrained budget and competing priorities.

As has been summarized in numerous reports and studies, NASA
has  suffered  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  of  a  number  of
projects and programs in recent years. The stated causes of the cost
growth  and  delays  have  varied,  and  the  prescriptions  to  fix  the
problems  offered  by  individuals  inside  and  outside  the  Agency  are
also varied, and indeed, sometimes have been in conflict.

I  want  to  use  this  hearing  to  start  to  sort  out  the  facts  and  to
explore what can and should be done to reduce the instances of cost

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

and  scheduled  growth  that  we  see  at  NASA.  As  was  noted  in  the
charter  for  today’s  hearing,  cost  and  scheduled  growth  has  been  a
concern  at  NASA  since  the  early  1980s,  if  not  earlier.  Moreover,
from my vantage point on the House Armed Services Committee it
is  clear  that  our  military  space  programs  suffer  from  similar  prob-
lems.

However,  it  is  also  clear  that  NASA,  DOD,  and  the  other  agen-
cies  of  the  Federal  Government  involved  in  space  activities  have
many  dedicated  and  competent  scientists  and  engineers  working
long  hours  to  try  to  deliver  complex  and  successful  projects.  That
tells  me  that  dealing  with  these  costs  and  schedule  issues  is  hard,
and  that  there  is  no  simple  fix  or  situation.  If  that  was  the  case,
certainly we would have resolved this a long time ago.

So  we  need  to  figure  out  why  preventing  cost  and  schedule
growth  in  our  space  project  is  so  hard,  but  more  importantly  what
we  can  do  about  it  to  be  on  a  better  path  for  the  future.  I  suspect
that getting on that better path will involve the need for improved
practices  within  NASA  in  the  Agency’s  oversight  of  its  contractors
and in its collaborations with our international partners, as well as
better  efforts  by  us,  those  of  us  in  Congress,  and  the  White  House
to reduce the vagaries of the budgeting process that introduce addi-
tional instability in NASA programming planning.

It  may  not  be  possible  to  achieve  perfection,  but  we  certainly
need  to  do  our  best  to  ensure  that  NASA  is  making  the  best  use
of  its  funds  it  has  been  given.  We  owe  that  to  the  American  tax-
payers as well as to those who are working so hard to advance this
nation’s agenda in space and aeronautics research.

Today’s  hearing  should  be  viewed  as  simply  a  first  step  in  this
subcommittee’s  oversight  of  NASA’s  acquisition  and  program  man-
agement. I am very pleased that we have an incredibly knowledge-
able  panel  of  witnesses  here  before  us  today.  I  want  to  welcome
each of you, and I look forward to hearing your testimony.

With  that  I  now  yield  to  Mr.  Olson  for  any  opening  statement

that he would care to make.

[The prepared statement of Chairwoman Giffords follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRWOMAN GABRIELLE GIFFORDS

Good  morning.  I’m  pleased  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  the  first  hearing  of  the

Subcommittee on Space and Aeronautics in the 111th Congress.

I’m  very  much  looking  forward  to  working  with  Ranking  Member  Olson  and  my
colleagues on both sides of the aisle this year to tackle the important space and aer-
onautics issues facing the Nation.

We have a lot to do, but I am confident that we will have a productive—and colle-

gial—year ahead of us.

I  think  all  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  will  agree  with  me  that  NASA  is  one

of America’s greatest achievements.

As we look to the next two years, Congress and the American people will be look-
ing  to  NASA  to  help  solve  some  of  our  greatest  challenges:  the  development  of  our
next  exploration  vehicle  as  the  Shuttle  is  scheduled  to  retire  in  2010;  the  ability  to
forecast and understand changes in climate as our planet continues to warm; other
countries  competing  in  space  exploration  for  both  military,  technological  and  sci-
entific purposes; the continuing decline in numbers of STEM field graduates as are
not  graduating  enough  students  inspired  to  pursue  a  career  in  these  important
areas.

This  quote  that  appears  above  us  —where there is no vision the people per-

So  as  we  look  to  the  next  two  years,  I  want  the  American  people  to  continue  to
look to NASA for that vision, and our job as Members of Congress is to ensure that

ish.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

NASA  has  the  resources  and  tools  you  need  to  carry  out  the  vision  including  the
many tasks that we have given you.

With that, however, goes the responsibility of ensuring that NASA is being a good

steward of the resources provided to you by our constituents.

I  take  that  responsibility  seriously,  as  I  know  my  colleagues  do,  and  that  is  why
we  are  kicking  off  this  legislative  session  with  today’s  hearing—a  hearing  that  is
also  being  webcast,  as  are  all  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee  hearings.
The topic of today’s hearing—Cost Management Issues in NASA’s Acquisitions and
Programs—is an appropriate one with which to begin the Subcommittee’s oversight
activities.

It is clear that good cost and schedule management will be critical to the success

of NASA’s planned robotic and human space flight activities.

That  is  only  good  common  sense,  given  that  NASA  will  always  be  working  with

constrained budgets and competing priorities.

As  has  been  summarized  in  numerous  reports  and  studies,  NASA  has  suffered
cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  in  a  number  of  projects  and  programs  in  recent
years.

The stated causes of the cost growth and delays have varied, and the prescriptions
to fix the problems offered by individuals inside and outside of the Agency have also
varied—and indeed sometimes have been in conflict.

I  want  to  use  this  hearing  to  start  to  sort  out  the  facts  and  to  explore  what  can
and should be done to reduce the instances of cost and schedule growth that we see
at NASA.

As  was  noted  in  the  charter  for  today’s  hearing,  cost  and  schedule  growth  has

been a concern at NASA since the early 1980s, if not earlier.

Moreover,  from  my  vantage  point  on  the  House  Armed  Services  Committee,  it  is

clear that our military space programs suffer from similar problems.

However, it is also clear that NASA, DOD, and the other agencies of the Federal
Government  involved  in  space  activities  have  many  dedicated  and  competent  sci-
entists and engineers working long hours to try to deliver successful projects.

That  tells  me  that  dealing  with  these  cost  and  schedule  issues  is  hard,  and  that

there’s no simple fix or the situation would have been resolved long ago.

We  need  to  find  out  why  preventing  cost  and  schedule  growth  in  our  space
projects  is  so  hard,  and  more  importantly,  what  we  can  do  to  put  us  on  a  better
path for the future.

I suspect that getting on that better path will involve the need for improved prac-
tices within NASA, in the Agency’s oversight of its contractors, and in its collabora-
tions  with  its  international  partners—as  well  as  better  efforts  by  Congress  and  the
White  House  to  reduce  the  vagaries  of  the  budgeting  process  that  introduce  addi-
tional instability in NASA’s program planning.

It may not be possible to achieve perfection, but we certainly need to do our best

to ensure that NASA is making the best use of the funds that it is given.

We  owe  that  to  the  American  taxpayers,  as  well  as  to  those  who  are  working  so

hard to advance the Nation’s agenda in space and aeronautics research.

Today’s  hearing  should  be  viewed  as  simply  a  first  step  in  this  subcommittee’s

oversight of NASA’s acquisition and program management.

I  am  very  pleased  that  we  have  a  very  knowledgeable  panel  of  witnesses  here

today to help us in that work.

I want to welcome each of you, and I look forward to your testimony.
With that, I will now yield to Mr. Olson for any opening statement that he would

care to make.

Mr.  OLSON.  Madam  Chairwoman,  thank  you  for  convening  this
hearing today. The subject matter we are going to discuss is always
of  great  concern  but  particularly  now  in  the  current  budget  envi-
ronment. I, too, want to welcome and thank our witnesses for tak-
ing the time to brief us on the GAO report, assessments of selected
large-scale projects at NASA.

Since  this  is  our  first  Subcommittee  hearing  of  the  111th  Con-
gress, I would like to offer my gratitude to Chair Gordon and Rank-
ing  Member  Hall  for  this  opportunity  to  serve.  I  would  especially
like  to  say  that  I  am  extremely  pleased  to  be  working  with  our
Chairwoman Gabrielle Giffords. In every conversation we have had
she has been more than gracious in the welcoming of my thoughts
and  perspectives.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  that.  And  as  further  en-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

couragement  it  turns  out  our  thoughts  and  our  perspectives  are
often the same. Our goals are similar, and our respect for the men
and  women  of  our  nation’s  space  and  aeronautics  agencies  and  in-
dustries are beyond measure.

Our nation faces enormous challenges. In their own way the sec-
tors  we  will  be  dealing  with  can  help  by  offering  ways  to  meet
those challenges, whether by creating jobs, performing cutting-edge
scientific  research,  or  serving  as  the  inspiration  to  a  new  genera-
tion  of  explorers.  We  must  work  to  serve—our  work  must  serve  as
a  means  to  help  those  who  are  doing  the  work  to  fulfill  their  mis-
sions in the most effective way possible.

And  along  those  lines  today’s  hearing  on  cost  effectiveness  in
particular  is  a  very  critical  one.  Right  now  NASA  has  as  much
room  for  error  in  their  budgeting  as  they  do  for  one  of  their
manned  space  missions.  That  much.  The  Agency  needs  to  have  a
well-balanced, well-managed, and cost-efficient system of budgeting
and scheduling for their future missions.

I am glad to read that NASA, according to the GAO, has ‘‘devel-
oped  a  comprehensive  plan  to  address  systematic  acquisition  man-
agement  weaknesses.’’  I  look  forward  to  learning  how  this  was
done,  what  challenges  remain,  and  how  this  will  apply  to  future
missions. But the GAO also writes that NASA ‘‘would benefit from
a more-disciplined approach to its acquisitions.’’

There  are  many  Members  of  this—in  this  Congress,  myself  and
the  Chairwoman  chief  among  them,  who  stand  ready  and  willing
to  stand  up  for  increased  NASA  funding.  To  be  effective  in  doing
so we need to be able to show our colleagues and most importantly
the American people that their tax dollars are being invested wise-
ly.

Thank  you  again  for  being  here,  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing

your statements into our discussion. Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Olson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PETE OLSON

Madame  Chairwoman,  thank  you  for  convening  this  hearing  today.  The  subject
matter  we  are  going  to  discuss  is  always  of  great  concern,  but  particularly  now  in
this  current  budget  environment.  I  too  want  to  welcome  and  thank  our  witnesses
for  taking  the  time  to  brief  us  on  the  GAO  report  assessing  selected  large-scale
projects at NASA.

Since this is our first subcommittee hearing of the 111th Congress, I’d like to offer
my  gratitude  to  Chair  Gordon  and  Ranking  Member  Hall  for  this  opportunity  to
serve.  I  would  especially  like  to  say  that  I’m  extremely  pleased  to  be  working  with
Chairwoman  Gabrielle  Giffords.  In  every  conversation  we  have  had,  she  has  been
more  than  gracious  and  welcoming  of  my  thoughts  and  perspectives.  I  thank  you
for that. As a further encouragement, it turns out our thoughts and perspectives are
often  the  same.  Our  goals  are  similar,  and  our  respect  for  the  men  and  women  of
our nation’s space and aeronautics agencies and industries are beyond measure.

Our  nation  faces  enormous  challenges.  In  their  own  way,  the  sectors  we  will  be
dealing  with  can  help  by  offering  ways  to  meet  those  challenges.  Whether  by  cre-
ating jobs, performing cutting edge scientific research, or serving as the inspiration
to a new generation of explorers, our work must serve as a means to help those who
are doing the work to fulfill their missions in the most effective way possible.

And along those lines, today’s hearing on cost effectiveness in particular is a very
critical one. Right now, NASA has as much room for error in their budgeting as they
do  for  one  of  their  space  missions.  The  Agency  needs  to  have  a  well  balanced,  well
managed, and cost efficient system of budgeting and scheduling for their future mis-
sions.

I am glad to read that NASA, according to GAO, has ‘‘developed a comprehensive
plan  to  address  systemic  acquisition  management  weaknesses’’  and  I  looking  for-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

ward  to  learning  how  this  was  done,  what  challenges  remain,  and  how  this  will
apply  to  future  missions.  But  GAO  also  writes  that  NASA  ‘‘would  benefit  from  a
more disciplined approach to its acquisitions.’’

There  are  many  members  in  this  Congress,  myself  and  the  Chairwoman  chief
among them, who stand ready and willing to stand up for increased NASA funding.
To  be  effective  in  doing  so,  we  need  to  be  able  to  show  our  colleagues,  and  most
importantly  the  American  people,  that  their  tax  dollars  are  being  invested  wisely.
Thank  you  again  for  being  here  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing  your  statements

and to our discussion.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. Olson. If there are Mem-
bers who wish to submit additional opening statements, your state-
ments will be added to the record at this point.

At this time I would like to introduce our witnesses. First up we
have Mr. Christopher Scolese, who is currently the Acting Adminis-
trator  at  NASA.  I  would  note  that  we  will  be  having  hearings  on
NASA’s  fiscal  year  2010,  budget  request  in  the  near  future,  and
Members  will  have  plenty  of  opportunities  to  ask  questions  of  the
Agency on the budget request at those hearings. So I would like to
ask  Members  to  confine  their  questions  to  Acting  Administrator
Scolese today to the topic of this hearing.

We also have with us Ms. Cristina Chaplain, who is the Director
of  Acquisition  and  Sourcing  Management  at  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Office,  and  we  have  Mr.  Gary  Pulliam,  who  is  Vice
President  for  Civil  and  Commercial  Operations  at  the  Aerospace
Corporation. Welcome.

As  our  witnesses  should  know,  you  will  each  have  five  minutes
for your spoken testimony. Your written testimony will be included
in  the  record  for  the  hearing.  When  you  have  all  completed  your
spoken testimony, we will begin with questions. Each Member, my-
self included, will have five questions for the panelists, and I would
like to start with Mr. Scolese.

STATEMENT OF MR. CHRISTOPHER SCOLESE, ACTING ADMIN-
ISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  AERONAUTICS  AND  SPACE  ADMINIS-
TRATION (NASA)
Mr. SCOLESE. Thank you, Ms. Chairwoman, and Members of the
Subcommittee.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  today  to
discuss  NASA’s  efforts  to  improve  the  cost  and  schedule  of  the
Agency’s projects.

NASA  missions  have  allowed  us  to  rove  the  surface  of  Mars,
other planets, to send people to live and work in space, to improve
our  understanding  of  the  universe,  and  to  better  understand  our
Earth.  So  we  recognize  the  importance  of  delivering  missions  on
cost  and  on  schedule  and  developing  clear  and  stable  baselines  for
planning.

We continually strive to improve our tools so that we can develop
better  estimates  and  implement  corrective  actions,  and  we  are
pleased that the Government Accountability Office recognizes these
efforts.  Today  I  will  outline  the  progress  NASA  has  made  to  date.
NASA is fortunate to be entrusted with conducting revolutionary
missions in Earth and space science, aeronautics, and human space
flight.  These  missions  are  often  one  of  a  kind  and  require  new  ca-
pabilities  and  new  technologies  to  meet  mission  goals.  These  new
developments,  while  exciting  and  offering  benefits  to  society,  sel-
dom  have  clear  analogs  to  past  missions,  thus  presenting  chal-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

lenges for the development of cost and schedule estimates. As a re-
sult,  there  is  no  perfect  formula  for  estimating  cost,  so  we  must
rely on a combination of experience, cost models based on past mis-
sions, and actual costs when available.

We  recognize  two  types  of  growth  to  understand  our  projects.
First  is  internal  growth,  resulting  from  actions  by  the  project.  Ex-
amples  are  optimism  in  estimates  of  cost,  optimisms  in  estimates
of  schedule  or  technology  readiness,  under-estimation  of  mission
complexity,  or  the  over-estimation  of  the  utility  of  heritage  compo-
nents,  components  that  have  flown  before.  Growth  may  also  be
caused  by  poor  management.  We  don’t  see  this  very  often,  but  we
do see it.

The other type of growth result from external factors that are be-
yond the control of the project, and I mean, the project. Sometimes
they  are  beyond  the  control  of  NASA,  sometimes  they  are  beyond
the control of the government, but strictly speaking we are talking
about  the  project.  These  include  partner  performance,  industrial
base  issues,  launch  manifest  issues,  or  changes  in  planned  budget
or budget profile.

However,  not  all  external  factors  affecting  a  project  are  due  to
poor performance. A project can be impacted by the success of other
missions,  missions  that  last  well  beyond  expectation  in  terms  of
discovery and lifetime.

We  are  planning  to  conduct  further  study  to  improve  our  under-
standing of these factors and to allow us to better estimate project
life  cycle  costs.  The  existing  analysis  indicates  that  early  in  the
project  development  estimates  can  be  driven  by  the  optimism  I
mentioned  earlier.  Typically,  NASA  uses  these  early  estimates  for
planning purposes to identify the rough cost and schedule range for
the  proposed  mission.  It  is  important  to  note  that  we  do  not  con-
sider these early estimates as cost commitments.

As  a  project  advances,  we  develop  a  better  understanding  of  the
challenges,  risks,  technologies,  and  therefore,  costs  and  schedule.
We believe that we have the best estimate at a time when decisive
action can still be taken at the completion of a properly-funded pre-
liminary design. Thus, it is at this point that NASA makes our cost
and schedule commitment for the project to the Congress.

I  am  pleased  to  say  that  we  have  put  improvements  in  place  in
our  processes  and  tools  to  improve  our  cost  and  schedule  perform-
ance.  This  was  recognized  by  the  GAO  in  the  high-risk  series.  Im-
provements  include  standardization  of  project  life  cycle  milestones
and  reports  to  ensure  that  all  projects  are  measured  consistently
and  are  reporting  to  our  stakeholders  is  likewise  more  consistent.
Use  of  historical  cost  analysis,  where  possible,  to  identify  areas
that  need  to  be  addressed  with  corrective  actions.  Implementation
of  joint  cost  and  schedule  probabilistic  estimation  tools  to  better
provide  estimates  for  both  early  phase  planning  and  later  to  sup-
port our commitment when we make it.

Implementation  of  a  rigorous  monthly  review  process  to  provide
ongoing senior management review of program project and institu-
tional  performance  so  we  can  correct  problems  before  they  become
serious.  Use  of  independent  review  boards  to  evaluate  project  per-
formance  at  key  decision  points.  Formal  commitment  of  cost  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

schedule following the preliminary design review, and better use of
tools such as earned value management.

Also,  annual  assessments  of  proposed  new  missions  versus  the
approved  activities  that  are  already  in  place  to  determine  indus-
trial  base,  partner,  and  NASA  ability  to  accomplish  those  objec-
tives.

We recognize that cost and schedule estimation of a one-of-a-kind
mission  is  difficult.  Therefore,  multiple  techniques  are  required  to
improve  estimates  and  performance.  Let  me  assure  you  and  the
American  public  that  we  are  committed  to  this  improvement  and
to  working  with  the  GAO  and  Congress  to  provide  consistent
metrics on our performance. There are many improvements already
in place. Others are underway. From these we have developed and
will  continue  to  develop  improved  NASA  processes  yielding  results
now and in the years to come.

Thank you for the time to speak today, and I am ready for ques-

tions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Scolese follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER J. SCOLESE

Ms.  Chairwoman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  oppor-
tunity to appear today to discuss NASA’s progress in managing the cost and sched-
ule  of  the  Agency’s  projects.  NASA  missions  have  allowed  us  to  rove  the  surface  of
other  planets,  to  send  people  to  live  and  work  in  space,  to  improve  our  under-
standing of the Universe, and to better understand our Earth. NASA recognizes the
importance of delivering missions on cost and on schedule, and developing clear and
stable  baselines  for  planning.  We  strive  to  continually  improve  our  tools  to  identify
issues  so  we  can  implement  corrective  action.  Today,  my  testimony  will  outline
NASA’s progress to date and the actions the Agency is taking to continue to improve
its  performance.  We  are  pleased  that  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)
recognizes our efforts to mitigate acquisition management risk and lay a foundation
to improve project cost and schedule performance.

Federal Research and Development Environment

As  one  of  the  Federal  Government’s  research  and  development  (R&D)  organiza-
tions, NASA functions in an environment where we must accept and manage consid-
erable  risk  and  uncertainty.  NASA  develops  scientific  instruments,  spacecraft,  and
new launch systems that redefine state-of-the-art. The Agency strives to standardize
and  reuse  systems  and  capabilities  where  feasible.  However,  where  we  endeavor  to
achieve  the  next  goal,  develop  the  next  technology,  and  make  the  next  discovery,
we  venture  beyond  the  realm  of  past  experience  and  into  an  environment  of  uncer-
tainty and higher risk. This is just one of the facts of life in an aggressive and excit-
ing R&D environment.

Let  me  take  a  moment  to  share  some  examples  with  you,  partially  because  they
are  illuminating,  and  partially  because  they  show  why  people  really  love  working
at NASA.

The International Space Station (ISS), permanently crewed since November 2000,
is  being  built  by  over  a  dozen  nations.  The  ISS  already  has  the  American  Destiny
and  European  Columbus  science  laboratories  on  board  and,  with  the  flight  of  STS–
127 later this year, the Japanese Kibo laboratory will be complete. Upon its comple-
tion  next  year,  the  ISS  will  have  a  mass  of  over  900,000  pounds  and  be  a  world-
class  research  center  for  conducting  experiments  in  life  and  materials  sciences;  it
will  also  serve  as  a  training  ground  for  long-duration  human  space  missions.  The
ISS has repeatedly demonstrated the ability of nations to work together on complex
projects:  with  Station  components  being  designed  and  built  in  different  countries,
many  were  actually  assembled  for  the  first  time  in  orbit.  Now,  international  crews
are operating, repairing, and utilizing the ISS for the benefit of the world. This kind
of  cooperation  is  essential  if  we  are  to  continue  to  expand  our  reach  beyond  our
planet.  Research  results  have  already  improved  medical  science  here  on  Earth:  as
you  probably  know,  experiments  conducted  aboard  the  Space  Shuttle  and  the  ISS
have  been  useful  in  demonstrating  techniques  for  the  development  of  salmonella

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

vaccines.  The  ISS  Program  represents  unprecedented  international  cooperation  on
a peacetime task of immense technical complexity.

In  the  past  five  years,  NASA  has  landed  three  vehicles  on  the  surface  of  Mars—
each  without  human  intervention.  The  planning  and  on-board  capabilities  to  avoid
obstacles  make  these  landings  some  of  the  most  difficult  accomplishments  imag-
inable.  Think  of  shooting  a  basketball  from  Washington,  DC,  and  making  a  perfect
shot  through  a  basketball  hoop  located  at  in  Los  Angeles  without  hitting  the  rim,
while the rim is moving. The discoveries made by these rovers and their companion
orbiters have changed our view of Mars. We now know that, at one time, Mars was
indeed a wet planet, and our vehicles have found ice on its surface. More mysteries
remain to be unlocked. The Mars Science Laboratory (MSL) is the next in the series
of  missions  to  Mars.  MSL  is  significantly  more  complex  than  its  predecessors,  as  it
builds  upon  the  lessons  and  discoveries  they  made  to  address  the  next  level  of  sci-
entific  questions.  As  a  result,  the  MSL  vehicle  is  much  larger—about  the  size  of  a
Mini-Cooper—than  the  Mars  Rovers  Spirit  and  Opportunity—roughly  the  size  of  a
coffee table—so it requires a new type of landing system.

The  Nation  and  the  world  benefit  from  NASA’s  breakthrough  research  in  Earth
science  and  technology  on  a  daily  basis.  This  legacy  began  in  April  1960  when
NASA launched the world’s first environmental satellite. The focus then was to im-
prove  weather  forecasts.  Our  focus  now  is  much  more  challenging.  NASA  conducts
a  comprehensive  research  program  to  advance  fundamental  knowledge  on  the  most
important  scientific  questions  on  the  global  and  regional  integrated  Earth  system.
NASA presently operates 15 on-orbit Earth science missions, making measurements
ranging  from  precision  sea  level  through  atmospheric  chemistry  and  composition,
and winds through ocean color and land vegetation, as well as ice cover and surface
temperature.  NASA’s  robust  research  and  analysis  develops  outstanding  scientific
advances  that  improve  climate  projections  and  provide  societal  applications.  NASA
has six missions in formulation and development, and is pleased to have a first-ever
National  Research  Council  Decadal  Survey  for  Earth  science  and  applications  that
establishes  NASA’s  priorities  for  satellite  missions  to  study  changes  in  the  Earth’s
climate  and  environment.  Achieving  simultaneity  of  NASA’s  outstanding  measure-
ments  is  a  major  challenge  for  progress  in  understanding  the  changing  climate,  its
interaction with life, and how human activities affect the environment.

As  you  can  imagine,  the  NASA  and  Earth  science  communities  are  saddened  at
the  loss  of  a  key  Earth  science  asset  when  the  NASA  Orbiting  Carbon  Observatory
satellite  failed  to  reach  orbit  last  week  following  launch.  NASA  immediately  con-
vened  a  Mishap  Investigation  Board  to  determine  the  cause  of  the  launch  failure.
In addition, we are assessing options for its replacement. Although rare, these kinds
of events demonstrate the need for flexibility in NASA’s ongoing portfolio.

The  scientific  and  technical  results  across  NASA’s  portfolio  are  substantial,  and
often  extraordinary.  However,  as  we  push  the  performance  envelope  on  several
fronts,  NASA’s  specific  cost  and  schedule  performance  has,  indeed,  been  less  than
desired  in  the  past.  It  is  NASA’s  responsibility  to  maximize  the  value  of  the  Amer-
ican taxpayer’s dollars. We already have some tools in place, but we also have plans
to  incorporate  additional  tools  and  make  better  use  of  existing  tools  and  processes
to improve our delivery of missions on cost and on schedule.

Potential Causes of Cost Growth and Schedule Delay

NASA puts great effort into managing the environment of uncertainty that natu-
rally  surrounds  a  project.  Some  uncertainties  are  within  the  realm  of  the  project’s
control. Proposers can be overly optimistic in their efforts to provide the most attrac-
tive package in a competition. The cost savings assumed based on the use of ‘‘herit-
age technology’’ for spacecraft or instruments can be over estimated. New technology
development can ultimately be much more challenging than anticipated. Sometimes
inadequate  time  is  planned  for  early  engineering  efforts  and  refinement  of  require-
ments.  These  are  all  areas  within  project  accountability  and  the  majority  of  this
statement outlines the steps NASA has taken to address these issues.

I  would  like  to  digress  for  a  moment  to  add  a  bit  of  ‘‘ground  truth’’  on  cost  or
schedule  variances.  NASA  focuses  a  great  deal  of  effort  on  measuring  variations
from plans and responding to trend patterns reported in monthly Baseline Perform-
ance  Reviews,  and  in  program  and  project  reviews.  NASA’s  renewed  emphasis  on
the use of various tools such as Earned Value Management also help provide indica-
tions of problems early enough to take corrective action.

Reports  of  apparent  cost  growth  can  be  misleading.  If  one  measures  project  cost
or schedule from the very earliest conceptual phase, as compared to measuring cost
after  the  preliminary  design  is  complete,  the  project  typically  appears  to  have  in-
curred  significant  growth.  NASA  commits  to  project  cost  and  schedule  estimates  at
the completion of the preliminary design phase when technology readiness is better

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

understood, preliminary designs are complete, and partner arrangements and indus-
trial  base  considerations  are  better  understood.  This  information  provides  a  much
better basis for estimating cost and schedule. While useful and necessary for the ini-
tial  planning  phase  of  a  mission,  early  estimates  are,  at  best,  educated  guesses
made  with  preliminary  conceptual  information.  As  an  example,  although  there  re-
mains plenty of room for improvement in the case of MSL, one of these early concep-
tual  estimates  quoted  in  the  press  for  MSL  was  not  even  an  estimate  produced  by
NASA.

Other events can occur that are not within the control of the project, but are typi-
cally under the control, and within the accountability, of the overall program or the
Agency.  Owing  to  other  stresses  in  the  host  program,  funding  flexibility  to  address
problems may be inadequate, there may be inadequate validation of cost and sched-
ule  assumptions,  or  performance  on  one  project  may  negatively  affect  others.  This
last  point  needs  clarification.  Not  all  projects  that  adversely  impact  other  projects
are  poor  performers.  Sometimes  they  are  stellar  performers.  For  example,  because
on-orbit lifetime of a mission is difficult to predict from afar, projects already in op-
eration  that  extend  well  beyond  the  original  planned  operational  life  may  require
more  funding,  resulting  in  the  need  to  obtain  resources  from  other  sources,  often
projects in development. As an example, the Spirit and Opportunity Rovers on Mars
were  planned  for  approximately  three  months  of  operation,  but  are  now  past  five
years  of  operations  and  are  still  returning  valuable  data.  NASA  also  tries  to  esti-
mate these costs and control impacts by having a group of independent experts peri-
odically review these extraordinary missions to assess their value and the likelihood
that  they  will  operate  until  the  end  of  the  projected  budget  horizon.  However,  who
could have guessed that the Terra Earth Science mission—approaching its 10th an-
niversary—would  operate  over  twice  its  design  life,  or  that  the  Voyagers—at  over
30 years in space—would still be operational outside of our solar system?

Of  course,  some  events  occur  that  are  not  under  the  control  of  the  project  or  the
Agency,  although  we  take  measures  to  mitigate  the  attendant  risk.  In  the  case  of
the  Solar  Dynamics  Observatory,  national  launch  manifest  priorities—not  project
performance—resulted in delays of about a year, with the attendant cost growth. In
the  case  of  the  Glory  project—a  first-of-a-kind  Earth  science  mission—the  mission
experienced unexpected problems due to a loss of contractor expertise, which is illus-
trative of challenges in the aerospace industrial base. Simply put, the number of ca-
pable suppliers has substantially contracted and the demand is such that the skills
of  the  remaining  suppliers  are  difficult  to  maintain.  Contributions  from  our  inter-
national  partners  can  be  late.  Launch  vehicle  delays  or  price  increases  have  also
had significant impacts. External changes in budget profiles, including the unavoid-
able  impacts  of  Continuing  Resolutions,  can  also  occur.  Out  of  the  ten  NASA
projects in the GAO QuickLook Report that exceeded the Congressionally-mandated
cost  and  schedule  thresholds,  approximately  half  did  so  as  a  result  of  external  fac-
tors; some with limited solution options open to NASA.

In  an  effort  to  better  understand  the  extent  to  which  our  performance  has  been
impacted by events that are beyond the control of the project and program, we have
initiated  a  study  of  NASA  and  Department  of  Defense  projects  with  the  objective
of  being  able  to  quantitatively  separate  internal  and  external  growth.  This  will  en-
able  the  Agency  to  better  compare  the  results  of  a  project’s  detailed  cost  estimate
with  the  results  of  analytical  cost  estimates  based  upon  historical  performance.
NASA currently anticipates completing this study by the end of calendar year 2009.
We will keep the Congress informed of our progress in evaluating these factors.

Historical Cost and Schedule Studies

Over  time,  various  NASA  organizations  have  studied  cost  and  schedule  growth
after  the  fact.  Most  of  the  studies  were  focused  on  a  specific  question,  or  measured
cost or schedule from different points in a project’s life cycle. Additionally, the indi-
vidual research tasks utilized different data, methods, and approaches, and thus are
not directly comparable.

To  provide  a  proactive  means  to  control  costs,  NASA  has  implemented  monthly
reviews—using  common  data  set  requirements  and  consistent  data  and  analyses
that are centrally coordinated—to produce results that are comparable from project
to project and from year to year. It is this data that is now reported both internally
to  NASA  and  to  the  Administration  and  externally  to  the  Congress.  The  January
2009  update  to  the  GAO  High-Risk  Series  notes  a  number  of  these  changes  that
have improved NASA’s standard reporting.

Additionally, NASA is using the research on historical cost and schedule perform-
ance  to  identify  areas  that  need  to  be  addressed  with  corrections  to  tools  or  proc-
esses.  A  number  of  changes  have  been  initiated  that  address  common  issues  such
as optimism in cost estimates and schedules, inadequate identification of risks, and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

unrealistic  assumptions  on  technology  maturity,  along  with  external  issues  such  as
instability in funding, launch vehicle issues, and the performance of partners.

Steps Already Taken

The  Agency  has  undertaken  a  number  of  actions  to  address  cost  and  schedule
growth  through  modifications  to  NASA’s  project  lifecycle.  These  actions  are  also
noted  in  the  NASA  High-Risk  Corrective  Action  Plan,  which  the  Agency  developed
in  recognition  of  the  complexity  and  cross-functional  nature  of  the  issues  identified
in the GAO High-Risk Series. While NASA continues to address the issues outlined
in the GAO High-Risk series, we were pleased that the January 2009 update to the
series  highlighted  the  efforts  we  have  made  to  improve  NASA  acquisition  manage-
ment.

Some  actions  that  NASA  has  taken  relate  to  the  definition  of  a  project  life  cycle

that is now used by all space flight projects. Examples include:

• The  project  life  cycle  has  six  phases  that  each  space  flight  project  now  must
address. This is a change from the past, where different types of projects fol-
lowed  different  paths,  so  that  comparisons  were  more  difficult  to  make,  and
most importantly, progress across NASA was difficult to assess.
• To  ensure  that  we  have  an  unbiased  assessment  of  project  performance  and
plans, NASA has implemented the use of Standing Review Boards to evaluate
the project at each key decision point in the project’s life cycle. The Standing
Review Boards are composed of discipline experts who are independent of the
project  being  reviewed.  The  Boards  provide  the  Agency  with  independent  ad-
vice  on  project  design  implementation,  manufacturing  plans,  cost  and  sched-
ule planning, risks, and margins. This change helps address past performance
issues related to optimism, inadequate evaluation of technology maturity, her-
itage assumptions, etc.
• NASA  commits  to  the  project  content,  cost,  and  schedule  baseline  only  after
successful  completion  of  the  Key  Decision  Point  C  (KDP–C).  At  that  point  in
the  life  cycle,  following  the  completion  of  the  Preliminary  Design  Review,
project  management  has  a  more  thorough  understanding  of  the  technological
maturity,  complexity,  and  risk  associated  with  the  project.  As  a  number  of
risks  have  been  retired  by  that  point,  and  the  implications  of  the  project  re-
quirements  are  better  understood,  the  baseline  established  at  KDP–C  pro-
vides  a  more  meaningful  basis  for  measuring  cost  and  schedule  performance.
Several  NASA  research  efforts  confirm  that  the  Agency’s  cost  and  schedule
performance is better when measured from the KDP–C gate than when meas-
ured from the earlier milestones.

Recent Actions

In  January  2009,  NASA  adopted  a  new  acquisition  strategy  policy,  which  im-
proves its ability to manage performance risk (including the adoption of probabilistic
cost and schedule estimating methods). Among its features, the new policy requires
space  flight  and  information  technology  projects  and  programs  to  develop  joint  cost
and  schedule  probabilistic  estimates.  Probabilistic  estimating  provides  NASA  with
an  approach  that  fully  integrates  technical,  cost,  and  schedule  plans  and  risks  to
develop  both  an  understanding  of  the  sensitivity  of  parameters  to  each  other  and
the most likely estimate. Using this approach allows NASA to understand and docu-
ment  how  the  mitigation  of  technical  risks  would  enable  an  increase  in  the  project
confidence  level.  Conversely,  the  introduction  of  a  budget  reduction  would  have  the
effect of increasing technical and schedule risks and thus lower the confidence level
for the project. The use of probabilistic estimates also generates baseline values that
include funding to address impacts associated with contingencies and uncertainties,
such as industrial base, partner performance and technology optimism.

The introduction of probabilistic joint cost and schedule estimating puts NASA on
the leading edge of applying these techniques in both the federal and space sectors.
Because  this  estimating  approach  requires  the  employment  of  new  tools  and  tech-
niques,  full  implementation  will  take  some  time  to  deploy;  we  are  currently  esti-
mating  at  least  two  years  to  develop  the  tools,  training,  and  understanding  across
the Agency. Given the deployment and the typical project development cycle of three
to  five  years,  it  is  unlikely  that  NASA  will  be  able  to  evaluate  the  impact  of  these
changes  for  a  few  more  years.  The  recent  GAO  QuickLook  Report  underlines  the
fact  that  it  takes  time  to  realize  the  results  from  policy  and  process  changes.  Fur-
ther, as we implement this joint confidence level policy, we are looking back at exist-
ing projects in development to ascertain risks and make adjustments where prudent
to improve our cost and schedule posture.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

As  noted  earlier  in  this  testimony,  there  have  been  issues  with  the  consistency
of  historical  data  used  for  various  cost  research  studies.  In  another  recent  action,
NASA  has  taken  steps  to  improve  and  bring  consistency  to  the  cost  and  schedule
data  collection  that  is  now  included  in  the  Cost  Analysis  Data  Requirement  docu-
ments. This effort is also part of the NASA High Risk Corrective Action Plan. These
documents serve to collect data in a standard format to allow us to assess perform-
ance on current projects and to provide a reference for future activities. At this time,
NASA  has  completed  detailed  documentation  on  38  historical  projects  and  has  cap-
tured data from 90 KDPs on current projects.

NASA  is  committed  to  using  our  tools  and  processes  to  identify  issues  and  take
corrective  actions  to  address  those  issues.  The  steps  that  we  have  taken  to  stand-
ardize  our  project  life  cycle,  to  utilize  Standing  Review  Boards  to  provide  focused
assessments at Key Decision Points, the renewed emphasis on tools such as Earned
Value Management, the institution of strengthened acquisition planning and month-
ly  reviews,  and  the  use  of  joint  cost  and  schedule  confidence  levels  in  our  decision-
making,  have  all  moved  NASA  along  a  path  towards  improving  our  delivery  of
projects on time and within budget.

Conclusion

In  closing,  cost  and  schedule  estimation  and  performance  are  extremely  impor-
tant,  and  the  Agency  has  taken  a  number  of  steps  in  recent  years  that  have  been
acknowledged in the January 2009 update to the GAO High-Risk Series. We under-
stand and support transparency and accountability in NASA project cost and sched-
ule assessment.

NASA is dedicated to the continuous improvement of its acquisition management
processes  and  performance.  There  are  many  improvement  efforts  already  in  place,
and others are underway. From these, we have developed—and will continue to de-
velop—significantly improved NASA processes yielding results now and in the years
to come.

I  would  be  happy  to  respond  to  any  questions  you  or  the  other  Members  of  the

Subcommittee may have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHRISTOPHER J. SCOLESE

Since January 20, 2009, Mr. Christopher J. Scolese has been serving as the Acting
Administrator  of  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  As
the  Acting  Administrator,  Mr.  Scolese  is  responsible  for  leading  the  development,
design,  and  implementation  of  the  Nation’s  civil  space  program.  As  such,  Mr.
Scolese  provides  overall  leadership  for  NASA’s  multiple  field  installations,  works
closely  with  the  Executive  and  Legislative  branches  to  ensure  that  NASA  is  sup-
porting  appropriate  national  policy,  and  leads  an  international  collaboration  in  car-
rying out high-profile space missions including the Space Shuttle, the International
Space  Station,  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope,  and  a  multitude  of  other  scientific  and
technological efforts.

In addition, Mr. Scolese is still serving in the position of Associate Administrator,
NASA’s highest-ranking civil servant. As Associate Administrator, Mr. Scolese is re-
sponsible  for  the  oversight  and  integration  of  NASA’s  programmatic  and  technical
efforts to ensure the successful accomplishment of the Agency’s overall mission.

Previously, Mr. Scolese served as NASA’s Chief Engineer. As Chief Engineer, Mr.
Scolese  was  responsible  for  ensuring  that  development  efforts  and  mission  oper-
ations within the Agency were planned and conducted on a sound engineering basis,
as well as for the long-term health of the NASA engineering workforce.

Formerly, Mr. Scolese was the Deputy Director of the Goddard Space Flight Cen-
ter where he assisted the Director in overseeing all activities. He also served as the
Deputy  Associate  Administrator  in  the  Office  of  Space  Science  at  NASA  Head-
quarters.  In  this  position,  he  was  responsible  for  the  management,  direction  and
oversight  of  NASA’s  Space  Science  Flight  Program,  mission  studies,  technology  de-
velopment and overall contract management of the Jet Propulsion Laboratory.

Mr.  Scolese  also  served  as  the  Earth  Orbiting  Satellite  (EOS)  Program  Manager
and the Deputy Director of Flight Programs and Projects for Earth Science at God-
dard.  In  these  positions,  he  was  responsible  for  the  operation  and  development  of
all  Earth  Science  missions  assigned  to  Goddard.  While  there,  he  also  served  as  the
EOS  Terra  Project  Manager.  In  addition,  Mr.  Scolese  was  the  EOS  Systems  Man-
ager  responsible  for  the  EOS  system  architecture  and  the  integration  of  all  facets
of  the  project.  During  his  tenure  at  Goddard,  he  chaired  the  EOS  Blue  Team  that
re-scoped the EOS Program; he supported the EOS investigators in the development
of  the  EOS  payloads  in  the  restructured  EOS;  and  he  has  been  responsible  for  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

adoption  of  common  data  system  architecture  on  EOS  and  some  other  Earth  orbit-
ing spacecraft.

Prior to his 1987 appointment at Goddard, Mr. Scolese’s experience included work
in  industry  and  government.  While  a  senior  analyst  at  the  General  Research  Cor-
poration of McLean, Va., he participated in several SDIO programs. He was selected
by  Admiral  Hyman  Rickover  to  serve  at  Naval  Reactors  where  he  was  associated
with  the  development  of  instrumentation,  instrument  systems  and  multi-processor
systems for the U.S. Navy and the DOE while working for NAVSEA.

Mr.  Scolese  is  the  recipient  of  several  honors  including  the  Presidential  Rank
Award  of  Meritorious  Executive,  Goddard  Outstanding  Leadership,  two  NASA  Out-
standing  Leadership  Medals  and  the  American  Institute  of  Aeronautics  and  Astro-
nautics  (AIAA)  National  Capital  Section  Young  Engineer/Scientist  of  the  Year
award. He was recognized as one of the outstanding young men in America in 1986,
was  a  member  of  college  honor  societies  including  Eta  Kappa  Nu  and  Tau  Beta  Pi,
and  was  recipient  of  the  1973  Calspan  Aeronautics  award.  He  is  a  Fellow  of  the
AIAA and a member of the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers. He also
served  as  a  member  of  the  AIAA  Astrodynamics  Technical  Committee  and  chaired
the  National  Capitol  Section  Guidance  Navigation  and  Control  Technical  Com-
mittee.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. Scolese.
Ms. Chaplain, please.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  CRISTINA  T.  CHAPLAIN,  DIRECTOR,  AC-
QUISITION  AND  SOURCING  MANAGEMENT,  GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE (GAO)
Ms.  CHAPLAIN.  Madam  Chairwoman  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  discuss  our  work  on
NASA’s major acquisitions. In addition to my formal written state-
ment,  I  would  like  to  point  out  that  GAO  has  just  issued  its  first
annual comprehensive assessment of major NASA programs, which
is available on the GAO.gov website.

To  put  this  work  into  context  I  would  like  to  start  with  our  des-
ignation  of  NASA’s  contract  management  as  a  high-risk  area  in
1990. We put NASA on GAO’s high-risk list because our work was
continually  finding  there  was  little  emphasis  on  end  results,  per-
formance,  and  cost  control.  At  the  time  NASA  found  itself  pro-
curing expensive hardware that did not always work properly.

Numerous  reviews  following  that  report  identified  some  more
issues.  Fourteen  years  later  in  a  review  of  NASA’s  cost  estimating
practices,  we  concluded  that  acquisition  problems  still  existed  and
found  significant  cost  growth  across  a  portfolio  of  27  programs.  In
that  review  we  found  NASA  lacked  basic  cost-estimating  processes
needed  to  establish  priorities,  quantify  risks,  and  make  informed
investment decisions.

We also found that programs were being moved forward into the
development  phases  without  a  clear  understanding  of  whether
their  requirements  could  be  achieved  within  available  funding,
technologies, expertise, and other resources.

Five  years  later  in  this  most  recent  review  we  are  finding  that
improvements have been made, but problems still exist. To NASA’s
credit  much  has  been  done  to  address  the  causal  factors  identified
in  our  previous  work,  particularly  in  the  areas  of  cost  estimating,
cost reporting, program management, and oversight.

In addition, Congress has also done its part by instilling require-
ments  that  make  cost  growth  more  transparent  and  limit  the  cir-
cumstances  in  which  programs  can  be  re-baselined  and  by  asking

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

GAO  to  conduct  an  independent,  annual  assessment  of  major
projects, many of which do not receive much external oversight.

Because  baselines  were  set  just  two  or  three  years  ago,  the  true
magnitude of cost growth in the programs in our assessment is un-
derstated.  Nevertheless,  it  is  clear  that  programs  still  anticipate
growth  and  cost  and  schedule.  In  just  two  or  three  years  10  of  13
projects  we  assessed  in  implementation  experienced  an  average  of
13  percent  cost  growth,  and  they  had  an  average  launch  delay  of
11 months.

Many  of  the  projects  we  reviewed  indicated  they  have  experi-
enced  challenges  in  developing  new  technologies  or  retrofitting
older  technologies,  as  well  as  in  managing  their  contractors  and
more  generally  understanding  the  risks  and  challenges  they  were
up against when they set their baselines.

In conducting this work, we assessed the level of knowledge pro-
grams have about technologies, design, and their contractors at cer-
tain  points  in  the  development  process,  while  at  the  same  time
tracking other causal factors that we have identified in previous re-
views  such  as  funding  instability,  requirements  growth,  program
and contract management weaknesses.

This  methodology  is  designed  to  provide  more  insight  into  why
programs  encounter  problems,  as  well  as  what  actions  are  needed
to address problems. While it is beneficial to have a wealth of poli-
cies  and  procedures  aimed  at  ensuring  successful  execution,  it  is
still  necessary  for  us  and  the  Congress  to  see  what  is  happening
on  the  ground  and  what  types  of  unknowns  exist  in  programs  de-
spite what policies encourage.

This assessment is not meant to create a debate over the unique-
ness  of  NASA’s  projects  or  what  specific  criteria  should  be  applied
to  assess  what  types  of  unknowns  and  problems  exist  in  programs
and  implementation,  but  rather  to  serve  as  a  useful  oversight  and
management tool. We remain open to working with NASA to deter-
mine  the  best  way  forward  for  measurement.  Though  the  criteria
we  have  used  has  been  time-tested,  it  is  based  on  sound  program
management  practices,  and  it  has  been  well-received  in  commu-
nities  involving  all  types  of  complex  and  technical  development  ef-
forts, including the defense space community.

In  conclusion,  what  is  fundamentally  important  today  is  that
NASA  is  being  asked  to  undertake  new  missions  in  space  science
and aeronautics. As such, it is vital that NASA and Congress clear-
ly understand the costs and uncertainties of programs proposed for
authorization  and  during  their  execution.  It  is  equally  important
that problems be transparent, well understood, and tracked. We be-
lieve our report sets the course for doing so.

Thank you, and I am happy to answer any questions.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Chaplain follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CRISTINA T. CHAPLAIN

Madam Chairwoman and Members of the Subcommittee:

Thank you for inviting me to discuss the National Aeronautics and Space Admin-
istration’s  (NASA)  oversight  and  management  of  its  major  projects.  As  you  know,
in 1990, GAO designated NASA’s contract management as high-risk in view of per-
sistent cost growth and schedule slippage in the majority of its major projects. Since
that time, GAO’s high-risk work has focused on identifying a number of causal fac-
tors, including antiquated financial management systems, poor cost estimating, and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

undefinitized  contracts.  Because  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  persist,  this
area—now  titled  acquisition  management  because  of  the  scope  of  issues  that  need
to be resolved—remains high-risk.

To its credit, NASA has recently made a concerted effort to improve its acquisition
management.  In  2007,  NASA  developed  a  comprehensive  plan  to  address  systemic
weaknesses  related  to  how  it  manages  its  acquisitions.  The  plan  specifically  seeks
to strengthen program/project management, increase accuracy in cost estimating, fa-
cilitate  monitoring  of  contractor  cost  performance,  improve  agency-wide  business
processes, and improve financial management.

While  we  applaud  these  efforts  our  recent  work  has  shown  that  NASA  needs  to
pay more attention to effective project management. It needs to adopt best practices
are  adopted  that  focus  on  closing  gaps  in  knowledge  about  requirements,  tech-
nologies,  funding,  time  and  other  resources  before  it  makes  commitments  to  large-
scale programs. For instance, the Mars Science Laboratory, which was already over
budget, recently announced a two-year launch delay. Current estimates suggest that
the  price  of  this  delay  may  be  $400  million—which  drives  the  current  project  life
cycle  cost  estimate  to  $2.3  billion;  up  from  its  initial  confirmation  estimate  of  $1.6
billion.  Also,  in  just  one  year,  the  development  costs  of  NASA’s  Glory  mission  in-
creased  by  54  percent,  or  almost  $100  million,  because  of  problems  NASA’s  con-
tractor  is  having  developing  a  key  sensor.  Total  project  costs  for  another  project,
Kepler, have increased almost another $100 million within two fiscal years because
of similar issues. Taken together, these and other unanticipated cost increases ham-
per  NASA’s  ability  to  fund  new  projects,  continue  existing  ones,  and  pave  the  way
to a post-Shuttle space exploration environment.

Given  the  constrained  fiscal  environment  and  pressure  on  discretionary  spending
it  is  critical  that  NASA  get  the  most  out  of  its  investment  dollars  for  its  space  sys-
tems.  The  Agency  is  increasingly  being  asked  to  expand  its  portfolio  to  support  im-
portant scientific missions including the study of climate change. Therefore, it is ex-
ceedingly  important  that  these  resources  be  managed  as  effectively  and  efficiently
as  possible  for  success.  The  recent  launch  failure  of  the  Orbiting  Carbon  Observ-
atory  is  an  all-too-grim  reminder  of  how  much  time,  hard  work,  and  resources  can
be for naught when a space project cannot execute its mission.

In  response  to  congressional  direction,  we  have  prepared  a  comprehensive  report
on the management and oversight of NASA’s major projects. It contains summaries
of  18  projects  with  a  combined  life  cycle  cost  exceeding  $50  billion.  It  also  contains
an  assessment  of  issues  affecting  projects  across-the-board.  A  copy  of  this  report  is
now  available  on  GAO’s  website  (www.gao.gov).1 In  conducting  this  work,  we  com-
pared  projects  against  best  practice  criteria  for  system  development  including  at-
tainment of knowledge on technologies and design, as well as various aspects of pro-
gram  management.  We  expect  to  continue  this  assessment  on  an  annual  basis  and
to  continually  refine  our  examination  so  that  our  work  can  inform  your  oversight
and NASA’s own efforts to improve in the high-risk area of acquisition management.
In  responding  to  our  report,  NASA  asserted  that  the  unique  nature  of  its  work
and  external  factors  beyond  its  control  make  it  difficult  to  apply  the  same  criteria
that we apply to other major government acquisitions, particularly those with large
production  runs.  We  disagree.  The  criteria  we  used  to  assess  NASA’s  projects  rep-
resent  commonly  accepted,  fundamental  tenets  of  disciplined  project  management,
regardless of complexity or quantity. In fact, the concept of the knowledge-based ap-
proach we use has been adopted in NASA’s own acquisition policy. Key criteria that
we  use  have  been  developed  by  NASA  and/or  incorporated  into  its  engineering  pol-
icy. Moreover, facing long-standing cost and schedule growth and performance short-
falls,  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  acknowledges  the  need  for  a  knowledge
based  approach  in  the  Air  Force’s  ‘‘back  to  basics’’  policy  for  space  systems.  Lastly,
we remain open to discussions with NASA as to whether additional criteria can and
should  be  applied  to  its  systems  to  ensure  that  decisions  to  move  forward  in  devel-
opment are well-informed and ultimately, that taxpayer dollars are well spent.

Today  I  will  be  highlighting  the  results  of  this  work,  the  actions  NASA  is  taking
to address the concerns raised in our high-risk report and better position its projects
to meet their goals, and what we believe is necessary to make these actions success-
ful.  Because  we  also  have  responsibility  for  examining  military  space  systems,  we
will also highlight common challenges with space acquisitions within NASA and the
Department  of  Defense  (DOD).  This  testimony  is  based  on  previously  issued  GAO
work,  which  was  conducted  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted  government  au-
diting standards.

1 GAO,  NASA:  Assessments  of  Selected  Large-Scale  Projects.  GAO–09–306SP  (Washington,

D.C.: Mar. 2, 2009).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Acquisition Management Problems Persist

31

We  assessed  18  projects  in  NASA’s  current  portfolio.  Four  were  in  the  ‘‘formula-
tion’’ phase, a time when system concepts and technologies are still being explored,
and 14 were in the ‘‘implementation’’ phase,2 where system design is completed, sci-
entific  instruments  are  integrated,  and  a  spacecraft  is  fabricated.  When  implemen-
tation  begins,  it  is  expected  that  project  officials  know  enough  about  a  project’s  re-
quirements and what resources are necessary to meet those requirements that they
can  reliably  predict  the  cost  and  schedule  necessary  to  achieve  its  goals.  Reaching
this  point  requires  investment.  In  some  cases,  projects  that  we  reviewed  spent  two
to  five  years  and  up  to  $100  million  or  more  before  being  able  to  formally  set  cost
and schedule estimates.

Ten  of  the  projects  in  our  assessment  for  which  we  received  data  and  that  had
entered  the  implementation  phase  experienced  significant  cost  and/or  schedule
growth  from  their  project  baselines.3 Based  on  our  analysis,  development  costs  for
projects in our review increased by an average of almost 13 percent from their base-
line cost estimates—all in just two or three years—including one that went up more
than 50 percent. It should be noted that a number of these projects had experienced
considerably more cost growth before a baseline was established in response to stat-
utory  reporting  requirement.  Our  analysis  also  shows  that  projects  in  our  review
had an average delay of 11 months to their launch dates.

We  found  challenges  in  five  areas  that  occurred  throughout  the  various  projects
we reviewed that can contribute to project cost and schedule growth. These are not
necessarily  unique  to  NASA  projects  and  many  have  been  identified  in  many  other
weapon  and  space  systems  that  we  have  reviewed  and  have  been  prevalent  in  the
Agency for decades.

• Technology  maturity.  Four  of  the  13  projects  in  our  assessment  for  which  we
received data and that had entered the implementation phase did so without
first  maturing  all  critical  technologies,  that  is  they  did  not  know  that  tech-
nologies  central  to  the  project’s  success  could  work  as  intended  before  begin-
ning  the  process  of  fabricating  the  spacecraft.  This  means  that  knowledge
needed to make these technologies work remained unknown well into develop-
ment.  Consequences  accrue  to  projects  that  are  still  working  to  mature  tech-
nologies  well  into  system  development,  when  they  should  be  focusing  on  ma-
turing  system  design  and  preparing  for  production.  Simply  put,  projects  that
start  with  mature  technologies  experience  less  cost  growth  than  those  that
start with immature technologies.
• Design  stability.  The  majority  of  the  projects  in  our  assessment  that  held  a
critical design review did so without first achieving a stable design. If design
stability  is  not  achieved,  but  a  product  development  continues,  costly  re-de-
signs  to  address  changes  to  project  requirements  and  unforeseen  challenges
can occur. All of the projects in our assessment that had reached their critical
design  review  and  that  provided  data  on  engineering  drawings  experienced
some growth in the total number of design drawings after their critical design
review. Growth ranged from eight percent to, in the case of two projects, well
over 100 percent. Some of this increase can be attributed to change in system
design after critical design review.
• Complexity  of  heritage  technology.  More  than  half  the  projects  in  the  imple-
mentation  phase—eight  of  them—encountered  challenges  in  integrating  or
modifying  heritage  technologies.  Additionally,  two  projects  in  formulation—
Ares I and Orion—also encountered this problem. We found that the projects
that  relied  on  heritage  technologies  underestimated  the  effort  required  to
modify them to the necessary form, fit, or function.
• Contractor  performance.  Six  of  the  seven  projects  that  cited  contractor  per-
formance  as  a  challenge  also  experienced  significant  cost  and/or  schedule
growth.  Through  our  discussions  with  the  project  offices,  we  were  informed
that  contractors  encountered  technical  and  design  problems  with  hardware
that disrupted development progress.
• Development  partner  performance.  Five  of  the  thirteen  projects  we  reviewed
encountered challenges with a development partner. In these cases, the devel-

2 We  only  received  data  for  13  of  the  14  projects  in  implementation.  NASA  did  not  provide

cost or schedule data for the James Webb Space Telescope, which is in implementation.

3 For  purposes  of  our  analysis,  significant  cost  and  schedule  growth  occurs  when  a  project’s
cost  and/or  its  schedule  growth  exceeds  the  thresholds  established  for  Congressional  reporting
per  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  Authorization  Act  of  2005,  Pub.  L.  No.
109–161, § 103; 42 U.S.C. § 16613 (b), (f) (4).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

opment partner could not meet its commitments to the project within planned
timeframes.  This  may  have  been  a  result  of  problems  within  the  specific  de-
velopment  partner  organization  or  as  a  result  of  problems  faced  by  a  con-
tractor to that development partner.

Common  Acquisition  Management  Challenges  Persist  between  NASA  and

DOD

The challenges we identified in the NASA assessment are similar to ones we have
identified  in  other  weapon  systems,  including  Defense  space  systems.  For  example,
we  testified  last  year  that  DOD  space  system  cost  growth  was  attributable  to  pro-
grams  starting  before  they  have  assurance  that  capabilities  being  pursued  can  be
achieved  within  available  resources  and  time  constraints.  For  example,  DOD’s  Na-
tional Polar Orbiting Environmental Satellite System (NPOESS) has doubled in cost
from $6 billion to $12 billion due to challenges with maturing key technologies. We
have  also  tied  acquisition  problems  in  space  systems  to  inadequate  contracting
strategies  and  contract  and  program  management  weaknesses.  Further,  we  issued
a report in 2006 that found DOD space system cost estimates were consistently opti-
mistic.  For  example,  DOD’s  Space-Based  Infrared  High  System  was  originally  ex-
pected to cost about $4 billion and is now expected to cost nearly $12 billion.

We have found these problems are largely rooted in the failure to match the cus-
tomer’s  needs  with  the  developer’s  resources—technical  knowledge,  timing,  and
funding—when  starting  product  development.  In  other  words,  commitments  were
made  to  achieving  certain  capabilities  without  knowing  whether  technologies  and/
or  designs  being  pursued  could  really  work  as  intended.  Time  and  costs  were  con-
sistently  underestimated.  As  we  have  discussed  in  previous  work  on  space  systems
at  both  DOD  and  NASA,  a  knowledge-based  approach  to  acquisitions,  regardless  of
the  uniqueness  or  complexity  of  the  system  is  beneficial  because  it  allows  program
managers the opportunity to gain enough knowledge to identify potential challenges
earlier  in  development  and  make  more  realistic  assumptions  about  what  they  can
achieve.

NASA  Is  Making  a  Concerted  Effort  to  Reduce  High  Risk  in  Acquisition

Management But More Needs to Be Done

NASA has also taken significant steps to improve in the high-risk area of acquisi-
tion  management.  For  example,  NASA  revised  its  acquisition  and  engineering  po-
lices  to  incorporate  elements  of  a  knowledge-based  approach  that  should  allow  the
Agency  to  make  informed  decisions.  The  Agency  is  also  instituting  a  new  approach
whereby  senior  leadership  is  reviewing  acquisition  strategies  earlier  in  the  process
and  has  developed  broad  procurement  tenets  to  guide  the  Agency’s  procurement
practices.  Further,  NASA  is  working  to  improve  management  oversight  of  project
cost,  schedule,  and  technical  performance  with  the  establishment  of  a  baseline  per-
formance  review  with  senior  management.  In  order  to  improve  it’s  contracting  and
procurement  process,  NASA  has  instituted  an  agency  wide  standard  contract-writ-
ing  application  intended  to  ensure  all  contracts  include  the  most  up-to-date  NASA
contract  clauses  and  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  the  contracting  process.  NASA  is
also requiring project managers to quantify the program risks they identify and col-
lect more consistent data on project cost and technologies. It is taking other actions
to enhance cost estimating methodologies and to ensure that independent estimates
are used.

These changes brought the policy more in line with best practices for product de-
velopment. However, the Agency still lacks defined requirements across centers and
mission  directorates  for  consistent  metrics  that  demonstrate  knowledge  attainment
through the development cycle. In order for a disciplined approach to take hold, we
would expect project officials across the Agency to be held accountable for following
the same required policies.

More  steps  also  need  to  be  taken  to  manage  risk  factors  that  NASA  believes  are
outside  of  its  control.  NASA  asserts  that  contractor  deficiencies,  launch  manifest
issues, partner performance, and funding instability are to blame for the significant
cost and schedule growth on many of its projects that we reviewed. Such unforeseen
events,  however,  should  be  addressed  in  project-level,  budgeting  and  resource  plan-
ning through the development of adequate levels of contingency funds. NASA cannot
be  expected  to  predict  unforeseen  challenges,  but  being  disciplined  while  managing
resources, conducting active oversight of contractors, and working closely with part-
ners  can  put  projects  in  a  better  position  to  mitigate  these  risks  should  they  occur.
Realistically  planning  for  and  retiring  technical  or  engineering  risks  early  in  prod-
uct  development  allows  the  project  to  target  reserves  to  issues  NASA  believes  are
outside of its control.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

In  conclusion,  managing  resources  effectively  and  efficiently  as  possible  is  impor-
tant more than ever for NASA. The Agency is undertaking a new multi-billion dollar
program to develop the next generation of spacecraft for human space flight and at
a time when it is faced with increasing demands to support important scientific mis-
sions,  including  the  study  of  climate  change,  and  to  increase  aeronautics  research
and  development.  By  allowing  major  investment  commitments  to  continue  to  be
made with unknowns about technology and design readiness, contractor capabilities,
requirements, and/or funding, NASA will merely be exacerbating the inherent risks
it already faces in developing and delivering new space systems. Programs will like-
ly  continue  to  experience  problems  that  require  more  time  and  money  to  address
than anticipated. Over the long run, the extra investment required to address these
problems may well prevent NASA from pursuing more critical science and space ex-
ploration missions. By contrast, by continuing to implement its acquisition manage-
ment  reforms  and  ensuring  programs  do  not  move  forward  with  such  unknowns,
NASA  can  better  align  customer  expectations  with  resources,  minimize  problems
that could hurt programs, and maximize it ability to meet increased demands.

Madam Chairwoman, this concludes my statement. I will be happy to answer any

questions that you have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CRISTINA T. CHAPLAIN

Ms.  Chaplain  currently  serves  as  a  Director,  Acquisition  and  Sourcing  Manage-
ment, at the U.S. Government Accountability Office. She has responsibility for GAO
assessments  of  military  and  civilian  space  acquisitions.  Ms.  Chaplain  has  also  led
a  variety  of  DOD-wide  contracting-related  and  best  practice  evaluations  for  the
GAO.  Before  her  current  position,  Ms.  Chaplain  worked  with  GAO’s  financial  man-
agement  and  information  technology  teams.  Ms.  Chaplain  has  been  with  GAO  for
18 years. She received a Bachelor’s degree, magna cum laude, in International Rela-
tions  from  Boston  University  and  a  Master’s  Degree  in  Journalism  from  Columbia
University.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Ms. Chaplain.
Mr. Pulliam.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  GARY  P.  PULLIAM,  VICE  PRESIDENT,
CIVIL  AND  COMMERCIAL  OPERATIONS,  THE  AEROSPACE
CORPORATION
Mr. PULLIAM. Good morning. Madam Chairwoman and Members
of the Subcommittee, I am pleased to represent the Aerospace Cor-
poration  and  to  appear  before  you  today  as  you  deliberate  cost
management issues in NASA’s acquisitions and programs.

As  a  private,  non-profit  corporation,  the  Aerospace  Corporation
has  provided  engineering  and  scientific  services  to  government
space  organizations  for  almost  50  years.  As  its  primary  activity
Aerospace  operates  a  federally-funded  research  and  development
center,  but  we  also  undertake  projects  for  NASA  and  other  civil
agencies.

The  Subcommittee  asked  us  to  focus  on  the  main  causes  of  cost
and  schedule  delays  at  NASA,  how  effective  NASA  has  been  at
mitigating  these  problems,  and  similarities  we  see  in  other  agen-
cies.  While  there  are  many  factors  affecting  cost  and  schedule
growth, I will briefly discuss four main causes as we see them.

First,  sometimes  NASA  is  too  optimistic  in  its  initial  designs.
This  is  understandable  because  NASA’s  job  is  to  push  science  to
new  frontiers,  yet  there  is  palpable  pressure  for  mission  execution
at  the  lowest-possible  cost.  The  net  result  can  be  a  less-than-com-
plete appreciation for the complexity of the technical baseline. This
can  lead  to  artificially-low  initial  cost  estimates  and  optimistic
schedules.  The  cost-estimating  process  itself  can  introduce  opti-
mism  depending  on  what  data  and  what  missions  are  included.
These  factors  taken  together  can  increase  the  likelihood  that  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

initial  cost  estimate  will  not  be  an  accurate  indicator  of  the  final
program cost.

Second,  there  can  be  scope  changes  as  the  design  evolves.  De-
signs and technologies mature as projects proceed through develop-
ment. This, too, is understandable and perhaps even desirable from
a  science  perspective.  The  project  manager  wants  to  deliver  max-
imum value to his customer.

However,  the  effects  are  clear.  An  instrument  that  is  more  com-
plex than originally thought will likely require more mass or more
power.  We  should  not  be  surprised  that  these  changes  from  the
original design produce changes in cost and schedules as well.

Third,  the  inherent  difficulty  of  developing  world-class  tech-
nologies contributes to cost and schedule growth. Technology imma-
turity  is  most  often  apparent  in  the  advancement  of  science
through new instrument development. Delays in instrument devel-
opment can lead to schedule delays for the entire project. NASA is
working  toward  reducing  risks  associated  with  immature  tech-
nologies  but  has  reduced  technology  development  in  some  other
areas.

Fourth,  we  must  acknowledge  that  external  influences  can  have
a major effect on cost and schedule performance. From the program
or  project  manager’s  perspective  whether  that  change  comes  from
the Congress or from inside NASA the effects are the same. Project
changes  can  set  off  chain  reactions  all  across  an  agency.  Cost
growths in one program may result in reducing funding from other
programs that were performing well, making them less executable.
Missions can be delayed or canceled because existing programs are
consuming  available  budget.  Each  of  these  actions  has  a  negative
impact on established costs and schedule.

In  looking  at  the  effectiveness  NASA  has  in  mitigating  cost  and
schedule growth we believe NASA deserves some credit for their ef-
forts.  In  the  past  few  years  NASA  has  initiated  several  measures
specifically designed to solve this problem. Some are strategic such
as  budgeting  at  a  higher  confidence  level,  and  some  are  tactical,
such  as  collecting  the  necessary  data  for  sound  cost  estimating.
NASA should be commending, commended for investing in new and
innovative technologies and techniques.

One  example  is  schedule  estimating,  which  is  a  relatively  new
capability  in  our  industry.  Another  is  affordability  analysis,  which
allows  examination  of  the  portfolio  interactions,  long-range  plan-
ning,  and  evaluation  of  costs,  risks,  and  program  reserves.  These
are ground-breaking efforts, and they will produce positive results.
Even with these management actions, however, there is still un-
certainty  in  the  cost  management  process.  NASA  is  attempting  to
manage  this  uncertainty  through  establishing  cost  estimates  at  a
higher  level  of  confidence  than  in  previous  years.  While  commend-
able, this higher level of confidence is valid only if the baseline re-
mains stable, if technology maturation is controlled, and if external
influences  are  understood  and  managed.  Effective  cost  and  sched-
ule  management  requires  a  project  manager  to  accept,  be  account-
able for, and execute to a valid baseline. NASA is studying how to
reconcile  project  estimates  with  independent  estimates.  Greater
transparency  into  both  processes  and  reconciliation  of  these  basis
of estimate will yield positive results.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

Our  overall  assessment  of  NASA’s  mitigation  efforts  is  that  the
Agency  is  implementing  many  measures  which  should  provide  in-
creased  capability  for  cost  and  schedule  management,  and  as  a  re-
sult better cost and schedule performance.

And  finally,  the  Committee  asked  us  to  look  at  similarities  be-
tween  NASA  and  other  federal  agencies.  We  found  far  more  simi-
larities  than  differences.  As  outlined  above,  optimism,  baseline
growth, technology changes, and external influences are not unique
to NASA. Dozens of commissions and panels have studied cost and
schedule  for  decades,  and  the  themes  are  generally  consistent.
While  each  federal  agency  can  point  to  their  unique  problems  and
circumstances,  the  fundamental  challenges  of  good  cost  and  sched-
ule estimating and performance are remarkably similar across fed-
eral agencies.

Madam  Chairwoman,  I  am  pleased  to  present  our  findings  and
assessments to the Subcommittee, and I look forward to your ques-
tions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Pulliam follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF GARY P. PULLIAM

Madam Chairwoman and Members of the Subcommittee:

I  am  pleased  to  present  The  Aerospace  Corporation’s  findings,  assessments,  and

recommendations on cost and schedule management issues in NASA’s programs.

The Aerospace Corporation

The  Aerospace  Corporation  is  a  private,  nonprofit  corporation,  headquartered  in
El  Segundo,  California.  Aerospace  was  created  in  1960  at  the  recommendation  of
Congress  and  the  Secretary  of  the  Air  Force  to  provide  research,  development,  and
advisory  services  to  the  United  States  government  in  the  planning  and  acquisition
of  space,  launch,  and  ground  systems  and  their  related  technologies.  We  provide  a
stable,  objective,  expert  source  of  engineering  analysis  and  advice  to  the  govern-
ment,  free  from  organizational  conflict  of  interest.  We  are  focused  on  the  govern-
ment’s best interests, with no profit motive or predilection for any particular design
or technical solution.

Aerospace  does  not  compete  with  industry  for  government  contracts,  and  we  do
not  manufacture  products.  The  government  relies  on  Aerospace  for  objective  devel-
opment  of  pre-competitive  system  specifications  and  impartial  evaluation  of  com-
peting concepts and engineering hardware developments to ensure that government
procurements can meet the user’s needs in a cost-and-performance-effective manner.
Aerospace employs about 4,000 people of whom 2,700 are scientists and engineers
with expertise in all aspects of space systems engineering and technology. As its pri-
mary  activity,  Aerospace  operates  a  Federally  Funded  Research  and  Development
Center  sponsored  by  the  Under  Secretary  of  the  Air  Force,  and  managed  by  the
Space  and  Missile  Systems  Center  in  El  Segundo,  California.  Our  principal  tasks
are systems planning, systems engineering, integration, flight readiness verification,
operations  support,  and  anomaly  resolution  for  National  Security  Space  (NSS)  sys-
tems.  Through  our  comprehensive  knowledge  of  space  systems  and  our  sponsor’s
needs, our breadth of staff expertise, and our long-term, stable relationship with the
government, we are able to integrate technical lessons learned across all NSS space
programs  and  develop  system-of-systems  architectures  that  integrate  the  functions
of many separate space and ground systems.

The  Aerospace  Corporation  also  undertakes  projects  for  civil  agencies,  including
the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  Such  projects  con-
tribute  to  the  common  good  of  the  Nation  while  broadening  the  knowledge  base  of
the  corporation.  Aerospace’s  support  to  NASA  includes  work  on  solutions  to  the
foam and ice debris damage that resulted in the loss of the Space Shuttle Columbia,
analysis of alternatives to robotically servicing the Hubble Space Telescope, and con-
tributions  to  the  Mars  Exploration  Rovers  program.  Our  support  to  NASA  includes
its headquarters and virtually all directorates as well as almost every NASA Center.
NASA  and  the  NSS  clients  emphasize  different  areas  when  they  task  Aerospace.
NASA  requests  far  less  support  but  proportionately  more  programmatic  and  budg-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

eting  support  while  the  NSS  clients  place  primary  emphasis  on  technical  support.
While  Aerospace  certainly  does  not  have  full  and  complete  insight  into  all  NASA
programs  and  projects,  nor  do  we  support  all  NASA  programs,  we  have  a  unique
relationship with NASA and have unique insights which we are privileged to share
with the Committee.

The  Subcommittee  asked  us  to  focus  our  testimony  on:  1)  Identifying  the  main
causes  of  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  in  NASA  programs  and  projects  found
during the course of The Aerospace Corporation’s body of work at NASA; 2) Assess-
ing the effectiveness of NASA’s efforts in mitigating them; and 3) Identifying, in the
context of The Aerospace Corporation’s work at other federal agencies, any similar-
ities in cost growth and schedule delays experienced at NASA.

Identifying  the  main  causes  of  cost  growth  and  schedule  delays  in  NASA
programs  and  projects  found  during  the  course  of  The  Aerospace
Corporation’s body of work at NASA

Aerospace has enjoyed a relationship with NASA for many years. We have studied
NASA project cost and schedule for the Administrator, Associate Administrator, the
Office of Program Analysis and Evaluation, Headquarters Mission Directorates, and
many  NASA  Centers.  Our  work  with  NASA  reveals  that  cost  growth  and  schedule
delays result from a variety of complex reasons.

In  recent  years,  NASA  has  commissioned  several  studies  to  determine  the  pri-
mary contributing factors to cost and schedule growth. These studies, as well as oth-
ers  in  the  field,  identified  several  common  themes:  significant  optimism  in  initial
designs, changes in scope associated with the evolution of the design over time, the
inherent technical difficulty of developing world class technologies, and the effect of
external  influences  on  the  project  such  as  funding  instability.  Although  the  conclu-
sions  stated  above  are  primarily  drawn  from  the  analysis  of  a  subset  of  NASA’s
science missions, we believe that the observations are applicable to a broader array
of NASA projects.

Optimism in Initial Design

NASA,  as  part  of  its  charter,  conducts  unprecedented  exploration  and  science.
These  missions  continually  push  the  envelope  of  the  capabilities  required  by  its
human space flight and scientific instruments and spacecraft. The novelty and value
of  these  science  instruments  are  indisputable,  as  evidenced  by  the  recent  discovery
by  the  Fermi  Gamma  Ray  Space  Telescope  of  the  highest-energy  gamma-ray  burst
ever  recorded.  At  the  same  time,  there  is  significant  competitive  pressure,  both
within NASA and among its contractors, to initiate a mission at the lowest possible
cost.  As  noted  by  former  NASA  Administrator  James  Webb,  it  is  not  unusual  for
teams  to  ‘‘put  their  best  foot  forward’’  when  proposing  a  new  mission.  In  a  recent
study of the cost and schedule growth of 40 NASA science missions, only five of the
40 missions investigated resulted in no cost and schedule growth while over a quar-
ter experienced cost growth greater than 40 percent above and beyond the project’s
internal  cost  reserves.  In  some  cases,  the  content  or  complexity  of  the  technical
baseline  is  under-appreciated.  In  other  cases,  the  initial  estimate  of  technical  re-
sources such as mass or power is inadequate or reliance on heritage systems is over-
stated. The initial inadequate technical baseline and/or poorly defined requirements
lead  to  an  artificially  low  initial  cost  estimate  resulting  in  significant  cost  growth
beyond  the  project’s  internal  cost  reserves.  Furthermore,  optimism  may  be  intro-
duced into the cost estimating process from empirical cost models that do not incor-
porate  canceled  missions,  missions  currently  in  development  that  are  experiencing
difficulties,  or  missions  whose  actual  costs  have  been  omitted  or  modified  based  on
‘‘unusual’’ circumstances. Another key driver of a project’s final cost is schedule risk,
which  is  often  not  adequately  captured,  making  the  initial  schedule  incompatible
with  the  budget,  resulting  in  an  overall  plan  that  is  not  executable.  In  summary,
the  optimism  in  the  initial  design  starts  the  cycle,  which  is  exacerbated  by  limita-
tions in the cost estimating process.

Scope Changes as the Design Evolves

The natural progression of a mission from its early conceptual design through its
detailed design and implementation typically requires that resources (weight, power,
performance, etc.) be added to meet stressing requirements. This growth in required
spacecraft resources results in an associated cost growth. The understatement of the
required resources is built into how the cost of the initial technical baseline is esti-
mated.  For  example,  while  a  recent  historical  study  of  robotic  science  missions  ob-
served  that  mass  grew  over  40  percent  on  average  from  initial  design  inception  to
flight  design,  large  mass  growth  factors  are  typically  not  applied  in  determining  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

cost  estimate.  Often,  the  complexity  of  the  development  effort,  underestimated  at
the outset, is more fully understood as the development progresses. While the accu-
racy  of  project  estimates  improves  over  time,  cost  growth,  over  and  above  reserves,
still  occurs  deep  into  the  project  life  cycle.  In  short,  the  concept  that  is  proposed  is
often  not  what  is  built.  The  initial  cost  estimate  is  likewise  not  representative  of
the final, as-built configuration due to required changes as the understanding of the
design  evolves.  In  essence,  cost  estimators  are  trying  to  estimate  a  moving  target
as projects progress toward their final design form.

Inherent Difficulty of Developing World Class Technologies

NASA is continually pushing the technological envelope to reach its science objec-
tives.  The  difficulty  of  landing  a  piece  of  hardware  the  size  of  a  small  car  on  the
surface of another planet is only one example of the challenges that NASA faces on
a  regular  basis.  Each  NASA  development  is  unique,  technically  challenging  and  in-
herently  difficult.  To  confront  these  challenges,  technology  is  essential.  The  lack  of
mature  critical  technologies  at  project  start  contributes  to  the  cost  and  schedule
growth.  A  generally  accepted  risk  avoidance  practice  is  to  fund  focused  technology
development  prior  to  system  development.  NASA,  however,  has  reduced  technology
development funding in many areas due to budget constraints. Technology immatu-
rity  in  science  missions  is  often  most  apparent  in  instrument  development,  as  op-
posed  to  spacecraft.  Instrument  development  difficulties  often  lead  to  schedule
delays  in  which  a  ‘‘marching  army’’  cost  is  incurred  awaiting  instrument  delivery.
Additional investment to mature instruments, prior to the start of full project devel-
opment, could potentially lead to reduced cost and schedule growth for science mis-
sions.

External Influences

External  influences  can  have  a  major  effect  on  cost  and  schedule  performance.
From  the  program  or  project  manager’s  perspective,  whether  change  comes  from
Congress or from inside NASA, the effects are the same. Examples of external influ-
ences  outside  a  project’s  control  include  budget  modifications,  funding  instability,
changes  in  requirements  or  priorities,  and  launch  vehicle  delays.  The  project  man-
ager  depends  on  access  to  unallocated  budget,  or  reserves,  to  address  problems.
When  Headquarters  or  Congress  reassigns  budget  or  change  priorities,  it  is  often
at  the  cost  of  increased  execution  risks  that  fall  outside  of  a  given  project’s  ability
to  accommodate  within  reserves.  Within  a  portfolio,  cost  growth  in  one  project  may
result  in  reducing  funding  to  other  projects  making  them  all  less  executable.  The
resulting  domino  effect  impacts  all  missions  that  follow  as  missions  that  have  not
started are postponed or missions early in their development are stretched to fit an-
nual budget constraints.

Assessing  the  effectiveness  of  NASA’s  efforts  in  mitigating  them  (cost  and

schedule delays)

NASA  initiated  several  measures  to  mitigate  cost  and  schedule  growth  since  the
middle of this decade. Some of these measures are strategic in nature, such as budg-
eting  at  the  70  percent  confidence  level,  and  some  are  more  tactical,  such  as  the
collection of historical data to provide a sound basis for new cost and schedule meth-
odology development. Schedule estimation, which is a relatively new capability with-
in  the  industry,  is  an  area  in  which  NASA  is  investing  to  improve  the  state  of  the
practice  commensurate  with  the  more  mature  cost  analysis  methodologies.  Afford-
ability  analysis,  which  allows  examination  of  portfolio  interactions,  longer-range
planning/analysis,  and  evaluation  of  cost  risk  and  reserve  policies,  is  another  capa-
bility in which NASA has invested. Several introspective studies were commissioned
to more fully understand the reasons for cost and schedule growth and provide rec-
ommendations  on  how  to  limit  growth.  The  majority  of  these  studies  received  peer
review and have been published in the public domain. The progress in each of these
areas is commendable.

The  collection  of  cost,  schedule,  and  technical  data  is  vital  to  developing  rep-
resentative  cost  and  schedule  models  that  are  based  in  historical  fact.  NASA  has
embarked  on  an  initiative  to  collect  data,  the  Cost  Analysis  Data  Requirement
(CADRe) initiative. Aerospace is a contributor to this effort. Prior to the CADRe ini-
tiative, NASA’s historical cost and schedule data collection from the early 1990s had
been scarce and was based primarily upon the ability of individual organizations or
programs to gather their own cost data. The CADRe initiative has institutionalized
collection  of  data  at  specific  milestones  for  a  large  set  of  missions  across  a  large
number  of  organizations.  This  data  is  invaluable  in  understanding  and  analyzing

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

the  cost  and  schedule  growth  of  NASA  projects  and  identifying  contributing  factors
and causal relationships.

In  spite  of  these  efforts,  significant  uncertainty  remains  in  the  cost  estimating
process.  To  offset  this  uncertainty,  NASA  has  moved  to  estimating  cost  in  a  prob-
abilistic fashion where a range of cost is estimated with associated confidence levels.
NASA has also instituted a new requirement for budgeting projects at a higher level
of confidence than previously experienced with a goal of giving projects a 70 percent
chance of successfully meeting their budget. The validity of this approach, however,
depends  on  the  stability  and  soundness  of  the  baseline.  Every  project  has  a  budget
estimate  set  by  many  inputs.  Significant  changes  in  these  underlying  assumptions
and  technical  baseline  will  reduce  the  program’s  budget  confidence.  Furthermore,
substantial  differences  of  opinion  remain  within  the  cost-estimating  community  on
how to develop and interpret probabilistic estimates.

For  effective  NASA  cost  and  schedule  performance  execution,  the  project  must
manage to a valid baseline estimate. One area of concern for the NASA project man-
agers  is  the  relevance  and  utility  of  independent  cost  estimates  they  do  not  own.
Different methodologies are used by the project and independent estimate such that
there is not a common understanding of the basis of estimate for each. Projects typi-
cally  use  bottoms  up  estimates  that  do  not  necessarily  incorporate  all  of  the  risks.
The disconnect between independent cost estimates and project estimates is exacer-
bated by the fact that unanticipated risks often manifest themselves late in develop-
ment  cycle  during  integration  and  test,  when  it  is  often  too  late  to  make  adjust-
ments.  Greater  transparency  into  the  basis  of  estimate  for  each  approach  is  impor-
tant  and  needs  to  be  communicated  in  ways  that  both  the  cost  estimating  commu-
nity  and  project  managers  understand  and  recognize.  One  effort  underway  to
strengthen the connection between an independent cost estimate and the project es-
timate  is  to  include  the  effects  of  risk  and  risk  mitigation  to  promote  the  project’s
ownership  of  the  estimate.  Incorporating  the  project’s  assessment  of  risks  into  the
cost  estimating  process  earlier  and  more  often  can  put  greater  validity  into  the
project’s  baseline  cost  estimate  and  provide  a  more  robust  reserve  posture  and  pro-
mote  the  project’s  ownership  of  the  estimate.  NASA  is  using  aspects  of  this  philos-
ophy  on  some  of  its  projects.  Continued  expansion  of  its  use  should  reduce  unex-
pected cost and schedule growth in the future.

The results of these measures have not yet had time to reach fruition as missions
developed  under  the  new  initiatives  have  not  yet  been  fully  deployed.  New  meth-
odologies such as schedule analysis tools and strategic mission portfolio models take
time to influence project and program design in order to develop more robust project
and program plans. Although it is too early to make an assessment, the studies that
NASA  has  conducted  and  the  initiatives  that  NASA  has  begun  should  move  the
Agency toward a more positive outcome and improve the ability to predict and con-
trol cost and schedule in its future.

Identifying,  in  the  context  of  The  Aerospace  Corporation’s  work  at  other
federal  agencies,  any  similarities  in  cost  growth  and  schedule
delays experienced by NASA

NASA  is  not  alone  in  facing  challenges  in  cost  and  schedule  growth.  The  causes
outlined above including optimism, growth, technology, and external influences, are
not  unique  to  NASA.  The  military  procurement  system  has  been  analyzed  for  dec-
ades. Dozens of major commissions, panels, and academic studies have echoed these
same  issues,  and  we  generally  concur  with  the  findings.  The  Aerospace  Corpora-
tion’s  current  and  previous  Presidents  supported  the  May  2003  Defense  Science
Board/Air  Force  Scientific  Advisory  Board  Joint  Task  Force  on  Acquisition  of  Na-
tional Security Space Programs. That group reported:

The  space  acquisition  system  is  strongly  biased  to  produce  unrealistically  low
cost estimates throughout the acquisition process. These estimates lead to unreal-
istic budgets and unexecutable programs.

The  Task  Force  went  on  to  note  the  need  for  new  technology  and  the  impact  of

technology risk on cost and schedule risk.

In  its  most  recent  critique  of  defense  acquisition,  the  Government  Accountability

Office noted:

Invariably,  the  Department  of  Defense  and  the  Congress  end  up  continually
shifting funds to and from programs—undermining well-performing programs to
pay  for  poorly  performing  ones.  At  the  program  level,  weapon  system  programs
are  initiated  without  sufficient  knowledge  about  requirements,  technology,  and
design maturity. Instead, managers rely on assumptions that are consistently too
optimistic,  exposing  programs  to  significant  and  unnecessary  risks  and  ulti-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

mately cost growth and schedule delays.’’ (Defense Management: Actions Needed
to  Overcome  Long-standing  Challenges  with  Weapon  Systems  Acquisition  and
Service Contract Management. GAO–09–362T, February 11, 2009)

While each federal agency can point to unique problems and circumstances which
impact  project  development,  the  fundamental  challenges  of  good  cost  and  schedule
estimating and performance are remarkably similar across federal agencies.

Conclusion

NASA’s  challenging  mission  includes  a  varied  portfolio  and  substantial  techno-
logical  challenges.  Many  factors  contribute  to  cost  and  schedule  growth,  but  opti-
mism in initial designs, changes in scope over time, the inherent technical difficulty
of  maturing  technologies,  and  external  influences  are  common  themes  we  found.
Many of these conditions and constraints exist for other federal agencies. NASA has
initiated  several  measures  to  mitigate  cost  and  schedule  growth  and  these  efforts
should provide positive results over the next few years.

The  Aerospace  Corporation  is  pleased  that  the  Subcommittee  requested  we  offer

our views and stand ready for your questions.

Further Reading
1) Bearden,  D.,  Boudrough  R.,  and  Wertz  J.,  Chapter  on  ‘‘Cost  Modeling,’’  Reduc-

ing the Cost of Space Systems, Microcosm Press, 1998.

2) Apgar, H., Bearden D. and Wong R., Chapter on ‘‘Cost Modeling,’’ Space Mission

Analysis and Design (SMAD) 3rd edition, Microcosm Press, 1999.

3) Bearden,  David  A.,  ‘‘A  Complexity-based  Risk  Assessment  of  Low-Cost  Plan-
etary Missions: When is a Mission Too Fast and Too Cheap?’’ Fourth IAA Inter-
national Conference on Low-Cost Planetary Missions, JHU/APL, Laurel, MD, 2–
5 May, 2000.

4) Bearden,  David  A.,  ‘‘Small  Satellite  Costs,’’  Crosslink  Magazine,  The  Aerospace

Corporation, Winter 2000–2001.

5) Bitten,  R.,  Lao,  N.,  Muhle,  J.,  ‘‘Joint  Government/Industry  Space  Programs:
Lessons  Learned  And  Recommendations,’’  SPACE  2001  Conference,  28–30  Au-
gust 2001.

6) Bitten  R.E.,  Bearden  D.A.,  Lao  N.Y.  and  Park,  T.H.,  ‘‘The  Effect  of  Schedule
Constraints on the Success of Planetary Missions,’’ Fifth IAA International Con-
ference on Low-Cost Planetary Missions, 24 September 2003.

7) Bitten R.E., Emmons D., Min I.A., and Radcliffe T.O., ‘‘An Integrated Architec-
ture  Design/Cost/Scheduling  Approach  for  Future  Space  Exploration  Program
Affordability,’’  1st  Space  Exploration  Conference,  30  January–1  February  2005.
8) Bearden, D.A., ‘‘Perspectives on NASA Robotic Mission Success with a Cost and
Schedule-constrained  Environment,’’  Aerospace  Risk  Symposium,  Manhattan
Beach, CA, August 2005.

9) Bitten  R.E.,  Bearden  D.A.,  Emmons  D.L.,  ‘‘A  Quantitative  Assessment  of  Com-
plexity,  Cost,  and  Schedule:  Achieving  A  Balanced  Approach  For  Program  Suc-
cess,’’  6th  IAA  International  Low  Cost  Planetary  Conference,  Japan,  11–13  Oc-
tober 2005.

10) Bitten  R.E.,  ‘‘Determining  When  A  Mission  Is  ‘‘Outside  The  Box’’:  Guidelines
For  A  Cost-Constrained  Environment,’’  6th  IAA  International  Low  Cost  Plan-
etary Conference, 11–13 October 2005.

11) Bitten  R.,  Emmons  D.,  Freaner  C.,  ‘‘Using  Historical  NASA  Cost  and  Schedule
Growth  to  Set  Future  Program  and  Project  Reserve  Guidelines,’’  IEEE  Aero-
space Conference, Big Sky, Montana, 3–10 March 2007.

12) Emmons  D.,  ‘‘A  Quantitative  Approach  to  Independent  Schedule  Estimates  of
Planetary  &  Earth-orbiting  Missions,’’  2008  ISPA–SCEA  Joint  International
Conference, Netherlands, 12–14 May 2008.

13) Freaner  C.,  Bitten  R.,  Bearden  D.,  and  Emmons  D.,  ‘‘An  Assessment  of  the  In-
herent Optimism in Early Conceptual Designs and its Effect on Cost and Sched-
ule  Growth,’’  2008  SSCAG/SCAF/EACE  Joint  International  Conference,
Noordwijk, The Netherlands, 15–16 May 2008.

14) Bearden  D.  ‘‘Perspectives  on  NASA  Mission  Cost  and  Schedule  Performance

Trends,’’ Presentation at GSFC Symposium, 3 June 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

BIOGRAPHY FOR GARY P. PULLIAM

Gary  P.  Pulliam  is  Vice  President  of  Civil  and  Commercial  Operations.  He  was
appointed  to  this  position  in  December  2004.  Pulliam  directs  all  civil  and  commer-
cial business at Aerospace and is responsible for contracts valued at $90 million an-
nually.  Key  customers  include  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,
the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and a wide number of other
civil and commercial organizations in the United States and overseas.

In addition to his responsibilities in Civil and Commercial Operations, Pulliam is

Corporate Director of Government Relations.

Pulliam joined The Aerospace Corporation in 1994 as Director of Government Op-
erations  after  serving  for  five  years  as  Chief  of  Staff  for  U.S.  Representative  Earl
Hutto  of  Florida’s  first  congressional  district.  He  concurrently  was  a  professional
staff  member  for  the  House  Armed  Services  Committee,  supporting  Chairman
Hutto, and was the Congressman’s campaign manager.

Pulliam  was  appointed  General  Manager  in  charge  of  non-Defense  Department
business at Aerospace in 1997. He has continued to handle government relations re-
sponsibilities  while  managing  increasingly  important  civil  and  commercial  pro-
grams.

During a 20-year career in the Air Force, Pulliam served as a pilot and instructor
and held assignments at the Aeronautical Systems Center in Dayton, Ohio. He also
held  several  positions  at  the  Pentagon,  including  an  assignment  as  legislative  liai-
son in the Office of the Secretary of the Air Force.

He  holds  a  Bachelor’s  degree  in  English  from  Clemson  University  and  earned  a
Master’s  in  operations  management  at  the  University  of  Arkansas.  He  also  is  a
graduate  of  Harvard  University’s  Kennedy  School  of  Senior  Managers  in  Govern-
ment Program.

The  Aerospace  Corporation,  based  in  El  Segundo,  California,  is  an  independent,
nonprofit  company  that  provides  objective  technical  analyses  and  assessments  for
national security space programs and selected civil and commercial space programs
in the national interest.

DISCUSSION

IMPEDIMENTS TO PERFORMANCE IN NASA PROJECTS

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Pulliam.  At  this  point
we are going to begin our first round of questions. The Chair recog-
nizes herself for five minutes.

Beginning  with  Mr.  Scolese,  we  have  heard  testimony  from  Ms.
Chaplain  and  Mr.  Pulliam  about  the  factors  that  have  historically
led  to  cost  scheduled  growth.  They  have  also  been  able  to  identify
some  of  the  standard  approaches  that  should  be  considered  in  at-
tempting to mitigate such growth. But none of these approaches or
none of these factors are certainly new, dating back to 1981, to the
Hearth  Report,  certainly  earlier  than  that  there  have  been  similar
causes  and  mitigation  strategies  for  cost  and  schedule  growth  in
NASA and certainly for projects.

Yet  we  are  sitting  here  today  because  these  projects  continue  to
persist. I see from your biography that you have been on the front
lines of the battle to control costs as a NASA Project and Program
Manager  in  a  variety  of  important  positions.  So  in  addition  to
knowing theoretically what should be done, you have actually expe-
rienced  first-hand  the  real  life  challenges  of  attempting  to  manage
cost and schedule.

What  from  your  perspective  specifically  are  the  most  important
real  world  impediments  to  consistently  achieving  on-budget,  on-
schedule  performance  in  NASA’s  projects  and  programs?  And  fol-
lowing  that  are  we  just  going  to  have  to  accept  some  level  of  cost
growth if we want to conduct space research and exploration? I re-
alize  that  this  is  very  challenging  what  we  are  asking  you  to  do,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

but—or  is  it  possible  that  measures  that  you  and  the  other  wit-
nesses have outlined can make a significant difference?

Mr. SCOLESE. Well, to answer the question first, you are correct.
Many  of  these  techniques  have  been  talked  about  in  the  past,  and
Gary  and  Cristina  discussed  techniques  that  we  are  using.  One  of
the things we are doing different today is we are using all of them
in  a  consistent  framework,  so  that  we  are  not  just  doing  cost  esti-
mation,  we  are  not  just  improving  our  models,  we  are  not  just
using  EVM.  We  are  taking  all  of  those  tools,  and  we  are  using  all
of them.

In addition, we are having other people look at it, people that are
independent of the performing organization, whether it is a project
or a program or a center to go off and look at it because when you
are  sitting  there,  and  you  are  looking  at  it,  and  you  are  doing  it
day  to  day,  you  think  you  can  solve  the  problem.  Otherwise  you
probably  wouldn’t  be  in  the  job.  But  somebody  else  looking  at  it  is
going  to  be  a  little  bit  more  skeptical  and  look  at  what  you  are
doing  a  little  bit  more  clearly  and  bring  that  back  for  others  to  go
off  and  evaluate  and  see  if  we  can’t  make  adjustments  to  help  do
it, to help correct problems, whether they are due to the project or
they  are  outside  of  the  project’s  control.  That  can  be  done  if  we
know what they are early enough.

You also asked, having lived in the trenches, what are the things
that are most important to a project in order to be successful. Prob-
ably  the  most  important  thing  is  stability.  One  of  the  things  that
is  extremely  difficult  in  the  project  environment  is  uncertainty  in
your  budget  or  uncertainty  in  requirements  that  you  don’t  control.
Once  they  are  stable  and  they  usually  become  stable  later  in  the
program  development,  things  go  fairly  well.  I  mean,  there  can  be
surprises.  There  is  no  doubt  about  it.  We  are  doing  things  that  of-
tentimes haven’t been done before, so we do get surprised. But sta-
bility was one of the things that we really looked for, and we really
looked for, and we really felt that we needed in order to be success-
ful.

And  last  you  asked  do  we  have  to  live  with  consistent  cost  over-
runs.  I  think  the  answer  is  no,  and  I  think  you  have  heard  from
the three of us that we can do better. If implement these tools, we
can better predict what our costs will be. Will they be totally gone?
No. I don’t think so, because what we do is very different. We have
high-risks,  and  therefore,  there  is  probability  of  failure  and  there
is  probability  of  cost  growth.  But  overall  we  can  do  better,  and  I
think  when  we  put  all  these  tools  together  you  will  see  our  per-
formance improve.

NASA IMPLEMENTS INCENTIVE AND PUNITIVE MEASURES

TO INCREASE ACCOUNTABILITY

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Mr.  Scolese,  when  instances  of  cost
growth  arise,  many  in  the  public  want  to  know  who  exactly  is  ac-
countable.  It  seems  that  assigning  accountability  can  be  difficult
when  there  are  a  number  of  contributing  factors  that  have  led  to
the  cost  growth,  but  the  desire  for  accountability  at  heart  is  based
on  the  belief  that  it  can  contribute  to  preventing  future  cost  and
schedule growth at the Agency.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

As  you  know,  in  trying  to  deal  with  such  growth  and  if  some
have  called  for  punitive  measures  and  some  have  called  for  pro-
viding  incentives  for  good  performance,  what  mechanisms  does
NASA  currently  have  for  penalizing  poor  cost  and  schedule  per-
formance, and conversely, what kinds of incentives does NASA pro-
vide for good performance?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  first  and  most  important  is,  as  you  said,  we
need  to  understand  what  caused  the  growth.  If  it  was  something
that  was  clearly  caused  by  the  project,  the  performance  of  the
project,  then,  indeed,  we  do  take  actions,  and  over  the  last  several
years,  over  the  life  cycle  of  projects  coming  to  completion  now,  we
have  replaced  probably  about  10  percent  of  our  project  managers.
So there is strong accountability there for performance, if it is due
to the project.

Oftentimes  it  is  not  due  to  the  project.  It  is  due  to  that  lack  of
stability,  it  is  due  to  unforeseen  technical  problems.  It  is  due  to
taking over a project that was originally in trouble. So first we look
at  what  the  causes  are  and  then  we  take  the  appropriate  actions
as needed.

In addition, we clearly hold accountable all of the people that are
in the project. If a contractor is not performing, we have award fee
scores.  How  much  additional  fee  or  how  much  fee  we  provide  to
them for their performance. Theoretically, if they were perfect, they
would  get  100  percent,  and  if  they  were  terrible,  they  would  get
zero percent. So we evaluate based on that.

I  do  want  to  say,  though,  that  when  we  do  that,  we  recognize
that many of the people, most of the people that are performing on
these projects are very good people. They have distinguished them-
selves  in  other  fields,  in  other  areas  within  NASA.  So  while  they
may  not  be  successful  here,  we  rely  on  our  people  to  do  our  mis-
sions.  Without  them  we  can’t  do  them.  We  rely  on  our  contractor
personnel and our partner personnel to do our missions.

So  when  we  do  have  to  take  action,  we  recognize  these  people
have distinguished themselves somewhere else, and we move them
onto other activities. So there is no public, you know, discussion of
this.  They  move  onto  other  things  where  they  were  at  one  time
very good.

But  overall  I  think  we  have  the  tools  to  reward  people  for  doing
good performance. We have the tools to penalize people and organi-
zations for doing bad performance.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. Scolese.
The Chair will now recognize Mr. Olson for five minutes.
Mr. OLSON. And thank you, Madam Chairwoman. With your per-
mission  I  would  like  to  extend  my  time  to  the  Ranking  Member  of
the Full Committee and a fellow Texan, Mr. Hall.

Mr.  HALL.  Thank  you.  I  am  not  sure  I  thank  you,  but  I  didn’t
get to hear all of the—but, you know, we have a problem. We have
a new Administrator coming aboard, and I don’t think there is any
secrets  that  Chair  Gordon  and  I  joined  as  Ranking  Member  re-
quested the President to maintain Mike Griffin, and I know every-
thing  he  did  was  not  perfect,  but  he  was  always  upright  with  us
and made projections that we doubted but understood. And we are
here with a four-year gap in there that concerns everybody, and we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

don’t  want  to  depend  on  nations  that  we  don’t  really  trust,  but  we
are under some type of contract with them now.

NASA’S PROBLEMS COULD BE FIXED WITH A SMALL

FRACTION OF STIMULUS

I understand the acting Administrator can tell us about that, but
I  guess  what  I  am  trying  to  say  is  that,  ‘‘be  not  the  first  by  whom
the new is tried nor yet the last to lay the old aside.’’ I don’t know
about  the  lone  experience  of  schedule  and  cost  growth  and  very
complex  robotic  missions,  and  I  think  maybe  we  ought  to  just  im-
pose higher costs and schedules there in the projects’ outset at the
very  beginning  rather  than  trying  to  squeeze  in  too  small  reserves
when the project encounters difficulties.

But no matter what, where we are now and we need to somehow
squeeze  together  those  four  years  between  the  time  that  we  can
quit  using  Discovery  and  Endeavor  and  Atlantis,  and  get  the
project  Constellation  underway.  Somehow—and  with  the  minute
budget  compared  to  the  overall  budget  that  we  extract  for  this
project, it just seems to make sense to me, and with the offsets of—
and  the  $850  billion  expenditure  and  throwaway  that  the  former
President  launched  and  the  stimulus  program  of  $700  or  $800  bil-
lion.  It  makes  our  project  look  like  a  very  small  cost  and  easy  to
add to.

So  I  hope  that  we  can  all  get  together  and  push  and  carry  out
the  program  that  had  been  set  forward.  The—and  the  hopes  are—
and  it  makes  our  expenditures  look  minute  compared  to  the  give-
aways and the waste-aways and the throw-aways that they are, be-
cause  I  believe  Jay  Leno  was  right  when  he  said  that  he  thought
the  automobile-makers  ought  to  keep  on  making  automobiles  and
those guys on Wall Street ought to start making license tags.

But  we  have  such  a  small  comparative  budget  and  request  for
such an important program project. I just hope we will be more re-
alistic in our approaches. And I didn’t get to hear all the testimony,
but that is the only thing I can offer.

I yield back and thank you, Madam Chair.
Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Hall.  I  think  everyone
on this committee agrees that we always look forward to your com-
ments and you’re an incredible asset to this subcommittee.

The  Chair  will  now  recognize  Ms.  Fudge,  who  has  Glenn  in  her

district. Ms. Fudge, please.

COST MANAGEMENT OF HUMAN FLIGHT MISSIONS

COMPARED TO ROBOTIC MISSIONS

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you, Madam Chair.
My  first  question  is  for  Mr.  Scolese.  Are—do  you  believe  that
human space flight projects are likely to encounter cost and sched-
ule  growth?  Are  they  more  likely  than  if  you  use  robotic  science
projects?

Mr. SCOLESE. I don’t think they are inherently different in terms
of their purpose, but the difference is with human space flight pro-
grams  we  tend  to  do  developments  on  such  long  time  scales  that
they are separated by such a large amount of time. We started de-
signing  the  Shuttle  in  the  1970s  and  began  flying  it  in  the  1980s.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

We  did  the  Station  in  the  1990s,  and  we  are  doing  Constellation
now in the 2000s. And that presents some challenges because with
robotic  missions  we  tend  to  do  several  per  year.  With  our  aero-
nautics activities we tend to do several per year.

So  we  don’t  have  as  strong  a  historical  database  to  allow  us  to
make  the  predictions  that  we  can  do  with  the  robotic  missions.  So
from  that  standpoint  I  think  we  have  greater  uncertainties  in  our
initial estimates for the human missions than we do for the robotic
missions,  but  that  is  because  we  haven’t  done  so  many  of  them.
You can basically count on one hand all the human missions or the
human  space  flight  activities  that  we  have  done  in  the  four  dec-
ades, five decades that the space program has been around.

So  that  presents  a  challenge  for  us.  But  to  say  that  they  are  in-
herently  different  or  that  one  can  do  different  things  than  the
other, that is certainly true, but that doesn’t add to it. It is the fact
that  we  don’t  do  as  many  human  missions  as  we  do  robotic  mis-
sions.

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you. Mr. Pulliam——
Mr. PULLIAM. Yes, ma’am.

SHOULD NASA FREEZE COST ESTIMATE DESIGN?

Ms.  FUDGE.—you  stated  in  your  testimony  that  the  initial  cost
estimate  is  not  representative  of  the  final  as  built  configuration
due  to  required  changes.  Should  NASA  either  freeze  requirements
early  on  or  not  proceed  to  implementation  until  it  establishes
greater knowledge of requirements and the resources needed?

Mr. PULLIAM. Thank you. It is among the most difficult problems
to  try  to  solve  at  NASA  or  other  agencies  spending  taxpayer  dol-
lars. As we noted, when you start a program, you don’t know every-
thing  that  you  need  to  know  to  execute  that  program.  Sometimes
the  technologies  just  are  in  development,  and  that  goes  the  way  it
goes.

There is this optimism at the beginning. That is in part fostered
by an increasingly competitive environment for NASA programs, so
contractors and bidders are likely to bid more and more against the
mission that is available. That contributes to optimism.

So  while  one  could  just  freeze  design  and  say  we  are  not  going
to allow any of this, our view is you would wind up not being able
to  accomplish  the  mission  that  is  so  important  to  NASA,  and  that
is to put the world’s best technology up for the benefit of mankind.
So it is a difficult dilemma, that the answer in our view is some-
where along the way. You have to manage this technology maturity
in  a  planned  organizational  way,  understand  the  path  that  tech-
nology maturity is on, and understand the changes that accompany
that  to  both  your  cost  and  your  schedule.  And  then  as  NASA  has
stated, confirm that baseline at some point, at which time you have
an executable program.

So  we  wouldn’t  suggest  that  technology  just  continues  to  roam
indefinitely,  nor  would  we  suggest  locking  it  down  so  early  solely
for  the  benefit  of  cost  and  schedule  because  you  would  lose  out  on
what you are trying to accomplish to some extent.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

LONG-DURATION HUMAN SPACE FLIGHT AND ITS EFFECT ON

COST

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you. And this is for any member of the panel.
Certainly  assuring  the  health  and  safety  of  our  crews  is  critical  to
the  success  of  NASA’s  exploration  mission,  and  I  guess  because  of
NASA Glenn, we have had some discussions about the lack of time-
ly  demonstrations  of  hardware  and  techniques  to  mitigate  the  ad-
verse effects of long duration space flights.

Does that cost become one of the costs that you can’t contain, or
is  that  one  of  the  issues  that  arises  that  creates  some  growth  in
the cost?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  It  certainly  could,  and  that  is  one  of  the  things
that, of course, we have to address if we are going to do long-dura-
tion  space  flight.  The  Space  Station  is  the  tool  to  help  us  do  that,
and the better we can utilize it, the better we can retire those risks
and develop better cost estimations, schedule estimates, and better
estimates overall about when we can start sending people on those
long-duration missions beyond low Earth orbit.

So, yes, it does add an uncertainty to what we are doing. We are
looking  at  that  for  the,  you  know,  utilization  of  the  Space  Station.
I  am  certain  some  of  the  efforts  that  Glenn  is  pursuing  in  those
areas would be included in that.

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you, Madam Chair. I yield back.
Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Great. Thank you, Ms. Fudge.
Mr. Olson, please.

SHRINKING INDUSTRIAL BASE ADDS TO COST

Mr.  OLSON.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairwoman.  And,  Mr.  Scolese,
I  have  a  question  for  you.  In  your  opening  statement  you  men-
tioned the issues with the American industrial base, and I was just
wondering if you could elaborate on the impact that a dwindling in-
dustrial  base  has  on  NASA  and  its  maintaining  a  cost-effective
schedule.

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes,  sir.  As  the  industrial  base  has  collapsed,  of
course,  one  of  the  initial  or  I  shouldn’t  say  collapsed.  That  is  too
strong  of  a  word.  As  the  industrial  base  has  shrunk  and  consoli-
dated  that  provides  us  less  opportunity  for  competition.  So  often-
times  we  have  to  go  with  the  supplier  that  exists,  and  we  don’t
have a choice.

The  bigger  problem  probably  is  the  loss  of  expertise  that  was
mentioned  earlier  in  the  opening  statements.  We  don’t  have  as
many  scientists  and  engineers  and  technicians  to  go  off  and  build
our instruments, build our spacecraft, build the components that go
into those instruments or spacecraft, and that has created some de-
gree of a problem for us.

In  addition,  it  has  some  unintended  consequences  because  we
have  to  go  overseas  for  many  of  our  components,  and  that,  of
course, hurts American industry.

A  third  factor  that  plays  into  this  is  with  lack  of  some  parts  we
have  had  a  rise  in  the  number  of  counterfeit  parts,  things  that  we
can’t deal with. This is a worldwide problem. It is not a U.S. prob-
lem. This is a worldwide problem, and in dealing with that you find
out  late  typically  when  you  get  counterfeit  parts.  We  do  inspec-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

tions,  we  do  all  the  things  that  you  are  supposed  to  do.  That  adds
cost  clearly,  but  when  you  find  out  about  them,  if  you  don’t  find
out  about  them  at  receipt,  you  find  out  about  it  when  you  are  in
test  or  you  find  out  about  it  when  you  are  sitting  on  top  of  the
rocket  or  worse,  you  find  out  about  it  when  you  are  in  space.  And
all of those have cost implications.

One  of  the  things  that  could  help  that,  of  course,  is  having,  you
know, more missions that are available along the lines of what we
are talking about here. If we can reduce our costs, improve our cost
estimations,  we  can  provide,  you  know,  opportunities  to  do  that.
But I think what I said pretty much summarizes the concerns that
we see with the consolidation of the industrial base.

GROWING AMERICAN INDUSTRIAL BASE MEANS CHANGES TO

ITAR

Mr.  OLSON.  Thank  you  very  much.  In  addition  to  having  more
missions, any suggestions what we can do as a nation to help grow
the American industrial base to ensure we are competitive and we
have  the  capacity  here  in  America  to  perform  the  missions  that
NASA performs?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes,  sir.  One  area  clearly  is,  I  believe  there  was
a hearing last week about the ITAR activities, and we are all very
concerned  about  our  national  defense  and  recognize  what  ITAR’s
purpose  is.  But  its  implementation  has  been,  has  had  an  effect,  a
negative  effect  on  our  ability  of  our  industry  to  compete  overseas.
It has also made it very difficult for us as the Nation’s Space Pro-
gram to also work with our partners overseas because we can’t nec-
essarily  share  information  with  them  in  ways  that  are  as  effective
as  they  could  be.  It  has  also  delayed  our  ability  to  make  agree-
ments,  which  has  caused  cost  growth  that  we  have  talked  about.
When  it  takes  a  year  or  two  to  come  to  an  agreement  about  a
mission that you have agreed to do, you have clearly built risk into
it as you can’t talk to the international organizations that are pro-
viding  resources.  But  for  our  industry  they  lack  the  ability  to  go
off  and  compete  because  a  contract  on  a  communications  satellite
usually  has  about  what,  30  days  or  60  days,  to  put  in  a  bid.  It
takes that long to get through the process.

So reducing some of those requirements or streamlining the proc-
ess,  and  there  is  other  people  that  know  more  about  it  than  I  do,
could  certainly  help  our  industrial  base  be  able  to  compete  on  the
open market.

EXTERNAL FACTORS IN NASA’S COST GROWTH

Mr. OLSON. Thank you for that question. That is a nice segue to
my  final  question  here,  but  in  your  testimony  you  indicated  that
ten of the projects that—of the ten projects that exceeded the costs
five  of  those  were  due  to  external  factors  out  of  NASA’s  control.
The ITAR thing is probably a great example.

What  are  these  external  factors?  Could  you  elaborate,  and  what

can we do to help mitigate?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  not  all  can  be  mitigated  easily.  Three  of
them,  I  think  four  of  them,  in  fact,  were  due  to  issues  with  either
the  launch  manifest  or  with  partner  performance,  and  we  have  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

backed up launch manifest right now. Two of the missions were de-
livered  on  time  and  unfortunately,  the  launch  manifest  is  backed
up  to  the  point  where  one,  the  solar  dynamics  observatory  will  be
delayed  almost  a  year.  That  is  something  that  we  couldn’t  foresee.
We  are,  of  course,  working  with  our  colleagues  in  the  Defense  De-
partment  and  the  commercial  industry  to  try  and  improve  the
launch  manifest  to  improve  our  launch  posture,  but  that  is  one
area where we could, you know, clearly see some help.

The  other  missions  were  affected  by  partner  performance,  inter-
national or U.S. partner performance, where they ran into difficul-
ties  that  were  unforeseen  to  us,  and  I  am  not  sure  there  is  much
more  that  could  be  done  that  we  haven’t  talked  about.  They  have
the  same  issues  as  was  mentioned  earlier  that  we  do  in  terms  of
optimism  and  over-estimation,  as  well  as  stability  of  their  funding
requirements.

And in at least one case it was due to, you know, industrial con-
cerns,  where,  you  know,  if  you  went  to  a  government  lab  or  you
went  to  a  university  or  you  went  to  industry,  you  might  have  had
the  same  problems  because  of  the  lack  of  expertise.  But  that  was
an issue that we experienced.

So it was those three things; the launch manifest, which is some-
thing  we  can  do  by,  you  know,  encouraging  a  robust  launch  capa-
bility  in  this  country,  by  partner  issues,  which  were  for  a  variety
of different reasons that could have been unforeseen.

Mr. OLSON. Thank you very much, and I yield my time.
Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Great. Thank you, Mr. Olson.
And  just  for  the  record,  I  think  it  is  important  to  note  that  Mr.
Olson and all of these Members down on this side either represent
a  NASA  center  or  are  adjacent  to  a  NASA  center  and  have  NASA
employees in it.

And with that, Mr. Griffith, who represents Marshall.

NASA SUCCESS HAS LED TO HEIGHTENED PUBLIC

EXPECTATIONS

Mr.  GRIFFITH.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair,  and  thank  you,  panel,
for  being  here,  and  I  would  like  to  make  a  comment.  Many  of  the
questions that I had have been asked.

One  of  the  frustrations  that  I  think  that  we  are  hearing  is  that
cost overruns are inherent in any scientific endeavor. They are not
budgeted,  cannot  be  budgeted.  Burn  rates  for  discovering  the  un-
known are going to be there. We understand that. I think it is un-
fortunate  in  a  way  that  NASA  has  been  so  successful,  has  held
themselves to such a standard of excellence that the general public
expects  that  NASA  is  like  starting  their  car  in  the  morning.  And
that is really not that much science to it anymore, and there is not
that much danger anymore, and there is not that much that really
goes  into  it.  We  are  just  building  rockets  and  exploding  them  into
space.

Nothing could be further from the truth. We are still on the fron-
tier.  China  walked  in  space  two  months  ago.  Japan  is  on  the  way
up, India is on the way up, Russia, of course, has been up. For the
last  50  years  NASA  has  established  excellence  in  the  pursuit  of
science  and  now  you  are  going  to  become  part  of  the  high  ground
and  the  national  defense.  I  expect  there  to  be  cost  overruns,  not

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

only  for  safety  issues  but  because  we  are  going  to  be  pushing  the
envelope because we will remain number one in space.

So  I  think  my  question  to  you  would  be  can  we  do  a  better  job
letting the public know what a huge scientific endeavor this is and
how much we really don’t know when we send humans into space?
And  can  we  maybe  reeducate  the  public  that  we  are  on  the  great
frontier  again,  trying  to  achieve  the  high  ground,  competing  not
only  with  Russia  now  but  China,  India,  Japan,  and  certainly  oth-
ers?

So  I  appreciate  our  attention  to  the  detail  of  costs,  but  when  we
were discovering the vaccine for polio, we did not ask that question.
We needed Dr. Salk and Dr. Sabin to get that polio vaccine. I think
we  are  going  to  have  the  same  attitude  towards  NASA.  We  want
you  to  do  what  you  need  to  do,  and  we  want  to  help  you  do  that,
so  my  question  is  can  we  educate  the  public  so  they  are  not  frus-
trated  about  the  scientific  method?  And  the  other  thing,  what  can
we do to help you?

And thank you very much, and I will yield my time.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  thank  you  for  that.  I  think  if  we  could  copy
that speech we would go a long way towards addressing that ques-
tion,  and  you  bring  up,  you  know—actually  I  only  want  to  correct
one  thing  that  you  said.  We  don’t  like  to  explode  our  things  into
space.

But  you  bring  up,  you  know,  a  very  important  point.  We  can’t
lose sight of the need for mission success or safety. We have to bal-
ance  the  success  of  the  mission,  the  risk  of  the  mission  with  the
cost  and  the  schedule.  We  can’t  focus  on  any  one  of  those  three  or
four items in order to be successful.

And,  yes,  sir,  we  can  do  a  better  job  of  explaining  that,  and  we

will.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. Griffith.
Mr. McCaul, please.
Mr. MCCAUL. Thank you, Madam Chair, and let me congratulate

you and the Ranking Member on your new positions and——

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you.

GAO RECOMMENDATIONS FOR NASA’S FUTURE HUMAN

SPACE FLIGHT

Mr. MCCAUL.—we are very excited to have you.
And  you,  Mr.  Scolese,  in  your  new  position.  I  have  two  areas  of
questioning.  The  first  I  think  one  of  the  greatest—and  NASA  has
many missions, but I think one of—the one with the greatest vision
is the one of going to the moon, Mars and beyond. There is a prov-
erbs  quote  up  here,  ‘‘Where  there  is  no  vision,  the  people  perish.’’
This  is  the  greatest  vision  for  mankind.  It  was  Kennedy’s  vision.
This  has  been  estimated  to  cost  about  $100  billion  over  the  next
13 years, and the Chair of this committee, Bart Gordon, took a look
at GAO’s recommendations and said that they were common sense
and hopes that you at NASA will take a look at these recommenda-
tions and implement them. And hopes that you will take these seri-
ously.

I  want  to  just  get  your  initial—Ms.  Chaplain,  if  you  could  just
briefly  summarize  the  recommendations  as  they  pertain  to  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

specific  mission,  and  Mr.  Scolese,  how  you  intend  to  work  with
GAO on that.

Ms. CHAPLAIN. Our recommendations have been pretty consistent
across a lot of projects. Basically we would like to see NASA push-
ing technology is one thing, and they have, each project has two to
five  years  to  do  that  and  to  learn  about  what  they  are  doing  and
to set requirements. But when they get to the point where they are
ready  to  commit  to  Congress  and  get  authorized  to  move  ahead  as
a formal program, that is where we would like to see requirements
get settled and technology to be understood.

If that happens, you have a very solid foundation for moving for-
ward.  So  I  don’t  want  there  to  be  a  misunderstanding  that  GAO
is saying there is a bad thing to have cost growth and lots of things
going on when you are trying to learn to do something that hadn’t
done,  been  done  before.  We  really  encourage  that  to  happen,  but
there  is  a  time  and  place  for  that  to  happen.  Once  a  program  is
ready to move forward, you do need stability to make it executable.
And  I  think,  you  know,  across  the  board  NASA  has  consistently
agreed  with  these  recommendations.  It  has  built  it  into  its  policy.
It  is  reflected  in  a  lot  of  the  actions  it  is  undertaking  right  now.
So the thing to do is just to sustain the attention to these improve-
ment  efforts  and  to  adhere  to  these  good  practices  that  are  re-
flected  in  their  policies  going  forward,  especially  with  these  big
ticket  programs  that  are  ready  to  enter  these  implementation
phases, including areas of Orion, James Webb Telescope.

Mr. MCCAUL. Okay. Mr. Scolese.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  I  think  Cristina  said  it  right.  We  are—we  have
taken those seriously. We are working on all of those. I would like
to  add  one  of  the  things  that  we  are  doing  to  make  sure  that  we
are,  in  fact,  implementing  that  guidance  or  something  that  resem-
bles that guidance, because we do conduct our independent reviews
at each milestone to make sure that, in fact, we are doing what we
said we were going to do, and we have independent people looking
at  it.  And  then  we  monitor  that  monthly  to  go  off  and  make  sure
that all the pieces are still coming together.

One of the challenges that we have is the stability, and it is get-
ting to the point where we can make that commitment. As you can
imagine as you are maturing your requirements and maturing your
technologies, there is a lot of people that want you to go faster and
commit  sooner.  We  can’t  take  forever.  We  recognize  that,  but  we
need  to  be  able  to  take  the  time  to  get  that  done,  and  the  support
that we can get to allow us to do that would be greatly appreciated.
And  it  typically  takes,  you  know,  sometimes  two,  three,  and  in
some  cases  as  in  the  JWST,  James  Webb  Space  Telescope,  took  us
almost a decade to get to a point where we felt we had technologies
mature  enough  to  proceed,  which  we  really  just  decided  on  this
year.

Mr.  MCCAUL.  Now,  I  just  want  to  let  you  know,  we  in  the  Con-
gress  support  you  in  that  effort  and  stay  in  close  communication
with us.

COST OVERRUNS IN CLIMATE CHANGE MISSIONS

Lastly on—in the stimulus bill there was money appropriated for
the  purpose  of  climate  change.  Can  you,  Ms.  Chaplain,  speak  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

prior programs related to this, that particular mission and some of
the cost overruns? Specifically I know the Glory Program had some
cost overruns.

Ms.  CHAPLAIN.  Yeah.  Several  of  the  climate  and  environmental
programs  have  had  cost  overruns.  A  lot  of  them  have  been  attrib-
utable  to  contractor  performance  and  not  really  recognizing  that
the  contractor  may  not  have  had  the  expertise  to  develop  some  of
the  key  sensors  for  satellites.  What  we  would  like  to  see  is  more
attention paid up-front into what contractors can do and cannot do
and  to  make  sure  you  have  a  plan  for  dealing  with  any  risks  that
you see in the contractor.

We  also  like  to  see  with  these  programs  more  stability  with  re-
quirements  once  they  start,  and  we  also  would  like  to  see  not  too
many  expectations  placed  on  any  one  program.  The  NPOESS  Pro-
gram, for example, has more than ten sensors on it, makes it very
difficult  to  design  and  execute  that  program  with  so  many  sensors
and  so  many  problems  associated  with  each  one  of  them  and  the
integration process and so forth.

So there is a lot of risks associated with these kinds of satellites

but a lot that can be done to mitigate those risks.

Mr. MCCAUL. Thank you, Madam Chair.
Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. McCaul.
Another  terrific  asset  we  have  on  this  subcommittee  is  Ms.  Ed-
wards, who used to work at Goddard and now represents the inter-
ests of Goddard, so, please, five minutes.

Ms.  EDWARDS.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairwoman,  and  thank  you

to the panel.

CONTRACTOR PERFORMANCE CONTRIBUTES TO COST

OVERRUNS

I  just  want  to  focus  this  morning  on  contractor  performance  and
the  ways  in  which  contractor  performance  contributes  to  over-
running  cost  estimates,  and  so  Mr.  Scolese,  I  think  you  came  to
Goddard  just  as  I  was  departing  Goddard,  and  Ms.  Chaplain,  both
of you in your testimony talked about that. And so I am wondering
what  there  is  about  contractor  performance  and  whether  there  are
positive incentives and not just negative incentives to increase per-
formance  to  contract  and  to  avoid  overruns,  and  then  secondly,  I
wonder  if  you  could  speak  to  the  internal  capacity  at  NASA  that
actually  might  help  us  better  oversee  some  of  the  highly-technical
and scientific projects in which NASA is engaged.

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes. In regard to the contracts and what our mech-
anisms are, we do have positive feedback mechanisms. I mentioned
earlier  that  many  of  our  contracts  have  award  fee  provisions,  and
that  allows  us  to  reward  performance  periodically  all  the  way  up
until  in  many  cases  the  end  of  the  planned  mission  life.  So  even
if—after it is launched, we can still go off and say, if you performed
well, you can get, you know, a fee on that performance.

So we have the positive incentives to go off and do that, and also
it  can  serve  as  a  negative  incentive  by  getting  lower  scores.  So  we
do  try  and  find  ways  to  motivate  and  reward,  you  know,  perform-
ance.  We  do  the  same  with  our  civil  servants  as  you  know,  al-
though  it  is  not  quite  the  same  as  that,  with  awards  and  metals
and monetary awards when that is appropriate.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

So  I  think  we  have,  you  know,  many  of  the  incentives  in  place,
and  of  course,  one  of  the  biggest  incentives  for  both  the  contractor
and  the  team  that  is  doing  it  is  to  see  the  successful  performance
of  the  mission.  You  know,  oftentimes,  you  know,  it  is  answering  a
scientific  question  that  hasn’t  been  asked  before,  and  the  results
can  yield  as  they  did  with  COBE  with  a  Nobel  Prize.  So  there  is
some great rewards that come from the scientific discovers that can
be made.

NASA’S CIVIL SERVANT CAPACITY TO PROVIDE

TECHNOLOGICAL EXPERTISE

Ms.  EDWARDS.  But  does—what  I  wonder,  though,  is  internally
within the civil servant component of NASA, of the Agency, do you
have the capacity to provide the kind of technological expertise that
is  needed  over  these  projects  to  ask  the  right  questions  of  contrac-
tors over the lifespan of a project to ensure that we are, you know,
tamping  down  on  costs  where  necessary  and  estimating  what  the
overall cost of the project will be?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes.  I  do  believe  that  we  have  that.  We  have,  you
know,  a  very  good  workforce.  What  we  haven’t  always  given  them
is the tools and the support that they needed. We have, as you well
know,  some  of  the  brightest  people  around  that  are  working  these
activities.

What we haven’t always done is the things that I tried to outline
here  is  give  them  a  forum  to  speak  up  when  they  have  issues,  to
give  them  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  senior  management  who
could  do  things,  whether  it  is  adding  additional  resources,  addi-
tional people if the project needs additional people, additional tech-
nical  expertise  if  we  need  additional  technical  expertise.  We  can
reach  into  the  Agency  at  other  centers.  That  is  often  been  a  prob-
lem  where  centers  don’t  know  what  each  other’s  capabilities  are.
We  have  broken  down  those  barriers  with  organizations  like  the
NASA  engineering  and  safety  center  so  that  we  can  go  off  and
share resources amongst the centers.

We also have the ability to go outside of the Agency to organiza-
tions like Aerospace Corporation and others. So we made that more
available to people.

In  addition,  by  having,  as  I  mentioned,  and  all  the  centers  now
do this, having monthly reviews or periodic reviews where you can
bring  up  issues  to  senior  management,  we  can  take  actions.  They
can  be  as  simple  as  picking  up  the  phone  and  calling  a  contractor
and  saying,  you  are  not  doing  what  we  think  you  should  be  doing,
and  here  is  why  and  having  the  details.  Or  it  could  be,  you  know,
more invasive than that.

NASA LIFE CYCLE PERFORMANCE

Ms. EDWARDS. Let me just interrupt you because I have probably
just  enough  time  for  this  last  thing,  and  that  is  whether  you  are
able  to—are  there  interim  assessments,  and  can  you  look  at  inter-
national agencies in addition to the Department of Defense to learn
about  where  you  can  better  assess  over  the  life  of  the  project
whether  you  are  meeting  cost  estimates.  And  so  looking  at  like
agencies  or  over  the  lifetime  of  a  project,  and  you  can  think  about

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

this later. I am looking, for example, at Landsat, and Landsat over
a period of time, are there things that we have learned about those
assessments that actually might help us for other projects.

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes.  In  fact,  we  are  doing  that.  We  have  been
doing  that,  and  we  are  going  to  embark  on  a  broader  study  to  go
off  and  look  at  performance  of  other  agencies  and  other  activities.
I  am  not  sure  that  we  could  get  the  information  on  the  inter-
national  ones,  but  we  will  certainly  go  off  and  look  and  see  if  that
is doable.

Ms. EDWARDS. Thank you.
Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Ms. Edwards.
Mr. Grayson.

FIRM-FIXED CONTRACTS INCENTIVE TO AVOID COST

OVERRUNS

Mr.  GRAYSON.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  Mr.  Scolese,  what  per-
centage  of  NASA’s  contract  dollars  are  spent  on  firm-fixed  priced
contracts?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  I  will  have  to  get  you  the  exact  details  on  that.  I
don’t have that off the top of my head, but I can tell you that where
we  can  do  firm-fixed  price  we  do,  and  I  can  give  you  a  couple  of
examples here and then for the record I will provide you with more
details.

On  the  tracking  and  data  relay  satellite  system,  communication
satellites,  those  were  fixed-price  contracts.  For  portions  of  the
GOES  satellite  that  we  do  for  NOAA,  those  were  fixed  price.  For
many  of  our  small  Explorer  missions  the  spacecraft  bus  is  often  a
fixed-price bus.

What  percentage  of  our  contracts  beyond—in  precise  terms  I

can’t give you off the top of my head and will get that to you.

Mr.  GRAYSON.  Well,  for  firm-fixed  price  contracts,  the  contractor

pays 100 percent of the cost of overruns. Correct?

Mr. SCOLESE. If it is caused by them. That is correct. Yes.
Mr.  GRAYSON.  And  for  cost  reimbursement  contracts,  the  con-
tractor  is  not  legally  obliged  to  pay  any  part  of  the  cost  overrun.
Is that correct?

Mr. SCOLESE. That is correct.
Mr.  GRAYSON.  So  is  it  fair  to  say  that  if  NASA  did  more  firm-
fixed  price  contracts  we  would  be  giving  the  contractor  an  incen-
tive, a real incentive to avoid cost overruns?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  We  look  very  carefully  at  what  type  of  a  contract
we  use  to  try  and  balance  the  risk  that  is  going  to  be  in  there.
Typically we do firm-fixed price contracts when we understand the
requirements  so  that  a  contractor  will,  in  fact,  bid  on  it  and  know
that they have a chance of being successful.

We  use  cost  reimbursement  type  contracts  when  there  is  some
uncertainty  in  the,  in  either  the  requirements  that  we  have  or  in
the ability to perform. So we do a very careful risk benefit relation-
ship. Where possible and as often as possible we try and use fixed-
price contracts. But that isn’t the only remedy that we can use.

Mr. GRAYSON. Mr. Scolese, it seems that have here two extremes.
We  have  one  condition  where  the  contractor  pays  all  the  cost  of
overruns.  The  other  condition  where  the  contractor  is  legally

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

obliged  to  pay  none  of  the  cost  of  overruns.  Wouldn’t  it  be  useful
to have something in-between?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  in  fact,  we  actually  do  try  and  work  that
way,  and  I  just  want  to,  you  know,  on  the  firm-fixed  price,  if  we
change something, we pay. If they can’t meet the original specifica-
tion,  they  pay.  And,  yes,  I  mean,  we  actually  try  and  work  those
cost  reimbursable  contracts  where  we  have  negotiations,  they  will
not  be  reimbursed  for  all  the  costs  if  we  feel  it  was  their  fault  to
cause  it.  We  can’t  guarantee  that  at  the  beginning  of  the  contract
or we can’t guarantee that at the beginning of the negotiations. But
we do work hard to try and make that stick and to assign responsi-
bility where responsibility lies.

Mr.  GRAYSON.  What  percentage  of  NASA’s  contracts,  if  any,  are
awarded  under  invitations  for  bids,  sealed  bids,  rather  than
through competitive proposals?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  I  don’t  have  the  answer  to  that.  Most  of  our  stuff
is  done  competitively,  but  there  may  be  some  institutional  activi-
ties  that  are  done  by  sealed  bids.  I  can’t  answer  that  off  the  top
of my head.

Mr.  GRAYSON.  Now,  when  there  are  competitive  proposals  which
I  am  sure  you  will  agree  is  the  predominant  form  of  NASA’s  con-
tracting, when there are competitive proposal’s, there is a cost tech-
nical tradeoff in those proposals. Correct?

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes.
Mr.  GRAYSON.  All  right.  Now,  you  can  correct  me  if  I  am  wrong,
but I believe that there is nothing in the statutes that indicates to
NASA what that tradeoff should be. Is that correct?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  What  the  tradeoff  between  the  cost  and  the  tech-

Mr. GRAYSON. Right. How much of an emphasis should be put on

nical should be?

cost versus technical?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  No.  We—there  isn’t  a  statute  for  that.  We  deter-

mine that before the contract is released for bid.

Mr.  GRAYSON.  Right.  But  the  Agency  determines  that  in  its  sole

discretion without any guidance from us. Correct?

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes. That is correct.
Mr.  GRAYSON.  Now,  if  we  were  trying  to  save  money,  it  seems
that  one  way  we  could  try  to  do  that  would  be  to  emphasize  cost
more in this cost technical tradeoff. Is that a fair statement?

Mr. SCOLESE. Well, we do emphasize cost. It is a fair statement,
but we have to manage the cost and the schedule and the risk and
the  technical  performance.  All  of  those  factors  have  to  be  consid-
ered. Yes.

Mr. GRAYSON. Now, returning again to the tradeoff between hav-
ing  a  firm-fixed  price  contract  where  the  contractor  bears  the  risk
and  the  cost  reimbursement  contract  where  the  contractor  legally
bears  none  of  the  risk,  apart  from  the  question  of  whether  we
should  have  something  between  those  two,  would  you  agree  with
me  that  now  it  is  the  Agency  that  makes  that  decision  and  not
Congress?

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes. I would agree with that.
Mr.  GRAYSON.  All  right.  Now,  again,  if  we  were  trying  to  avoid
cost  overruns,  do  you  think  it  might  be  a  good  idea  for  us  to  give
you  some  direction  about  when  to  use  a  cost  reimbursement  con-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

tract  and  when  to  have  the  contractor  bear  the  risk  of  the  cost
overrun?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  No,  sir.  I  think,  you  know,  those  are  very  difficult
decisions  that  have  to  be  made  as  we  are  developing  our  require-
ments,  and  you  know,  when  we  have  very  stable  requirements,
firm-fixed  price  contracts  are  absolutely  the  right  thing  to  do.  And
that determination, as was mentioned earlier, comes after we have
done some definition of what it is that we want to achieve. And as
I  tried  to  mention  earlier,  we  do,  in  fact,  do  that.  Many  of  our
spacecraft for the small Explorers as an example are, in fact, firm-
fixed price because we understand our requirements very well. And
we have good performance there.

So  I  think  it  is  going  to  be,  it  would  be  very  difficult  to  look  at
each  and  every  one  of  our  missions  to  try  and  determine  which
should  be  firm-fixed  price,  which  should  be  cost  plus,  and  which
portion of the mission should be firm-fixed price and which portion
should be cost plus. Because in any given mission you will have dif-
ferent types of contracts for different components that are being de-
livered.

Mr. GRAYSON. Thank you. I will look forward to receiving the in-

formation that you promised.

Thank you, Madam Chairwoman.
Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Mr. Grayson.
Now we have Ms. Kosmas with us, also a Central Floridian, rep-

resenting the Kennedy Space Center.

MORE COST OVERRUNS FLEXIBILITY IN HUMAN SPACE

FLIGHT

Ms.  KOSMAS.  Thank  you.  I  am  honored  to  be  here.  Thank  you,

Madam Chair, and thank you to the panel for being here.

I  want  to  start  by  saying  I  am  very  excited  to  be  representing
the  Kennedy  Space  Center  and  thrilled  to  have  been  a  neighbor
and watched the launches for 35 years in my time in Central Flor-
ida.

I  want  also  to  echo  the  comments  made  by  Parker  Griffith,  my
colleague here, about how it is very important to me that we main-
tain  the  U.S.  supremacy  in  man  space  exploration  specifically  and
also the other areas in which we use space exploration, whether it
is  for  national  defense,  whether  it  is  for  environment,  whether  it
is  for  weather  prediction,  or  whatever  the  use  might  be,  but  man
space flight, of course, is of a high interest to me.

So  with  reference  to  the  comments  made  by  Congressman  Gray-
son and the cost analysis, would you say that you put a greater em-
phasis  or  that  you  allow  a  greater  latitude  or  flexibility  in  terms
of  cost  overruns  when  there  is  a  significant  safety  factor  involved,
particularly with regard to human space flight?

Mr. SCOLESE. Well, certainly that goes exactly to the risk discus-
sion that we were just talking about. Clearly, if we have a mission,
we err on the side of safety. There is no question about that. Clear-
ly  we  can’t  allow  it  to  go  so  far  beyond  what  our  ability  to  pay  is,
and  we  would  have  to  take  a  step  back  and  see  if  we  are  doing  it
the  right  way  and  ask  that  question.  But  clearly  we  are  not  going
to scrimp when it comes to safety.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Ms.  KOSMAS.  Well,  good.  I  mean,  I  assumed  that  to  be  the  case,

but I thought it needed to be pointed out perhaps——

Mr. SCOLESE. Thank you.

A FIXED DATE TO END THE SPACE SHUTTLE INCREASE COST

STABILITY

Ms. KOSMAS.—that that is an area in which cost overruns maybe
are—we  have  learned  from  experience  that  certain  things  require
greater care in terms of the safety risk factor.

Which brings me to the second part of my question which has to
do  with,  in  my  district,  of  course,  we  are  concerned  about  the  end
of  the  Shuttle  launch  and  the  beginning  of  the  Constellation  Pro-
gram  and  the  difficulties  that  that  poses  for  us  in  maintaining  a
professional workforce in the area. And wanted to ask you with re-
gard to the safety aspect of putting a hard and fast date on the end
of  the  Shuttle  Program,  do  you  think  that  that  is  a  wise  thing  to
do?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  I  won’t  comment  on  the  wise  part,  but  I  will  say
that clearly that having a fixed date adds to the, one of the things
that  we  mentioned  earlier,  which  is  stability.  We  need  that  same
workforce,  portions  of  that  same  workforce,  to  go  off  and  build  the
next  system,  design  the  next  system,  test  the  next  system.  So  we
need  to  move  some  of  those  talented  people  over  to  that  activity.
They  are  doing  a  wonderful  job  in  flying  the  Shuttle,  but  we  also
need them in other areas as well. So we need to start transitioning
some of those people over.

We  also  need  some  of  those  facilities.  As  you  know,  you  were
down  there  just  recently,  and  you  saw  the  three  lightening  towers
going up on 39B. We need to have those facilities available to begin
launching the new systems.

So  from  a  stability  standpoint,  from  a  risk  standpoint,  having  a
fixed date to allow us to start transitioning those people and those
resources is important to us, and I think 2010, is a reasonable date
for  us  to  go  off  and  do  that  by.  We  have,  as  you  know,  we  have
the  hardware  to  get  us  there.  We  would  have  to  build  additional
external  tanks  to  go  beyond  that,  but  so  I  think  2010,  is  a  reason-
able  date,  and  it  provides  us  a  reasonable  risk  posture  to  proceed.
Ms.  KOSMAS.  You  think  it  does  provide  a  reasonable  risk

posture——

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes.
Ms. KOSMAS.—for you to proceed? Okay.
Mr. SCOLESE. Yes.
Ms. KOSMAS. Given the flexibility shall we say and time for rock-
et  launches  to  take  off  and  that  provides  a  flexibility  in  time,  how
much flexibility do you think would be reasonable past 2010?

Mr. SCOLESE. You mean to fly the Shuttle or to——
Ms. KOSMAS. Yes. To fly the Shuttle.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  We  will  have  to  get  back  to  you  on  that.  We  have

a report actually that is coming in on——

Ms. KOSMAS. Okay.
Mr. SCOLESE.—the answer specifically that question.
Ms. KOSMAS. Okay. Thanks very much.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

HOW NEW CONTRACTING PROCEDURES WILL EFFECT NASA

56

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you, Ms. Kosmas. That completes
our first round of the questions. We know that votes will be called
very shortly, but we are going to attempt to do a second round.

So  with  that,  Mr.  Scolese,  President  Obama  yesterday  singed  a
Presidential  memorandum  to  overhaul  the  way  the  government
does its contracting. He indicated that your agency would be work-
ing with other agencies as well as OMB to come up with new proce-
dures and practices.

Can  you  tell  us  today  anything  about  the  impact  this  overhaul

will have on NASA contracting?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Actually,  we  took  a  quick  look  at  it,  and  we  think
that we are largely in line with the provisions in there, the utiliza-
tion  of  fixed-price  contracts  as  we  discussed  earlier.  We  do  that
where that is appropriate on space hardware as well as, you know,
institutional  items.  So  we  are  certainly  going  to  look  at  it  and  see
where we can improve.

The other provision to use competition we regularly use competi-
tion  and  require  competitive  activities.  We  require  a  justification
when  we  do  not  use  competitive  bids,  so  we  do  that  where  there
is one supplier, for instance, as is the case for large solids, the first
stage of the Ares vehicle. There is only one supplier of large solids,
so we had to do fixed price or, I mean, sole source there.

But predominantly we use competition, and then as far as the A–
176, we have had some experience with that but not as much, and
that  requires  a  little  bit  more  of  our  looking  at  it.  But  it  is  along
the lines of the way we have proceeded to maintain inherently gov-
ernmental responsibilities within the government.

NASA ADDRESSES LAUNCH CONFLICTS AND INCREASED

COST

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you,  and  our  subcommittee  will

likely have you come back and report on how things are going.

I  also  understand  that  NASA  is  very  concerned  as  is  indicated
by  your  testimony  earlier  about  the  crowded  manifest  for  launch
vehicles  in  2011,  and  the  fact  that  the  Mars  Science  Labs  launch
window that year will be very tight. Evidently NASA needs to con-
tend not only with the Juno Mission to Jupiter but also with DOD
launches as well.

However,  this  is  not  the  first  time  that  this  has  happened.  As
you  know,  launch  delays  increase  project  costs.  We  have  heard  a
bit  about  that,  but  what  is  NASA  doing  to  mitigate  launch  con-
flicts?

And  also,  Mr.  Pulliam,  based  on  the  Aerospace  Corporation’s
work  at  DOD,  what  can  NASA  do  better  to  mitigate  launch  con-
flicts,  and  is  this  problem  going  to  get  better,  or  is  it  going  to  get
worse?

Mr. SCOLESE. Well, what we are doing to resolve the problem is,
of  course,  we  are  working  with  United  Launch  Alliance,  we  are
working with our colleagues in the Department of Defense and De-
partment of Commerce to try and make sure that we have a mani-
fest  that  is  doable,  and  we—and  that  we  can  have  confidence  in.
We are behind right now. There is no question about it. The launch

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

manifest as you mentioned is backed up, causing some missions to
slip.

What  the  exact  way  to  fix  that  problem  is  going  to  take  some
time.  We  are  also  looking  within  NASA,  I  am  certain  you  have
heard  about  the  COTS  activities  and  about  our  launch  vehicle  on-
ramps  for  the  NASA  launch  services,  we  are  also  looking  at  other
suppliers  as  they  come  online  to  fly  our  vehicles.  And  where  part-
nerships make sense we use international launches on a not-for-fee
basis. That is their contribution to us.

So  we  are  looking  at  all  three  of  those  things;  working  with  our
colleagues  in  Defense  Department  and  ULA  to  improve  the  mani-
fest,  improve  the  capability  to  launch  more  frequently,  we  are  en-
couraging  the  development  of  other  launch  vehicles,  particularly
the  medium-class  launch  vehicle  that  will  end  when  the  Delta  II
stops producing, which carries most of our science payloads, and we
also, where it makes sense and where it is beneficial to the United
States, are looking at international launches as well.

Mr. PULLIAM. I would agree with the statements Chris has made.
You know, we see the clogging of the manifest just from inside the
DOD perspective even before you integrate the NASA launches into
that.  So  it  is  clear,  and  that  clogging  of  the  manifest  comes  and
goes  as  missions  encounter  these  difficulties  we  have  talked  about
and  perhaps  move  into  a  new  area  of  the  launch  manifest  where
maybe  it  wasn’t  so  bad  before.  Now  it  is  worse  than  you  thought.
So it is an ever-changing game. So even though we see a clogged
manifest in the future, that will change some as we approach it as
well.

I think the answers to it are as they are with most of these other
problems.  It  requires  a  very  close  interaction  between  NASA  and
the  DOD  on  which  instruments  need  to  go  when.  If  it  is  a  plan-
etary mission, then surely we need to hold onto those windows, lest
we  lose  two  years.  If  the  DOD  has  a  mission  that  is  more  impor-
tant  to  national  security,  then  perhaps  that  takes  the  precedence,
and  I  think  we  do  that  now.  So  that  coordination  and  cooperation
needs to continue.

And  then  finally  I  would  say  we  need  to  look  at  what  is  on  the
critical  path  as  we  try  to  use  our  facilities  in  the  most  efficient
way. Is it just the physical turn of the pad? Does it have something
to  do  with  range  capabilities?  You  know,  what  is  it  that  could  be
viewed  from  a  multi-user  perspective  to  see  if  we  want  to  operate
at  the  maximum  efficiency?  Are  we  doing  that  now?  Are  there  up-
grades  that  are  required?  Is  there  infrastructure  that  we  don’t
know  have,  and  to  look  far  enough  in  advance  to  know  what  that
is so that we don’t wind up just accepting whatever capacity there
happens  to  be,  perhaps  based  on  a  time  when  the  demand  wasn’t
quite so high.

Chairwoman GIFFORDS. Thank you.
Mr. Olson.
Mr.  OLSON.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairwoman,  and  Mr.  Scolese,

give you a little break.

Mr. Pulliam——
Mr. PULLIAM. My turn.
Mr. SCOLESE. Thank you.
Mr. OLSON. Spread the love a little bit so to speak.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

Mr. PULLIAM. Okay.
Mr.  OLSON.  Just  wanted  to  talk  about  NASA  and  in  comparison
to the Department of Defense, and in your testimony you compared
NASA  with  the  National  Security  Space  Community.  You  said
NASA  was  far  less,  received  requests  far  less  overall  support  from
the  Aerospace  Corporation  but  proportionately  more  programmatic
in budgeting support.
Mr. PULLIAM. Yes.

COMPARISON BETWEEN NASA AND DOD ON COST

ESTIMATING, BUDGETING, AND PROGRAMMATIC CONTROL

Mr.  OLSON.  And  so  between  NASA  and  the  National  Security
Space Community, who in your view does a better job with cost es-
timating,  budgeting,  maintaining  programmatic  control  over  their
programs?  What  are  the  differences,  and  why  do  you  think  those
differences exist?

Mr.  PULLIAM.  Thank  you.  It  is  true  that  the  predominant  cus-
tomer  for  the  Aerospace  Corporation  is  the  Department  of  Defense
Space  Program.  That  is  why  we  were  created  back  in  1960.  NASA
is  the  company’s  third  largest  customer  right  behind  DOD  and
NRO.  So  we  are  privileged  to  work  with  them,  and  we  did  want
to  make  the  point  that—and  we  think  it  accrues  to  NASA’s  credit
while  the  Air  Force  typically  uses  Aerospace  more  for  the  in-line,
hardcore  technical  and  scientific  kinds  of  things  that  we  are  ex-
pected  to  do,  NASA  has  that  capacity  more  capably  in  its  organic
workforce,  so  they  turn  to  Aerospace  as  we  would  expect  federal
agencies to do to see what we have that serves them in the accom-
plishment of their national mission.

And  that  has  turned  out  to  be  this  body  of  work  and  cost  esti-
mating,  looking  at  the  parameters  that  go  into  that,  and  we  think
NASA  in  partnership  with  Aerospace  is  doing  some  things  that
other  agencies  frankly  aren’t  doing.  And  it  is  going  to  pay  off,  and
we are going to see the dividends of that.

Which  organization  is  doing  best?  We  can  cite  examples  across
both  agencies  where  there  have  been  spectacular  failures  of  man-
aging  costs  and  schedule.  We  did  find  that  the  causes  and  funda-
mental  elements  seem  to  be  about  the  same.  The  Department  of
Defense uses other very capable contractors to help them with their
cost  estimating,  so  we  are  not  as  deeply  involved  with  them  as  we
are  with  NASA  in  trying  to  figure  out  the  doctrine  and  the  mana-
gerial techniques.

But  I  think  it  sounds  a  bit  like  a  cop-out,  but  I  think  the  agen-
cies  have  essentially  the  same  problems,  and  they  are  running  at
similar  kind  of  overhead  rates.  NASA  can  say,  yeah,  but  we  had
this  mission  that  really  pushes  the  science  in  a  way  that  no  other
mission  has.  DOD  can  respond  by  saying,  yeah,  but  we  have  this
multi-military  user  community  that  requires  things  to  change  in
technology and schedule and growth.

So it just needs to be managed uniquely from each agency’s per-
spective, but in full appreciation of best practices that might be out
there,  and  if  I  could  just  take  one  more  moment,  there  is  a  lot  of
really  fine  work  being  done  that  was  begun  at  the  GAO  and  has
migrated  into  NASA  and  to  the  Aerospace  Corporation  in  looking
at major acquisition milestones called key decision points.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

And  looking  in  advance  of  those  at  the  kind  of  knowledge  one
needs  to  have  in  order  to  be  ready  for  those  milestones,  and  those
milestones  play  directly  into  cost  and  schedule.  I  know  NASA  and
the Aerospace Corporation and GAO are all very interested in con-
tinuing to define what it takes to be successful at every part of the
program, and that is going to pay off as well.

MSL DRAMATIC COST ESTIMATE CHANGE

Mr. OLSON. Thank you very much for that answer.
Mr.  Scolese,  I  couldn’t  let  you  get  away  clean  free.  I  just  want
to talk very briefly about the Mars Science Lab, and it is my under-
standing  that  the  original  cost  estimate  for  the  Mars  Science  Lab
was  in  the  $600  million  range.  And  that  NASA’s  initial  confirma-
tion estimate was closer to $1.6 billion. That first estimate did not
come  from  NASA  as  I  understand  it.  And  you  have,  NASA  has  re-
cently announced a two-year delay in the MSL with a cost increase
of $400 million.

I  just  wanted  you  to  elaborate  on  how  those  numbers  were  ob-
tained  and  what  is  being  done  to  eliminate  unrealistic  estimates.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes.  That  first  number  that  you  mentioned,  the
roughly  $600  million,  came  out  of  what  is  called  a  decadal  survey
that we do with the National Academies where they look at our ob-
jectives  in  the  future,  and  they  try  and  prioritize  them  and  say
these  are  the  science  goals  that  you  really  should  think  about
doing.  And  we  work  with  them  to  try  and  accomplish  those  goals.
The Mars Science Lab was one of those, and at that time it was
estimated  at  $600  million.  When  we  went  off  and  did  our  studies,
as was mentioned here, we did the work to mature the technologies
to get a better understanding of it, we estimated the cost to be $1.6
billion.  Clearly,  we  still  underestimated  the  complexity  of  it,  and
we should and could and can and will do better in the future.

We  are  also  working  with  the  National  Academy  to  help  them
improve  their  earlier  cost  estimates  that  you  see  there,  because  it
often  gets  out,  you  know,  one  way  or  the  other  that,  you  know,
somebody  thought  this  was  going  to  cost  whatever  was  said  at  the
earliest  phase.  So  we  are  working  with  them  to  help  them  obtain
the tools and to get resources, and the Academy is doing it as well.
So  we  are  doing  it  together,  and  we  are  doing  it  willingly  so  that
we  can  go  off  and  have  a  better  understanding  of  what  those  mis-
sions would cost so they can better establish priorities.

Mr.  OLSON.  Thanks  for  that  answer,  and  Madam  Chairwoman,

I yield back my time.

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you.  We  have  with  us  Mr.  Rohr-
abacher, and of course, votes have been called, but we are going to
have some minutes to hear.

BAD JUDGMENT AND IRRATIONAL OPTIMISM AFFECTS COST

ESTIMATES

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  apologize  for  being
late to the hearing. As usual we had two important hearings at ex-
actly the same time.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

I would like to ask a general question just—when we take a look
at  this  Mars  Science  Lab  and  we  take  a  look  at,  I  guess  it  is
NPOESS, I guess.

Mr. SCOLESE. NPOESS.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  NPOESS.  I  have  never  been  able  to  pro-
nounce  that  right,  and  I  have  been  looking  at  this  for  years,  but
with that said, you know which project I am talking about.

Mr. SCOLESE. Yes.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  When  we  look  at  that  and  we  look  at  this
whole Mars issue today, are we talking about basically—and these
other  problems,  are  we  basically  talking  about  intentional  wrong-
doing in terms of lying about a bid. You know, when you are offer-
ing,  intentionally  offering  a  bid  that  you  cannot  handle,  that  is  a
lie,  and  that  is  an  intentional  wrongdoing.  Then  you  have  another
option.  Bad  judgment,  you  know,  unintentionally  doing  something
that ends up causing harm like miscalculating what you really can
accomplish for a certain degree. Or are we talking about systematic
flaws?

Because we have had consistently over the years examples after-
example after example after example of overruns and of people not
really  being  able  to  fulfill  the  obligation  they  have  taken  on  when
a contract has been issued. So what are you talking about? Are we
talking  about  a  systematic  flaw?  Should  we  be  doing  something
else? Are we talking about just bad judgments that were made but
with  no  ill,  nothing,  you  know,  wrong.  People  do  make  bad  judg-
ments  at  times.  Or  are  we  talking  about  intentional  wrongdoing?
Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  let  me  start  off  by  saying  NPOESS  isn’t  a
NASA  project,  so  I  can’t  comment,  you  know,  in  any  degree  of  de-
tail on that, but your question is broader than that. And I don’t be-
lieve  that  intentional  wrongdoing  is  there  ever.  I  suspect  it  prob-
ably  happens  occasionally,  but  that  is  not  what  we  see.  It  is  more
in  your  second  one,  which  is,  you  know,  bad  judgment,  although  I
would like to call it optimism.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. All right.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  The  people  that  are  proposing  these  missions  that
want  to  do  them  are  extremely  enthusiastic  about  it,  and  they  are
optimistic  about  the  technologies  that  are  out  there,  they  are  opti-
mistic about their ability to do the job.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Irrational optimism can be very costly.
Mr.  SCOLESE.  Yes,  it  can.  Yes,  sir.  And  that  is  why  get  to  this,
to  the  third  part,  which  is  really  the  answer  to  your  question,
which  is  it  is  systematic.  And  that  is  what  we  were  trying  to  talk
about  here,  what  we  are  doing,  and  that  is  what  the  GAO  has
pointed out that we need to do.

It  is  not  one  thing  that  is  going  to  improve  our  performance.  It
is  many  things  that  are  going  to  improve  our  performance.  We
have  to  train  our  people,  and  we  do,  and  we  are  improving  our
training  process  so  that  they  will  be  able  to  recognize  their  opti-
mism as well as others optimism. We have to monitor the perform-
ance  of  what  is  going  on  so  that  we  can  see  if  optimism  is  driving
the  estimate  or  if,  in  fact,  poor  performance  is  causing  us  to  have
some overruns. We have to put those tools in place so that we can
catch them early enough so that they don’t become, you know, sur-
prises for sure but they don’t become large cost impacts because we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

can  then  apply  additional  resources  without  maybe  having  to  in-
crease the budget or change the schedule.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. So training, monitoring oversight, but let me
add  one  other  word  here  that  I  over  the  years  that  I  just  never
hear and that is accountability, and if someone has a bad judgment
or  if  someone  is  in,  especially  if  someone  is  intentionally  doing
something wrong, I have not found the ability of people to be fired
or to be charges being brought against people. And I just, especially
if they are within the system and making a bad judgment as com-
pared  to  a  contractor  from  the  outside.  Shouldn’t,  isn’t  there  a
problem with accountability here?

How many people do you know have been fired from their job at

NASA?

Mr. SCOLESE. If you mean by fired sent away from NASA——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Yeah.
Mr.  SCOLESE.—you  mean  for  wrongdoing,  you  know,  they  vio-

lated the law, I wouldn’t have the names but I——

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Well,  I  wouldn’t  say  violated  the  law.  If
someone just has very bad judgment, I remember with Hubble Tel-
escope there was a bad decision made somewhere there where they
sent it up and the mirrors weren’t exactly right, and it was, it cost
the taxpayers a lot of money.

We should—I know my time is up, so I will just say that we need
to be holding people more accountable for bad judgments, irrational
optimism.  I  know  you  are  going  to  go  to  work  on  the  systematic
problems as well.

Mr. SCOLESE. And we do the other, we do take into account those
types  of  things.  We  do  hold  people  accountable,  and  we  have,  in
fact,  replaced  project  managers,  project  personnel,  other  personnel
if  they  are  not  performing.  But  we  also  have  to  recognize  what
caused  them  not  to  perform,  and  if  it  was  certainly  their  fault,  we
do  remove  them.  To  say  that  we  fire  them,  I  can’t  necessarily  say
that, because oftentimes these people have performed spectacularly
in  other  areas,  so  we  will  remove  them  from  their  current  job  and
move them to another.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. Thank you very much.
Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Rohrabacher.  Thank
you, Mr. Scolese. Just in closing, I know that a lot of the work that
NASA  has  done  in  the  budgetary  areas  were  not  reflected  in  this
GAO report. So when do you expect the Congress to be able to see
the result of the work that you have done?

Mr.  SCOLESE.  Well,  as  the  GAO  report  said,  you  know,  these
tools  have  been  put  in  place  in  the  last  couple  of  years.  Our  mis-
sions  typically  last  or  our  mission  cycle  is  typically  three  to  five
years, so you should be seeing some of the results soon. I think you
will  see  our  estimates,  you  know,  better,  but  probably  you  will  see
the  real  benefit  of  what  we  are  doing  in  the  next  couple  of  years,
the  next  one  to  two  years  as  we  start  delivering  on  those  missions
that we started this process on about two years ago.

Chairwoman  GIFFORDS.  Thank  you.  Before  we  bring  the  hearing
to  a  close,  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  testifying  before  the
Subcommittee today. I want to thank my Ranking Member as well
for our first successful hearing and also as you saw there is a real
passion for space in this subcommittee, and a lot of Members, new

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Members  to  the  Congress  represent  NASA’s  interests,  the  Amer-
ican  people’s  interests.  So  I  look  forward  to  a  fruitful,  productive
next couple of years.

The  record  will  remain  open  for  two  weeks  for  additional  state-
ments from Members and for answers to any of the follow-up ques-
tions  the  Subcommittee  may  ask  of  our  witnesses.  The  witnesses
are excused, and the hearing is now adjourned. Thank you.

[Whereupon, at 11:37 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(63)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Christopher  J.  Scolese,  Acting  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics

and Space Administration (NASA)

Questions submitted by Chairwoman Gabrielle Giffords
Q1. NASA has noted on several occasions that problems with contractor performance
have led to cost overruns and schedule delays. What corrective actions is NASA
undertaking  to  ensure  better  contractor  performance  and  improve  its  contractor
oversight for major acquisition projects?

A1. NASA  has  instituted  a  multi-pronged  approach  to  strengthen  acquisition  plan-
ning  and  execution,  increase  management  oversight,  and  assess  and  address  root
causes  for  problems  with  contractor  performance.  NASA  has  re-visited  forums  and
metrics used to monitor, track and report contract performance. NASA also is taking
a closer look at how contractor performance contributes to program and project per-
formance success.

As  outlined  in  NASA  Policy  Directive  1000.5,  ‘‘Policy  for  NASA  Acquisition’’
(issued January 2009), and NASA Procedural Requirements 7120.5D, ‘‘NASA Space
Flight Program and Project Management Requirements,’’ the Agency has instituted
a  strategic  acquisition  planning  and  authorization  process  designed  to  strengthen
program  and  project  formulation.  This  process  begins  with  an  Acquisition  Strategy
Planning  (ASP)  Meeting,  which  approves  a  new  or  substantially  changed  program
or project triggered by Agency requirements or legislative direction. The ASP is fol-
lowed  by  an  Acquisition  Strategy  Meeting  (ASM)  to  ensure  program  planning  is  in
place  and  validates  make/buy  rationale  and  any  partnership  decisions.  The  process
culminates  in  a  Procurement  Strategy  Meeting  (PSM)  to  approve  the  procurement
strategy  for  individual  procurements.  PSMs  are  conducted  in  accordance  with  Fed-
eral Acquisition Regulations for each contract within a Project and focus on the pro-
curement process. These events are part of the normal program and project formula-
tion and implementation activities and lay a strong foundation from which contracts
will be managed.

Further,  the  Agency  has  instituted  a  forum  to  monitor  the  Agency’s  largest  and
most complex contracts at a Senior Management Review of program and project per-
formance.  On  a  monthly  basis,  all  large  contracts  from  NASA’s  major  projects  are
tracked  for  current  value  compared  with  original  value,  award  fee  status,  current
and  upcoming  significant  procurement  actions  (including  undefinitized  contract  ac-
tions, restructures, etc.). Planned procurements that are within a six-month horizon
are  also  highlighted  and  discussed.  Each  NASA  Mission  Directorate  program  and
project  is  reviewed  quarterly  and  their  associated  contracts  are  addressed  in  more
detail. This forum and the data reviewed allow the Agency to focus on contract man-
agement and proactively address issues, which should lead to project cost and sched-
ule growth.
Q2. You  state  in  your  testimony  that  NASA  has  initiated  a  number  of  changes  that
address  common  issues  such  as  optimism  in  cost  estimates  and  schedules  and
unrealistic assumptions on technology maturity, just to name a few. How do you
plan  to  ensure  that  current  and  future  major  acquisition  projects  do  not  exceed
the Congressionally-mandated cost and schedule thresholds?

A2. NASA  will  apply  improved  assessment  and  reporting  processes  to  the  current
missions,  but  also  recognizes  that  a  number  of  these  baseline  commitments  were
made  prior  to  the  introduction  of  these  changes,  and  we  anticipate  that  it  will  be
some  time  prior  to  realizing  the  full  results  of  the  changes.  If  cost  and  schedule
growth  do  occur  in  the  interim,  NASA  believes  that  our  improved  reporting  proc-
esses will better enable timely notification on the issues. NASA will continue to take
the  steps  necessary  to  rebalance  the  Agency  portfolio  to  accommodate  those  prob-
lems. It is anticipated that these initiatives will continue to improve cost and sched-
ule performance in the future.
Q3. You  highlight  in  your  testimony  the  use  of  Standing  Review  Boards  to  provide
an  unbiased  assessment  of  project  performance  at  key  decision  points.  However,
the independence of some of the discipline experts on past boards has been ques-
tioned  by  the  Agency’s  own  Inspector  General.  What  is  NASA  doing  to  ensure
that  organizational  conflicts  of  interest  no  longer  occur  with  Standing  Review
Board members?

A3. NASA is updating the Agency policy ‘‘NASA Space Flight Management Require-
ments’’ (NPR 7120.5D) with a NASA Interim Directive (NID) that will establish the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

Standing  Review  Board  handbook  as  the  source  of  guidance  for  establishing  Stand-
ing  Review  Boards  and  assessing  members  for  potential  organizational  or  personal
conflict of interest. The NASA Office of the General Counsel has reviewed the policy
and  procedures  in  the  NPR  7120.5D,  and  the  Standing  Review  Board  handbook,
which guides the establishment of Standing Review Boards to ensure that they will
be established in a manner consistent with federal law. The handbook includes pro-
cedures  that  ensure  identification  of  Standing  Review  Board  members  who  have
conflicts of interest.

The  handbook  includes  NASA’s  procedures  to  determine  whether  nominees  are
employed  by  companies  performing  work  for  the  program  or  project  under  review.
Ethics  officials  will  verify  Standing  Review  Board  participant  independence.  For
those  individuals  determined  to  have  conflicts  of  interest,  and  whose  value  to  the
Board’s work is viewed by the convening authorities as critical, a waiver will be sub-
mitted to ethics officials to request consideration to allow that individual to partici-
pate  on  that  Standing  Review  Board.  As  described  in  the  handbook,  eligibility  of
Standing  Review  Board  members,  with  regard  to  their  independence,  will  be  re-
viewed on an annual basis.

The  NASA  Inspector  General  has  accepted  these  updates  as  responsive  to  their

concerns.
Q4. Why  is  NASA’s  cost  cap  for  the  Joint  Dark  Energy  Mission  (JDEM)  lower  than
the  National  Research  Council  panel  that  reviewed  the  mission  thinks  is  real-
istic? Please provide a specific rationale for the lower cost cap.

A4. NASA  agrees  with  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  that  JDEM  is  a  >$1
billion-class  mission.  However,  NASA  does  not  expect  to  pay  the  entire  cost  of  the
mission.  NASA  has  been  working  in  partnership  with  the  Department  of  Energy
and is now engaged in discussions with the European Space Agency (ESA) with the
goal of achieving an exciting and productive dark energy mission with our combined
resources.  NASA  and  its  partners  have  much  work  to  do  before  establishing  a  firm
cost commitment at a formal mission confirmation review.
Q5. Pursuant  to  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of  2005  (P.L.  109–155),  on  May  1,
NASA  notified  the  Committee  that  the  MSL  project  would  exceed  the  Baseline
development cost by 15 percent or more. The Act further requires NASA to notify
the Committee after NASA makes a determination that the development cost has
exceeded  the  Baseline  by  30  percent.  Has  MSL  reached  the  30  percent  cost
growth  threshold?  If  so,  when  was  this  determination  made?  If  not,  do  you  an-
ticipate  that  the  project  will  reach  the  30  percent  cost  growth  threshold  and  if
so, when?

A5. In its letter of December 4, 2008, NASA informed the Committee of its decision
to defer launch of MSL to the 2011 launch window. NASA noted MSL would require
additional  funding  of  approximately  $400  million  to  support  this  schedule  slip.
While the letter does not describe this prospective budget requirement in percentage
terms,  this  communication  represents  a  determination  that  MSL  will  exceed  its
baseline  budget  requirement  by  more  than  30  percent  by  virtue  of  the  additional
estimated funding required to accommodate the schedule slip to 2011. NASA is pre-
paring  a  formal  detailed  report  pursuant  to  the  requirements  of  the  NASA  Author-
ization  Act  of  2005  and  plans  to  submit  this  report  immediately  following  release
of  the  FY  2010  budget  request.  It  should  be  noted  that  NASA  will  continue  to  re-
view  the  MSL  program  consistent  with  it  program  management  processes  and  fur-
ther refinements can be expected as the review process progresses.
Q6. The Aerospace Industries Association recently advocated that DOD budget for an
80  percent  probability  of  success.  From  NASA’s  perspective,  what  are  the  pros
and cons of using a higher confidence level than the 70 percent probability cur-
rently used by NASA?

A6. Prior to making the decision to adopt a 70 percent confidence level, NASA eval-
uated  the  use  of  higher  confidence  levels  and  concluded  that  the  use  of  the  70  per-
cent  level  allowed  the  optimal  balancing  of  risk  across  the  Agency  budget  portfolio.
Q7. Should  there  be  a  reasonable  level  of  reserves  included  in  the  estimated  cost  of
a program, and if so, what would you define as ‘‘reasonable’’? What are the pros
and cons of a higher level of reserves?

A7. The  Agency  has  changed  its  approach  to  project  estimating  and  reserves.  The
use  of  probabilistic  estimation  represents  a  major  shift  in  the  methods  utilized  to
size  and  manage  project  and  program  resources.  This  new  paradigm  requires  that
the  Agency  provide  resources  and  schedule  sufficient  to  assure  a  specified  prob-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

ability  of  success  for  the  project  and  program.  The  probabilistic  estimates  are  to  be
sized to provide for all requirements, both anticipated and unanticipated.
Q8. An  analysis  by  the  Aerospace  Corporation  concluded  that  cost  growth  problems
would  continue  until  project  managers  were  given  greater  control.  What  are  the
pros and cons of giving project managers greater control?

A8. The  study  suggested  that  the  project  manager  needed  to  have  full  authority  to
control  costs  (e.g.,  decline  to  allow  the  Center  Director  to  assign  additional  human
resources  to  the  project).  The  roles  and  responsibilities  of  the  Center  Director  and
project manager differ. The project manager’s role is to assure success of his project
within budget and schedule. This role might lead the project manager to make deci-
sions that were good for the project at the expense of maintaining Agency capability.
The  Center  Director,  on  the  other  hand,  is  responsible  for  maintaining  the  skills
necessary  to  support  all  current  and  projected  projects  that  are  to  be  executed  by
the Center.

This split and balancing of roles and responsibilities is purposeful and important.
These sometimes conflicting roles were specifically created to encourage a balancing
of  short-term  (project)  needs  with  longer-term  institutional  needs.  Finally,  as  a
check  and  balance,  decisions  on  allocating  human  capital  are  approved  by  NASA
leadership  at  the  Mission  Directorate,  Associate  Administrator,  and  Administrator
levels.
Q9. In his questioning during the hearing, Rep. Grayson raised the issue of the con-
trasting approaches of having vendors be responsible for overruns in fixed price
contracts  and  not  being  obliged  to  pay  for  cost  growth  in  cost  reimbursement
contracts.  In  your  response  to  Mr.  Grayson,  you  acknowledged  that  NASA  uses
fixed  price  contracts  when  the  Agency  understands  the  requirements  ‘‘so  that  a
contractor  will,  in  fact,  bid  on  it  and  know  that  they  have  a  chance  of  being
successful.’’  In  contrast,  you  said  that  NASA  uses  cost  reimbursement  type  con-
tracts  when  there  is  some  uncertainty  in  the  requirements.  Since  NASA’s  pro-
gram management process fully recognizes that a project usually starts with un-
certainty  but  then  matures  through  success  design  reviews,  could  NASA  use  a
cost reimbursement contract for the work up conducted through the Preliminary
Design  Review  (PDR)  or  Critical  Design  Review  (CDR)  and  then  subsequently
utilize a fixed price contract? Has such a hybrid approach ever been taken, and
if so, what were the results?

A9. NASA’s goal is to ensure that the cost risk for each requirement is properly al-
located  between  NASA  and  industry.  Cost-reimbursement  award-fee  contracts  are
generally  most  appropriate  for  use  on  NASA’s  high-risk  and  complex  science  mis-
sions  and  Design,  Development,  Test  and  Evaluation  (DDT&E)  contracts.  During
the  development  phase  of  a  project,  NASA  should  take  on  the  cost  risk  because  of
the  difficulty  of  developing  firm  estimates  for  the  cost  of  the  work  to  be  performed.
Use of fixed price type contracts under these circumstances would invariably result
in  contractors  proposing  significantly  higher  prices  to  compensate  for  the  high-risk.
In  order  to  mitigate  the  Government’s  risk  under  these  cost  type  contracts,  NASA
utilizes  incentive  arrangements  (i.e.,  award  fee  incentives,  performance  fee  incen-
tives,  etc.)  in  conjunction  with  our  cost-reimbursement  contracts.  The  incentive  tee
arrangements  contain  clear  and  unambiguous  evaluation  criteria  that  are  linked  to
cost, schedule, and technical performance requirements of the contract that provide
contractors  with  distinct  incentive  to  control  costs  and  develop  a  high  quality  prod-
uct. These practices are in line with the White House memorandum on Government
Contracting, dated March 4, 2009, and demonstrate NASA’s commitment to contract
oversight and risk mitigation.

NASA  program  and  project  offices  work  together  to  develop  requirements  and
workload  projections  with  the  goal  of  moving  toward  fixed  price  contracts  as  soon
as  possible.  As  products  and  services  mature,  NASA  considers  a  movement  toward
fixed  price  contracts  for  production  and  operations.  For  fixed  price  contracts,  pay-
ment amounts can be based on performance as measured by standards and metrics.
NASA will have examples of such an approach once a system is fully developed and
going  into  maximum  production.  At  this  time,  the  hybrid  approach  involving  costs-
reimbursement and fixed price contracts has not yet been tested.

Question submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Given the long experience of schedule and cost growth in complex missions, why
not  simply  impose  higher  cost  and  schedule  reserves  at  the  project’s  outset,  in-
stead  of  trying  to  operate  with  a  too-small  reserve  when  the  project  encounters
difficulties?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

A1. NASA  has  undertaken  a  number  of  initiatives  intended  to  improve  the  quality
of  initial  cost  and  schedules.  These  initiatives  are  documented  in  the  NASA  High-
Risk  Corrective  Action  Plan  and  have  been  reviewed  in  the  recent  GAO  QuickLook
Report.  In  particular,  the  NASA  transition  to  the  use  of  joint  confidence  level  cal-
culation at a 70 percent confidence level will essentially increase the ‘‘set point’’ for
project cost and schedule estimates. Probabilistic estimating provides NASA with an
approach  that  fully  integrates  technical,  cost,  and  schedule  plans  and  risks  to  de-
velop  both  an  understanding  of  the  sensitivity  of  parameters  to  each  other  and  the
most  likely  estimate.  Using  this  approach  allows  NASA  to  understand  and  docu-
ment  how  the  mitigation  of  technical  risks  would  enable  an  increase  in  the  project
confidence  level.  Conversely,  the  introduction  of  a  budget  reduction  would  have  the
effect of increasing technical and schedule risks and thus lower the confidence level
for the project. The use of probabilistic estimates also generates baseline values that
include funding to address impacts associated with contingencies and uncertainties,
such  as  industrial  base,  partner  performance  and  technology  optimism.  By  control-
ling  the  confidence  levels  at  the  program  (rather  than  just  project)  level,  NASA  in-
tends  to  be  more  vigilant  in  evaluating  the  state  of  the  program’s  portfolio  prior  to
undertaking  additional  projects.  NASA  expects  that  these  steps  will  enable  NASA
to better control the tendency to undertake too much with too little.

Questions submitted by Representative Pete Olson
Q1. When NASA experiences large cost increases without advanced warning it dam-
ages  the  Agency’s  credibility  and  reputation  with  stakeholders  including  Con-
gress.  Would  you  detail  for  us  the  actions  the  Agency  has  taken  to  improve  its
ability  to  forecast  increases  earlier  so  problems  can  be  more  readily  managed
and solutions more easily implemented?

A1. NASA has undertaken a number of initiatives intended to forecast and mitigate
problems  as  early  as  possible.  These  initiatives  include  increased  ongoing  perform-
ance  monitoring  and  more  extensive  review  at  key  life  cycle  decision  points,  sup-
ported by expert, independent assessments.

NASA  has  an  ongoing  performance  review  process  to  ensure  that  it  can  forecast
increases,  as  early  as  possible,  and  work  a  solution.  NASA  uses  several  methods  of
tracking cost, schedule and science/technical requirements, and at multiple manage-
ment levels.

NASA  projects  employ  various  tools,  including  Earned  Value  Management,  to
monitor  progress  toward  the  baseline  cost,  schedule  and  technical  deliverable.  Cen-
ter and Mission Directorate management review progress on a monthly or quarterly
basis.  Additionally,  the  Baseline  Performance  Review  (BPR)  process  was  imple-
mented in 2007. The BPR is a monthly review, which assesses all Agency programs,
with Agency Senior Management. On a quarterly basis, each Mission Directorate is
spotlighted, providing a more in-depth assessment of its portfolio. This process pro-
vides not only individual program assessment but also a method to identify and ad-
dress  systemic  programmatic  and  institutional  issues  that  may  affect  multiple  pro-
grams.

In addition, the Agency implemented Key Decision Points (KDPs) with the release
of  NASA  Procedural  Requirements,  NPR  7120.51D,  NASA  Space  Flight  Program
and Project Management Requirements (effective March 2007). KDPs serve as gates
through  which  programs  and  projects  must  pass  before  proceeding  to  the  next
phase.  Each  KDP  is  preceded  by  one  or  more  project  or  program-level  reviews.
Standing  Review  Boards  are  established  to  provide  an  expert,  independent  assess-
ment  throughout  the  Programs  and  Project’s  life  cycle.  These  assessments  are  pro-
vided in support of the KDPs, with their views and recommendations.

Questions submitted by Representative Charles A. Wilson
Q1. Experience  has  shown  that  there  are  major  risks  to  program  cost  and  schedule
when insufficient large scale testing is performed during hardware development.
What are NASA’s plans for Orion and Ares I for large scale acoustic, vibration,
thermal vacuum, and electromagnetic interference testing?

A1. Both  Orion  and  Ares  I  will  conduct  testing  starting  at  the  component  level,
through  system  testing  and  then  to  large-scale  testing.  All  component  and  systems
will undergo acoustics, vibration, thermal, vacuum and electromagnetic interference
and  compatibility  (EMI/EMC)  testing  for  flight  qualification.  There  will  be  vehicle
specific  (Orion-only,  Ares-only)  testing  as  well  as  integrated  testing,  including  inte-
grated vehicle (Orion and Ares) and ground systems as well as flight vehicle testing.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

For  large-scale  testing  to  support  qualification,  Orion  will  undergo  a  complete
suite  of  integrated  qualification  tests  for  (EMI/EMC)  at  the  Integrated  Environ-
mental  Test  Facility  at  Glenn  Research  Center’s  Plum  Brook  Station  in  Ohio.  The
facility is undergoing modifications to support this testing.

For  Ares  I,  the  size  of  the  launch  vehicle  dictates  a  different  hardware  qualifica-
tion  flow.  The  components  and  systems  will  be  tested  to  the  established  environ-
mental  (acoustics,  vibration,  thermal,  and  vacuum)  as  well  as  EMI/EMC  require-
ments.  The  Ares  I  project  is  planning  to  use  several  full-scale  Structural  Test  Arti-
cles to qualify the stage and tank structure. An entire Integrated System Test Arti-
cle,  including  flight  avionics,  will  be  built.  This  test  article  will  undergo  a  complete
test firing. For the Ares I First Stage, three qualification motor firings are planned.
An  integrated  Orion/Ares  stack  will  undergo  a  mated  Integrated  Vehicle  Ground
Vibration  Test  at  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center  in  Alabama.  Plans  are  also  being
developed  to  conduct  a  complete  Flight  Element  Integration  Test  on  the  integrated
Orion/Ares I stack at Kennedy Space Center in Florida.

And finally, the Constellation test program will culminate with the Orion 1 flight
test. Orion 1 is an un-crewed, fully functional orbital vehicle which will be launched
on the Ares I. This flight has been designed to test and evaluate the integrated sys-
tems, exposed to the natural and induced environments experienced through the en-
tire mission.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Cristina T. Chaplain, Director, Acquisition and Sourcing Management,

Government Accountability Office (GAO)

Questions submitted by Chairwoman Gabrielle Giffords
Q1. In  your  latest  review,  you  say  that  NASA  has  attributed  many  of  the  issues  on
its  projects  to  contractor  performance.  The  identification  of  contractor  perform-
ance  issues  begs  the  question  of  whether  NASA  undertakes  adequate  contractor
oversight.
a. Do  you  have  observations  on  the  level  of  oversight  of  contractors  that  NASA

provides?

b. In your opinion, is NASA doing enough up-front thinking and communication
about  the  project  and  its  requirement  in  order  to  clearly  lay  out  for  the  con-
tractor what work needs to be accomplished?

A1. Our  assessment  of  selected  large-scale  NASA  project  focused  on  the  status  of
major projects and the level of knowledge being attained at critical junctures. While
we discussed management and oversight issues with both project managers and con-
tractors,  we  did  not  specifically  seek  to  measure  the  level  of  oversight  NASA  pro-
vided  to  its  contractors.  However,  we  observed  instances  where  contractor  capabili-
ties were overestimated and could have been better understood up-front. For exam-
ple, the Dawn contractor had no experience in deep space missions and more specifi-
cally,  in  ion  propulsion  systems  for  such  missions,  and  officials  from  the  company
acknowledged they had difficulty developing the ion propulsion system for the space-
craft.  In  addition,  it  appeared  to  us  that  the  contractor  NASA  used  for  the  Glory
and  NPP  projects  overestimated  its  capacity  to  provide  the  work  when  promised,
which  was  exacerbated  when  it  closed  one  development  facility  and  had  difficulty
hiring experienced staff at its new facility. In both these cases, the contractors cited
communication  gaps  with  NASA  when  their  projects  were  experiencing  problems.
Given  these  and  other  instances,  we  believe  NASA  could  do  more  up-front  assess-
ments about contractor capabilities and better plan for potential problems when con-
tractors  have  not  had  prior  experience  with  particular  technologies  or  types  of  mis-
sions.
Q2. What  steps  can  Congress  take  to  improve  its  oversight  of  NASA’s  acquisition  of
major  projects  in  an  effort  to  help  address  some  of  the  issues  identified  by  the
GAO?

A2. The  Congress  has  laid  a  good  foundation  for  acquisition  oversight  by  requiring
NASA  to  establish  baselines  for  major  programs  and  report  back  when  certain
thresholds  are  breached.  It  can  continue  to  build  on  this  foundation  by  continually
examining  factors  behind  cost  and  schedule  growth.  Moreover,  Congress  can  also
support  change  though  its  own  decisions  about  whether  to  authorize  and  appro-
priate  funds  for  a  program  or  project  that  is  not  performing  well.  Specifically,  deci-
sions  to  move  projects  into  implementation  should  be  based  on  whether  a  sound
business  case  has  been  established,  i.e.,  there  is  sufficient  knowledge  that  require-
ments can be achieved within available time, funding, technology, workforce, and in-
dustrial base constraints.
Q3. What corrective actions already undertaken by NASA show the most promise for

dealing with cost management issues?

A3. Since  NASA  only  recently  issued  its  Corrective  Action  Plan,  it  is  too  early  to
determine  whether  any  of  these  actions  shows  more  promise  than  others.  If  these
corrective actions are implemented in the spirit intended, they all have merit. More-
over, the success of any one improvement effort, such as cost estimating reform, de-
pends  on  the  success  of  others,  such  as  those  focused  on  producing  more  attention
and  oversight  from  senior  leadership.  GAO  remains  very  interested  to  see  NASA’s
commitment to following through on this plan and we await the results.
Q4. Your  prepared  statement  indicates  similarities  between  what  NASA  faces  with
cost and schedule issues and what has been experienced by DOD and other fed-
eral agencies in their acquisition of space systems. Are some of the corrective ac-
tions  undertaken  by  NASA  of  possible  benefit  to  other  agencies  who  conduct
space  acquisitions?  Conversely,  are  there  any  ‘‘lessons  learned’’  from  those  other
agencies?

A4. It is difficult to determine which actions the Department of Defense and others
can  benefit  from  because  NASA  is  still  implementing  its  plan  and  not  enough  time

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

has passed to determine impact. In addition, the DOD and National Reconnaissance
Office  space  communities  are  implementing  some  similar  reforms,  notably  in  the
area  of  cost  estimating.  In  fact,  cost  estimators  from  all  three  communities  have
been sharing lessons learned in this regard. All three communities also seem to rec-
ognize  the  need  to  build  knowledge  about  technologies  and  other  resources  before
making long-term commitments to programs. Whether they can sustain the commit-
ments they are making in this regard, however, remains to be seen.
Q5. Your  statement  points  out  the  MSL,  ‘‘which  was  already  over  budget  recently
announced  a  two-year  launch  delay,’’  which  you  indicate  will  increase  the  cost
of  the  mission.  While  that  is  accurate,  would  GAO  recommend  that  NASA
should  have  done  something  other  than  take  the  two-year  launch  delay?  What
would GAO do differently at this point in the project?

A5. Clearly,  at  the  time  NASA  announced  the  delay,  it  had  no  alternative  but  to
delay  the  launch  two  years,  and  to  fund  the  delay  by  diverting  funding  from  other
programs,  or  to  cancel  the  program  altogether.  Our  recommendations  focus  instead
on  preventing  NASA  from  being  faced  with  a  similar  situation  in  the  future.  Had
the  Mars  Science  Laboratory  program  followed  a  best  practice  approach,  it  would
have had more knowledge about the technologies—both critical and heritage—it was
pursuing  at  the  time  it  estimated  cost  and  schedule.  There  would  have  also  been
more robust planning for potential risks and more oversight from the Agency if cost,
schedule, and performance issues did surface.
Q6a. How successful have other agencies been at using confidence levels?
A6a. It is still too early to tell. NASA has just started to implement this policy and
so has the FAA, DOD and other agencies.
Q6b. Has this technique mitigated cost growth?
A6b. We do not know yet. Other agencies, including DOD, have only recently begun
applying higher confidence levels to estimates of space and other complex programs.
It  is  too  early  to  determine  their  success  in  mitigating  cost  growth.  It  should  be
stressed,  however,  that  higher  confidence  levels  will  not  work  as  a  practice  if  esti-
mates are being made when there are significant unknowns about technologies, con-
tractors’  capabilities,  funding  availability,  and  requirements,  among  other  factors.
Moreover,  higher  confidence  levels  will  not  work  unless  they  consider  project  risk
assessments  as  well  as  cost  and  schedule  risk  analyses  that  capture  the  effects  of
funding cuts and lack of contractor capabilities.
Q6c. Do you agree with NASA’s choice of 70 percent confidence level or do you advo-

cate a higher or lower level?

A6c. We have not made a recommendation or analyzed how high a confidence level
should  be  for  space  programs  but  are  encouraged  that  there  is  a  desire  to  increase
the  confidence  in  estimating  and  that  there  are  efforts  underway  to  do  so.  Experts
agree  that  technically  risky  programs  that  push  the  edge  of  technology  should  be
funded  at  higher  confidence  levels  (above  50  percent)  since  there  are  so  many  un-
knowns.  Some  experts  have  recommended  that  funding  be  at  the  80  percent  level
for  new  endeavors  where  no  historical  data  exists  to  cover  the  ‘‘unknowns’’  (e.g.,
going to Mars).
Q7. Why is NASA acquisition management still characterized by GAO as a high-risk

area after 18 years?

A7. Historically,  high-risk  areas  have  been  so  designated  because  of  traditional
vulnerabilities related to their greater susceptibility to fraud, waste, abuse, and mis-
management.  Since  we  designated  NASA  contract  management  as  high-risk  in
1990,  our  high-risk  reports  have  focused  on  a  variety  of  aspects  related  to  control-
ling  costs  and  risks  in  large-scale  efforts—including,  for  example,  definitizing  con-
tracts,  implementing  a  new  financial  management  system,  and  improving  cost  esti-
mating.  The  underlying  constant  has  been  that  programs  are  consistently  over  cost
and  behind  schedule  though  the  extent  of  cost  growth  had  been  hard  to  track  until
recently because of frequent re-baselining. Because cost growth and schedule delays
persist due to much more than risks inherent in spacecraft development, this area—
now  titled  acquisition  management  because  of  the  scope  of  issues  that  need  to  be
resolved—remains high-risk.
Q8. What must NASA do to warrant removal from GAO’s high-risk list?
A8. NASA  has  taken  significant  steps  in  this  direction  but  still  faces  substantial
work  on  difficult  initiatives  where  risks  remain  high.  NASA  has  laid  out  a  broad
plan  for  reducing  acquisition  risk  and  taken  steps  to  reflect  best  practices  in  poli-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

cies. The plan specifically seeks to strengthen program and project management, in-
crease  accuracy  in  cost  estimating,  facilitate  monitoring  of  contractor  cost  perform-
ance,  improve  agency-wide  business  processes,  and  improve  financial  management.
Much  work  remains  to  achieve  this  plan.  Some  of  the  potentially  most  important
initiatives in reducing cost growth and schedule slippage, and some of the most dif-
ficult parts of some initiatives have yet to be addressed. This will be difficult given
the  pressures  the  Agency  is  facing  as  it  moves  forward  with  the  Ares  I,  Orion,  and
other expensive, highly anticipated programs such as the James Webb telescope. For
instance,  the  desire  to  close  the  gap  in  human  space  flight  may  pressure  NASA  to
move ahead with its Ares and Orion programs while there are still unknowns about
technologies,  design,  and  producibility,  and  to  defer  testing  that  is  important  to  re-
ducing  cost  and  schedule  risk.  Coming  off  the  high-risk  list  would  also  require
NASA  to  find  ways  to  better  anticipate  and  mitigate  what  it  currently  believes  is
outside  a  program’s  control.  For  example,  potential  delays  due  to  a  crowded  launch
manifest  could  be  better  analyzed  and  factored  into  schedule  estimates.  Contractor
capabilities  could  also  be  better  understood  up-front.  NASA  could  work  with  the
DOD  on  both  issues,  in  fact,  to  develop  more  strategic  approaches  to  problems  in
the launch manifest and the space industrial base.
Q9. During  the  hearing,  Rep.  Grayson  raised  the  issue  of  contrasting  approaches  of
having vendors be responsible for overruns in fixed-price contracts and not being
obliged  to  pay  for  cost  growth  in  cost-reimbursement  contracts.  Since  NASA’s
program  management  process  fully  recognizes  that  a  project  usually  starts  with
uncertainty  but  then  matures  through  successful  design  reviews,  could  NASA
use  a  cost-reimbursement  contract  for  the  work  conducted  through  the  Prelimi-
nary  Design  Review  (PDR)  or  Critical  Design  Review  (CDR)  and  then  subse-
quently  utilize  a  fixed-price  contract?  Has  such  a  hybrid  approach  ever  been
taken, and if so, what were the results?

A9. We  do  not  know  of  instances  where  the  hybrid  approach  described  has  been
used  for  NASA  or  other  space  systems.  For  the  hybrid  approach  to  work,  the  con-
tracts would need to be applied at a point where there is a high degree of certainty
about  technology,  requirements,  funding,  etc.  In  DOD  space  programs,  this  is  often
not considered to occur until two satellites have been built. While we believe NASA
can  reduce  critical  unknowns  about  programs  before  programs  enter  implementa-
tion,  there  are  other  uncertainties  that  could  unfairly  impact  a  contractor  under  a
fixed-price  contract,  such  as  a  late  delivery  of  a  satellite  component  by  one  of
NASA’s  international  partners  or  an  unforeseen  problem  with  a  launch  vehicle.
Moreover, in applying the hybrid approach, the government would need to be willing
to  stop  programs  that  did  incur  cost  increases,  as  a  contractor  would  be  unlikely
to  be  willing  to  sustain  long-term  losses.  This  has  been  difficult  to  do  in  the  past.
For  example,  when  it  became  apparent  that  contractors  were  sustaining  losses  for
DOD’s  advanced  extremely  high  frequency  satellite  program  as  well  as  the  evolved
expendable  launch  vehicle,  the  government  did  not  stop  the  programs  but  rather
converted  to  cost-plus  arrangements.  Conversely,  when  NASA  stopped  fixed-price
arrangements under the X–33 and X–34 programs, it lost several years in its efforts
to  develop  a  successor  to  the  Space  Shuttle.  Another  caution  is  that  a  number  of
space  programs  that  have  tried  to  use  fixed-price  approaches  in  the  past  assumed
that  there  would  be  a  commercial  market  that  would  create  a  future  demand  for
the outcome of their work with the government, which in turn, created an incentive
for  a  company  to  work  under  a  fixed  price  arrangement.  However,  this  assumption
later proved to be erroneous.

Question submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Given the long experience of schedule and cost growth in complex missions, why
not  simply  impose  higher  cost  and  schedule  reserves  at  the  project’s  outset,  in-
stead  of  trying  to  operate  with  a  too-small  reserve  when  the  project  encounters
difficulties?

A1. We would encourage NASA to do so given the history of cost and schedule prob-
lems,  though  NASA  would  need  to  concurrently  ensure  that  programs  are  not
incentivized to use up all of their reserves. Ultimately, establishing higher reserves
may mean starting fewer programs—an approach the Administration, Congress and
the  many  communities  involved  with  NASA’s  major  programs  would  need  to  sup-
port.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Gary  P.  Pulliam,  Vice  President,  Civil  and  Commercial  Operations,

The Aerospace Corporation

Questions submitted by Chairwoman Gabrielle Giffords
Q1. In  your  statement,  you  speak  of  teams  wanting  to  put  their  best  foot  forward
when  being  faced  with  the  competitive  pressure  of  initiating  a  mission  at  the
lowest cost. You go on to say that, in some cases, underestimated content or com-
plexity  is  often  the  result.  How  can  we  incentivize  NASA  teams  to  be  realistic
in identifying both their requirements and resource needs?

A1. Realism  in  identifying  both  the  requirements  and  resource  needs  of  a  mission
requires  the  proper  balance  between  the  complexity  of  science  proposed  for  a  mis-
sion and the risk of growth in cost and schedule for this mission.

For  NASA  missions  proposed  through  the  Announcement  of  Opportunity  (AO)
process,  the  complexity  of  science  that  the  proposer  will  pursue  is  decided  by  the
proposing team, led by the Science Principal Investigator. Because of the open-ended
nature  of  the  science  request  for  AOs,  the  proposer  is  incentivized  to  provide  the
maximum  science  capability  within  a  fixed  cost  and  schedule  constraint.  In  order
to  capture  the  opportunity,  the  proposer  typically  pushes  the  envelope  of  perform-
ance  within  this  cost  and  schedule  cap,  without  proper  regard  to  the  likelihood  of
the  mission  exceeding  the  cost  and  schedule  ‘‘box.’’  Too  often  the  result  is  cost  and
schedule  growth  as  the  design  matures  and  the  concept  is  determined  to  be  more
difficult to develop than originally envisioned.

For  competed  NASA  missions,  a  selection  that  balances  risk  with  science  value
has  the  potential  to  significantly  reduce  cost  and  schedule  growth.  A  mission  that
has  robust  technical  margins  and  is  clearly  within  the  cost  and  schedule  envelope
should  experience  limited  cost  and  schedule  growth.  A  selection  such  as  this  would
be considered a low risk selection. If NASA solicitations promoted low risk missions
and  selected  missions  that  were  considered  low  risk,  then  the  likelihood  cost  and
schedule growth would be reduced. Further, it is expected that these NASA actions
would incentivize the proposing teams to be more realistic about their requirements
and resources needed.

It  must  be  understood,  however,  that  if  NASA  selects  only  low  risk  missions,  the
potential  science  value  of  these  may  be  reduced  as  well.  It  is  hard  to  argue  that
a mission like Kepler, which is attempting to discover Earth-like planets, is not ex-
citing  science.  At  the  same  time,  Kepler  experienced  significant  cost  and  schedule
growth.  If  not  for  that  allowance  of  cost  and  schedule  growth,  the  Kepler  mission
could not have been developed.

One  way  to  potentially  balance  cost  and  schedule  risk  versus  science  value  is  to
employ a strategy that matures a technology through a focused technology develop-
ment  program  prior  to  becoming  a  candidate  NASA  project.  A  generally  accepted
risk  avoidance  practice  is  to  fund  focused  technology  development  prior  to  system
development. However, due to budget constraints, NASA has recently reduced tech-
nology development funding in many areas.
Q2. Your  statement  indicates  similarities  between  what  NASA  faces  with  cost  and
schedule issues and what has been experienced by DOD and other federal agen-
cies  in  their  acquisition  of  space  systems.  Are  some  of  the  corrective  actions  un-
dertaken by NASA of possible benefit to other agencies who conduct space acqui-
sitions?  Conversely,  are  there  any  ‘‘lessons  learned’’  from  those  other  agencies?
A2. The  DOD-initiated  Cost  Analysis  Requirements  Descriptions  (CARD)  inspired
the  NASA  Cost  Analysis  Data  Requirement  (CADRe)  effort.  The  CADRe  effort  that
NASA  has  initiated  is  an  excellent  method  to  capture  the  cost,  schedule,  and  tech-
nical data in a uniform way throughout the life cycle of a mission. Placing this data
in  a  central  repository,  which  is  accessible  by  the  community,  is  a  significant  step
forward in terms of documenting and sharing data. CADRe allows NASA to perform
detailed  studies  within  a  program  as  well  as  across  NASA  programs.  CADRE  also
provides the comprehensive information required for the prediction of cost, schedule,
and performance. The DOD could use a similar approach to share program develop-
ment data among its acquisition community.

The  concept  of  budgeting  to  a  confidence  level,  which  NASA  has  recently  imple-
mented, was first adopted by the DOD. DOD also pioneered the use of Earned Value
Management (EVM) on all of its acquisitions, and NASA followed with the require-
ment of EVM for developments over a certain dollar threshold. Although implemen-
tation  of  budgeting  to  a  confidence  level  and  the  use  EVM  does  not  assure  success,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

it should reduce the likelihood and magnitude of cost and schedule growth. In 2007,
NASA again followed DOD’s lead in introducing Key Decision Point (KDP) processes
and criteria into the NASA Project development life cycle. The purpose of KDP proc-
esses  is  to  use  explicit  criteria  to  decide  whether  a  particular  program  or  project  is
ready to move on to the next phase in its life cycle.
Q3. You state in your prepared statement that: ‘‘the project must manage to a valid
baseline  estimate.’’  You  further  note  that  ‘‘One  area  of  concern  for  the  NASA
project managers is the relevance and utility of independent cost estimates they
do  not  own.  Different  methodologies  are  used  by  the  project  and  independent
estimates such that there is not a common understanding of the basis for esti-
mate  for  each.’’  You  note  that  ‘‘greater  transparency  into  the  basis  of  estimate
for  each  approach  is  important.’’  Could  you  please  elaborate  on  your  concerns
about  independent  cost  estimate  at  NASA  and  what  specific  types  of  actions
NASA might take to ensure transparency in its estimates?

A3. NASA  independent  cost  estimates  are  typically  conducted  with  cost  models
using  input  parameters  that  are  not  fully  understood  by  Project  Managers.  Con-
sequently, Project Managers often have limited insight into how an independent cost
estimate  is  developed,  and  thus  its  validity,  relevance,  and  utility.  Furthermore,  it
is often difficult for NASA cost analysts to communicate the intricacies of their esti-
mate  to  the  project  team.  The  project  team  uses  a  different  cost  methodology,  esti-
mating  the  effort  of  tasks  from  the  bottom-up,  based  on  the  knowledge  of  the  indi-
viduals working on the project. These differences in assumptions and methodologies
make reconciliation of cost estimates difficult.

NASA  cost  analysts  must  do  a  better  job  of  demonstrating  how  their  estimates
compare  with  historical  cost  data  in  order  to  provide  Project  Managers  confidence
that  their  models  are  predictive.  The  collection  of  CADRe  data  provides  the  basis
for such a comparison. NASA cost analysts must also fully explain the methodology,
as well as the data inputs, to Project Managers. In particular, when subjective data
inputs  are  introduced  into  the  cost  models,  and  used  in  a  certain  manner,  NASA
cost analysts must provide Project Managers with a full understanding of the basis
for  using  these  inputs.  This  increased  transparency  would  likely  result  in  Project
Managers  having  an  increased  understanding  and  confidence  in  the  independent
cost estimates.
Q4. In  describing  what  else  needs  to  be  done,  your  testimony  highlights  the  need  to
strengthen  the  connection  between  an  independent  cost  estimate  and  the  project
estimate  to  include  the  effects  of  risk  and  risk  mitigation.  Why  is  the  project’s
ownership of the cost estimate so important?

A4. The  project  must  ‘‘own’’  the  independent  cost  estimate  if  it  is  expected  to  man-
age  to  it.  The  project  must  believe  that  the  baseline  cost  estimate  is  valid  and
achievable  so  that  they  can  steadfastly  work  toward  executing  the  plan.  Too  often,
the independent cost estimate is unrelated to project risk management results, and
there  is  a  disconnect  between  the  risk  identification  process  and  the  cost  estimate.
It is critical to link these two processes.

Projects use risk identification to measure their robustness. Furthermore, an eco-
nomic assessment can determine if a project should implement a risk mitigation ef-
fort. The identification of risk and risk mitigation activities helps the project to fully
understand  how  the  baseline  plan  would  be  affected  by  certain  risks.  Space  system
development projects have processes for identifying and managing risks, such as the
5 x 5 matrix process that classifies likelihood and consequences for each risk. A prob-
abilistic  cost  estimate  approach  that  incorporates  all  discrete  risks  may  be  a  way
to  ensure  that  the  Project  Manager  and  the  independent  cost  estimate  team  have
a common language and understanding of risk.
Q5. Your  testimony  refers  to  NASA’s  recent  requirement  to  develop  budgets  with  a
70  percent  confidence  level.  Your  statement  also  notes  that  ‘‘The  validity  of  this
approach,  however,  depends  on  the  stability  and  soundness  of  the  baseline’’
budget.  What  is  needed  to  ensure  that  the  requirement  for  a  70  percent  con-
fidence level in developing NASA budget estimates will be effective?

A5. A  stable  baseline  budget  is  critical  to  the  development  of  a  project  plan  that
can be effectively managed and executed. A sound, stable baseline plan requires the
development  early  in  a  project  of  the  70  percent  confidence  level  that  assesses  all
potential  outcomes  and  incorporates  all  potential  risks.  The  development  of  the  70
percent confidence level entails identifying the potential risks and quantifying their
potential  impact  in  terms  of  cost  or  schedule  growth.  The  development  of  this  com-
prehensive  risk  plan  and  a  robust  confidence  level  assessment  allows  for  a  stable
and comprehensive baseline plan.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

Note  that  Earned  Value  Management  (EVM)  is  much  more  effective  if  the  meas-
urement of progress is based on performance against a stable plan. Multiple replan-
ning  or  re-baselining  activities  make  EVM  significantly  less  effective.  Replanning
and/or  re-baselining  are  sometimes  necessary  due  to  subsequent  project  changes.
However,  a  stable,  robust  baseline  plan  from  the  outset  should  reduce  the  need  for
replanning and lead to a more efficiently managed project.
Q6. How  successful  have  other  agencies  been  at  using  confidence  levels?  Has  this
technique  mitigated  cost  growth?  Do  you  agree  with  NASA’s  choice  of  a  70  per-
cent confidence level or do you advocate a higher or lower level?

A6. Many Blue Ribbon panels advocate creating a program reserve by budgeting to
a higher confidence level as good practice. However, it is too early to tell how effec-
tive  budgeting  to  a  higher  confidence  level  is  in  controlling  cost  and  schedule
growth. The DOD started using cost confidence levels to improve program budgeting
about  eight  years  ago.  It  has  not  been  uniformly  applied  across  DOD  space  pro-
grams;  and  given  the  long  development  timelines  for  major  space  programs,  there
are few completed programs that were initiated using this budget approach. In addi-
tion,  the  resulting  increased  funding  from  budgeting  to  higher  confidence  levels
have  not  been  consistently  applied  within  the  programs.  Since  several  factors  con-
tribute  to  a  project’s  cost  and  schedule  growth,  it  may  be  difficult  to  determine  if
solely setting a cost confidence level has reduced cost growth in the DOD until more
data becomes available.
Q7. In  the  past  year,  we  have  seen  a  growing  number  of  protests  associated  with
NASA  contract  awards.  To  what  do  you  attribute  this  growing  number  of  pro-
tests?  Are  there  some  steps  NASA  could  take  to  minimize  vendors’  need  to  file
such protests? Is this phenomenon unique to NASA or are you observing a simi-
lar trend at DOD?

A7. Since  Aerospace  has  not  participated  in  a  NASA  source  selection  that  has  lead
to protests, we cannot speak to specific experience on the subject. It could be postu-
lated,  however,  that  as  mergers  occur  and  fewer  and  fewer  contractors  are  com-
peting  for  fewer  and  fewer  missions,  it  is  inevitable  that  more  protests  would  be
filed.  Many  elements  of  NASA  proposal  evaluations  are  subjective  in  nature  and,
therefore,  are  open  to  debate  and  potential  protest.  For  example,  it  is  difficult  to
determine objectively the relative science value of a mission visiting an asteroid vs.
one that visits a planet. Even with more objective evaluation criteria, such as those
for  DOD  procurements,  there  still  may  be  an  incentive  for  a  company  to  file  a  pro-
test if it believes that its proposal has been misinterpreted.
Q8. During  the  hearing,  Rep.  Grayson  raised  the  issue  of  contrasting  approaches  of
having vendors be responsible for overruns in fixed price contracts and not being
obliged  to  pay  for  cost  growth  in  cost  reimbursement  contracts.  Since  NASA’s
program  management  process  fully  recognizes  that  a  project  usually  starts  with
uncertainty  but  then  matures  through  success  design  reviews,  could  NASA  use
a  cost  reimbursement  contract  for  the  work  up  conducted  through  the  Prelimi-
nary  Design  Review  (PDR)  or  Critical  Design  Review  (CDR)  and  then  subse-
quently  utilize  a  fixed  price  contract?  Has  such  a  hybrid  approach  ever  been
taken, and if so, what were the results?

A8. Given the nature of NASA’s primary objective, which is to develop missions that
provide  first-of-a-kind,  world-class  science,  it  is  our  opinion  that  using  a  fixed  price
contract  structure  would  not  be  appropriate  for  the  majority  of  NASA’s  contracts.
The  commercial  communications  industry,  which  has  a  continuing  product  line  and
very  well  defined  and  stable  requirements  from  the  customer,  uses  this  approach
with  great  success.  As  stated  in  the  written  testimony,  however,  since  NASA  does
not typically have a mature design and stable requirements until late in the design
process, a fixed price contract structure must be applied with great caution and only
in  certain  circumstances.  For  projects  where  uncertainty  is  high  and  the  potential
risks  are  significant,  a  fixed  price  contract  would  not  be  beneficial  either  for  NASA
or its contractors.
Q9. Should  there  be  a  reasonable  level  of  reserves  included  in  the  estimated  cost  of
a program and, if so, what would you define as ‘‘reasonable’’? What are the pros
and cons of a higher level of reserves?

A9. Aerospace  was  involved  in  a  previous  study  which  suggested  nominal  reserve
levels  based  on  historical  data  for  a  specific  set  of  robotic  science  missions.  These
nominal  reserve  levels  were  not  intended  to  provide  a  hard  and  fast  rule  for  speci-
fying a percentage of reserves that all projects should carry. Aerospace recommends
that  the  level  of  reserves  should  be  commensurate  with  a  given  project’s  risks  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

criticality.  Reserves  could  be  defined  by  the  confidence  level  requirement  of  the
budget  (i.e.,  the  higher  the  confidence  level,  the  greater  the  magnitude  of  the  re-
serves).  Budgeting  using  confidence  levels  allows  the  magnitude  of  a  project’s  re-
serves  to  vary  proportionately  with  each  project’s  70  percent  confidence  level,  thus
reflecting each project’s unique risks.

It is critical that NASA hold funds in reserve to manage its portfolio of missions.
A project will use its available funding, including reserve, in order to mitigate risks
and ensure mission success. This it is imperative to allocate some portion of the re-
serve  funding  at  a  higher  level,  such  as  to  a  Program,  which  is  a  collection  of
Projects, or to NASA Headquarters (HQ). This tiered reserve allocation allows fund-
ing at the Program or HQ level to be quickly allocated to other Projects that exceed
their initial allocation. It also provides for a more flexible portfolio management ap-
proach, allowing less reserve to be held for any single project.

Question submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Given the long experience of schedule and cost growth in complex missions, why
not  simply  impose  higher  cost  and  schedule  reserves  at  the  project’s  outset,  in-
stead  of  trying  to  operate  with  a  too-small  reserve  when  the  project  encounters
difficulties?

A1. Since  mission  success  is  the  objective  of  Project  Managers,  projects  tend  to  use
all  of  the  cost  and  schedule  reserves  that  they  control  in  order  to  reduce  mission
risk.  Hence,  any  additional  project  cost  and  schedule  reserves  provided  would  typi-
cally  be  used  to  further  reduce  mission  risk  through  performing  additional  testing,
developing  additional  testbeds,  purchasing  additional  spare  hardware,  etc.  Having
higher project cost and schedule reserves may decrease perceived cost and schedule
growth; however, in the end, the actual cost and schedule of missions may be great-
er.  Given  NASA’s  fixed  annual  budget,  the  approach  of  imposing  higher  cost  and
schedule reserves for could lead to a reduction in the number of missions that NASA
is able to develop.

To  be  able  to  effectively  manage  its  portfolio  of  missions,  however,  it  is  critical
that  NASA  hold  funds  in  reserve.  Assuming  that  a  project  will  use  its  available
funding  including  reserve,  it  is  imperative  that  NASA  allocate  some  portion  of  the
reserve  funding  at  a  higher  level,  such  as  to  a  Program,  which  is  a  collection  of
Projects, or to NASA Headquarters (HQ). This tiered reserve allocation allows fund-
ing  at  the  Program  or  HQ  level  to  be  allocated  to  those  Projects  that  exceed  their
initial  allocation.  This  approach  also  provides  for  a  more  flexible  portfolio  manage-
ment  approach,  allowing  less  reserve  to  be  held  for  any  single  Project.  A  tiered  re-
serve, which distributes reserves at different organizational levels, represents a bal-
anced approach. While it provides some reserves for the Project Managers to rapidly
address development problems before their costs escalate, it does not release all re-
serves  to  the  Projects  where  the  funds  would  most  likely  be  used  up-front  to  plan
additional mission risk reduction activities.

Questions submitted by Representative Pete Olson
Q1. Are  there  valid  reasons  why  it  might  be  necessary  for  a  project  to  enter  the  im-
plementation  phase  without  having  fully  matured  critical  technologies?  And  if
so, are there ways to compensate for the increased risk?

A1. For the majority of NASA missions, it is prudent for NASA to fully develop its
critical technologies prior to the start of the implementation phase. However, NASA
may be required to start mission implementation without having fully matured crit-
ical  technologies  if  the  timeliness  of  a  mission  is  such  that  it  must  be  fielded  on
a highly expedited schedule. Although such a timeliness requirement is more preva-
lent  in  national  security  space  systems,  NASA  could  have  a  compelling  need  (e.g.,
a rescue or replacement of a critical NASA satellite or capability) that requires such
timeliness.  When  a  project  must  enter  the  implementation  phase  without  having
fully  matured  critical  technologies,  the  project  should  compensate  for  the  increased
risk  by  developing  alternative  technologies  in  parallel.  Then  if  a  critical  technology
is  not  ready,  an  alternative  technology  could  be  implemented.  Note  that  developing
alternative  technologies  in  parallel  to  compensate  for  increased  risk  may  result  in
higher mission cost and decreased mission capability.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 10:35 Jul 24, 2009 Jkt 047544 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\S&A09\030509\47554 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

